Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1667.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204(58) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended and the section is amended by adding a clause to read:<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(58) The sale at retail or use of a personal computer, a tablet, a personal digital assistant, a peripheral device or an Internet access device, or a service contract or single-user licensed software purchased in conjunction with a personal computer, tablet, personal digital assistant, peripheral device or Internet access device, with a sales price of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), during the exclusion period by an individual purchaser for nonbusiness use. The exclusion does not include a sale at retail or use of, leasing, rental or repair of a personal computer, tablet, personal digital assistant, peripheral device or Internet access device; mainframe computers; network servers; local area network hubs; routers and network cabling; network operating systems; multiple-user licensed software; minicomputers; [hand-held computers; personal digital assistants without Internet access;] hardware word processors; graphical calculators; video game consoles; telephones; digital cameras; pagers; compact discs encoded with music or movies; and digital versatile discs encoded with music or movies. For purposes of this clause, the phrase "exclusion period" means the period of time from [August 5, 2001, to and including August 12, 2001, and from February 17, 2002, to and including February 24, 2002.] the first Saturday in August to and including the third Saturday in August. For purposes of this clause, "purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.20250HB1667PN3745 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(77) The sale at retail or use of school supplies during the exclusion period for nonbusiness purposes. For the purposes of this clause:(i) The following terms or phrases shall have the following meanings:"Art supplies" shall mean clay and glazes, paints, paintbrushes, sketch and drawing pads and watercolors."Exclusion period" shall mean the first Saturday in August to and including the third Saturday in August."Instructional materials" shall mean reference books, reference maps and globes, textbooks and workbooks."School supplies" shall mean items such as book bags, pens, pencils, pencil sharpeners, markers, highlighters, erasers, crayons, blackboard chalk, notebooks, binders, folders, paper, index cards, glue, tape, rulers, scissors, staplers, staples, paper clips, printer ink, calculators, compasses, protractors, lunch boxes, school supply boxes, personal organizers, art supplies, clipboards, dry erase markers, sticky notes, bulletin board paper, educational posters and games and instructional materials with a sales price of fifty dollars ($50) or less per item.(ii) The department may promulgate regulations to include other similar items in the definitions of "art supplies," "instructional materials" and "school supplies" under this clause.Section 1.1. Section 1101(b) and (h) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1101. Imposition of Tax.--* * *(a.2) Transfer to Alternative Fuels Incentive Fund.--20250HB1667PN3745 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning in fiscal year 2026-2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, seven million dollars ($7,000,000) of the taxes received under subsection (a) shall be transferred to the Alternative Fuels Incentive Fund established under section 3 of the act of November 29, 2004 (P.L.1376, No.178), known as the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act. The transfer required under this subsection shall be made annually by May 31, 2027, and each May 31 thereafter.(b) Electric Light, Waterpower and Hydro-electric Utilities.--(1) Every electric light company, waterpower company and hydro-electric company now or hereafter incorporated or organized by or under any law of this Commonwealth, or now or hereafter organized or incorporated by any other state or by the United States or any foreign government and doing business in this Commonwealth, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons, engaged in electric light and power business, waterpower business and hydro-electric business in this Commonwealth, shall pay to the State Treasurer, through the Department of Revenue, a tax of forty-four mills upon each dollar of the gross receipts of the corporation, company or association, limited partnership, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons, received from:[(1)] (i) the sales of electric energy within this State, except gross receipts derived from the sales for resale of electric energy to persons, partnerships, associations, corporations or political subdivisions subject to the tax imposed by this subsection upon gross receipts derived from such resale; and20250HB1667PN3745 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [(2)] (ii) the sales of electric energy produced in Pennsylvania and made outside of Pennsylvania in a state that has taken action since December 21, 1977 which results in higher costs for electric energy produced in that state and sold in Pennsylvania unless the action that was taken after December 21, 1977 is rescinded according to the following apportionment formula: except for gross receipts derived from sales under clause (1), the gross receipts from all sales of electricity of the producer shall be apportioned to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania by the ratio of the producer's operating and maintenance expenses in Pennsylvania and depreciation attributable to property in Pennsylvania to the producer's total operating and maintenance expenses and depreciation.(2) This subsection shall expire July 1, 2026.* * *(h) Benefits to Consumer.--(1) For purposes of this article, the reduction in the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) shall derive to the benefit of the consumer purchasing services from said utilities. Said benefit shall be provided in the form of a reduction in the State tax surcharge. Failure to pass through the reduction to the consumer shall subject the public utility to a civil penalty of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and such additional relief as the court may deem appropriate.(2) For purposes of this article, the elimination of the taxes imposed under subsection (b) shall derive to the benefit of the consumer purchasing electric energy. The benefit shall be provided in the form of the elimination of or a reduction in the State tax surcharge. Failure to pass through the elimination or 20250HB1667PN3745 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reduction to the consumer shall subject the entity to a civil penalty of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and additional relief as the court may deem appropriate.* * *Section 2. Section 1101.2 of the act is amended to read:Section 1101.2. Establishment of Revenue-Neutral Reconciliation.--(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of 66 Pa.C.S. § 2810(c)(1) (relating to revenue-neutral reconciliation), the rate of tax established under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2810(c)(2) for the period beginning January 1, 2002, shall continue in force without further adjustment for periods beginning January 1, 2003, and thereafter, and the Secretary of Revenue shall not deliver any further reports under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2810(c)(3).(b) Subsection (a) shall expire July 1, 2026.Section 3. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-FEDUCATIONAL TAX CREDITSSection 1701-F. Scope of article.This article establishes the educational improvement and opportunity scholarship tax credits.Section 1702-F. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicable taxes." Any of the taxes due under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XV or XX or a tax under Article XVI of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.20250HB1667PN3745 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Applicant." An eligible student who applies for a scholarship."Assessment." The Pennsylvania System of School Assessment test, the Keystone Exam, an equivalent local assessment or another test established or approved by the State Board of Education or the General Assembly to meet the requirements of section 2603-B(d)(10)(i) of the Public School Code of 1949 , or required under the Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802) or its successor statute or another test required to achieve other standards established by the Department of Education for the public school or school district under 22 Pa. Code § 403.3 (relating to single accountability system)."Attendance boundary." A geographic area of residence used by a school district to assign a student to a public school."Average daily membership." As defined in section 2501(3) of the Public School Code of 1949."Business firm." An entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and subject to taxes imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XV or XX or a tax under Article XVI of The Insurance Company Law of 1921. The term includes a pass-through entity, including a pass-through entity, the purpose of which is the making of contributions under this article and whose shareholders, partners or members are composed of owners or employes of other business firms."Career and technical school." A public secondary school established under the provisions of Article XVIII of the Public School Code of 1949."Contribution." A donation of cash, personal property or services, the value of which is the net cost of the donation to 20250HB1667PN3745 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the donor or the pro rata hourly wage, including benefits, of the individual performing the services."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Economically disadvantaged school." Any school within this Commonwealth at which at least 51% of the students attending the school in the immediately preceding school year received a scholarship pursuant to this article in the following amounts:(1) for a pre-kindergarten, kindergarten or elementary school, at least $500; and(2) for a secondary school, at least $1,000."Educational improvement organization." A nonprofit entity which:(1) is exempt from Federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.); and(2) contributes at least 90% of its annual receipts as grants to a public school, a chartered school as defined in section 1376.1 of the Public School Code of 1949, or a private school approved under section 1376 of the Public School Code of 1949, for innovative educational programs.For purposes of this definition, a nonprofit entity "contributes" its annual cash receipts when it expends or otherwise irrevocably encumbers those funds for expenditure during the then-current fiscal year of the nonprofit entity or during the next succeeding fiscal year of the nonprofit entity. A nonprofit entity shall include a school district foundation, public school foundation, charter school foundation or cyber charter school foundation."Elementary school." A school which is not a secondary 20250HB1667PN3745 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school."Eligible pre-kindergarten student." A student, including an eligible student with a disability, who is enrolled in a pre-kindergarten program and is a member of a household with a maximum annual household income as increased by the applicable income allowance."Eligible student." A school-age student, including an eligible student with a disability, who is enrolled in a school and is a member of a household with a maximum annual household income as increased by the applicable income allowance."Eligible student with a disability." A pre-kindergarten student or a school-age student who meets all of the following:(1) Is enrolled in a special education school or has otherwise been identified, in accordance with 22 Pa. Code Ch. 14 (relating to special education services and programs), as a "child with a disability," as defined in 34 CFR § 300.8 (relating to child with a disability).(2) Needs special education and related services.(3) Is enrolled in a pre-kindergarten program or in a school.(4) Is a member of a household with a household income of not more than the maximum annual household income."Fiscal year." The Commonwealth's fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30."Household." An individual living alone or with the following: a spouse, parent and their unemancipated minor children, other unemancipated minor children who are related by blood or marriage or other adults or unemancipated minor children living in the household who are dependent upon the individual.20250HB1667PN3745 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Household income." All money or property received of whatever nature and from whatever source derived. The term does not include the following:(1) Periodic payments for sickness and disability other than regular wages received during a period of sickness or disability.(2) Disability, retirement or other payments arising under workers' compensation acts, occupational disease acts and similar legislation by any government.(3) Payments commonly recognized as old-age or retirement benefits paid to persons retired from service after reaching a specific age or after a stated period of employment.(4) Payments commonly known as public assistance or unemployment compensation payments by a governmental agency.(5) Payments to reimburse actual expenses.(6) Payments made by employers or labor unions for programs covering hospitalization, sickness, disability or death, supplemental unemployment benefits, strike benefits, Social Security and retirement.(7) Compensation received by United States servicemen serving in a combat zone.(8) Payments received from a governmental agency to relieve the economic effects of the COVID-19 pandemic."Income allowance." The base amount of $15,000 for each eligible student, eligible pre-kindergarten student and dependent member of the household. Beginning July 1, 2014, the department shall annually adjust the base amount to reflect upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and 20250HB1667PN3745 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Maryland area for the preceding 12 months. The department shall immediately transmit the adjusted amounts to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication as a notice in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin."Innovative educational program." An advanced academic or similar program that is not part of the regular academic program of a public school but that enhances the curriculum or academic program of the public school, chartered school or private school or provides pre-kindergarten programs to public school students, students of a chartered school or students of a private school. For the purposes of this definition, a chartered school shall mean a chartered school as defined in section 1376.1 of the Public School Code of 1949, and a private school shall mean a private school approved under section 1376 of the Public School Code of 1949."Kindergarten." A one-year formal educational program that occurs during the school year immediately prior to first grade. The term includes a part-time and a full-time program."Low-achieving school." A public school that ranked in the lowest 15% of the school's designation as an elementary school or a secondary school based on combined mathematics and reading scores from the annual assessment administered in the previous school year and for which the Department of Education has posted results on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website. The term does not include a charter school, cyber charter school or area career and technical school."Maximum annual household income."(1) Subject to adjustment under paragraphs (2) and (3), the amount of $90,000, plus the applicable income allowance.(2) With respect to an eligible student with a 20250HB1667PN3745 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disability, as calculated by multiplying:(i) the applicable amount under paragraph (1); by(ii) the applicable support level factor according to the following table:Support Level Support Level Factor1 1.502 2.993(3) Beginning July 1, 2014, the department shall annually adjust the income amounts under paragraphs (1) and (2) to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area in the preceding 12 months and shall immediately transmit the adjusted amounts to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication as a notice in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin."Nonpublic school." A school which is a nonprofit organization and which is located in this Commonwealth. The term does not include a public school."Opportunity scholarship." An award given to an applicant to pay tuition and school-related fees necessary to attend a participating nonpublic school or a participating public school located in a school district which is not the recipient's school district of residence."Opportunity scholarship organization." A nonprofit entity which:(1) is exempt from Federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.); and(2) contributes at least 90% of the entity's annual cash receipts to an opportunity scholarship program or at least 20250HB1667PN3745 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 85% of the annual cash receipts if the entity reports an annual IRS program expense percentage of greater than 90% on its IRS 990 tax filing.For the purposes of this definition, a nonprofit entity contributes the entity's cash receipts to an opportunity scholarship program when the entity expends or otherwise irrevocably encumbers those funds for distribution during the then-current fiscal year of the nonprofit entity or during the next succeeding fiscal year of the nonprofit entity."Opportunity scholarship program." A program to provide opportunity scholarships to eligible students who reside within the attendance area of a low-achieving school."Parent." An individual who:(1) is a resident of this Commonwealth; and(2) either:(i) has legal custody or guardianship of a student; or(ii) keeps in the individual's home a student and supports the student gratis as if the student were a lineal descendant of the individual."Participating nonpublic school." A nonpublic school which notifies the Department of Education under section 1711-F that the school wishes to accept opportunity scholarship recipients."Participating public school." A public school in a school district which notifies the Department of Education under section 1711-F that the school wishes to accept opportunity scholarship recipients. The term does not include a low-achieving school."Pass-through entity." A partnership as defined in section 301(n.0), a single-member limited liability company treated as a 20250HB1667PN3745 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disregarded entity for Federal income tax purposes or a Pennsylvania S corporation as defined in section 301(n.1). The term includes a pass-through entity that owns an interest in a pass-through entity. The term also includes a qualified Subchapter S trust."Pre-kindergarten program." A program of instruction for three-year-old, four-year-old, five-year-old or six-year-old students, other than a kindergarten, that utilizes a curriculum aligned with the curriculum of the school with which it is affiliated and which provides one of the following:(1) A minimum of two hours of instructional and developmental activities per day at least 60 days per school year.(2) A minimum of two hours of instructional and developmental activities per day at least 20 days over the summer recess."Pre-kindergarten scholarship organization." A nonprofit entity which:(1) is exempt from Federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or is operated as a separate segregated fund by a scholarship organization that has been qualified under section 1703-F; and(2) contributes at least 90% of its annual cash receipts to a pre-kindergarten scholarship program by expending or otherwise irrevocably encumbering those funds for distribution during the then-current fiscal year of the organization or during the next succeeding fiscal year of the organization or at least 85% of the annual cash receipts if the entity reports an annual IRS program expense percentage of greater than 90% on its IRS 990 tax filing.20250HB1667PN3745 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Pre-kindergarten scholarship program." A program to provide tuition to eligible pre-kindergarten students to attend a pre-kindergarten program operated by or in conjunction with a school located in this Commonwealth and that includes an application and review process for the purpose of making awards to eligible pre-kindergarten students and awards scholarships to eligible pre-kindergarten students without limiting availability to only students of one school or one building within a school district or nonpublic school entity."Public school." A public pre-kindergarten where compulsory attendance requirements do not apply or a public kindergarten, elementary school, secondary school or career and technical school at which the compulsory attendance requirements of this Commonwealth may be met and which meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 78 Stat. 241)."Public School Code of 1949." The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."Qualified Subchapter S trust." As defined in section 1361(d)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986."Recipient." An applicant who receives a scholarship."Scholarship." An award under a scholarship program to pay tuition and school-related fees to attend a school."Scholarship organization." A nonprofit entity which:(1) is exempt from Federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and(2) contributes at least 90% of its annual cash receipts to a scholarship program or at least 85% of the annual cash receipts if the entity reports an annual IRS program expense percentage of greater than 90% on its IRS 990 tax filing.20250HB1667PN3745 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For purposes of this definition, a nonprofit entity "contributes" its annual cash receipts to a scholarship program when it expends or otherwise irrevocably encumbers those funds for distribution during the then-current fiscal year of the nonprofit entity or during the next succeeding fiscal year of the nonprofit entity."Scholarship program." A program to provide tuition and school-related fees to eligible students to attend a school located in this Commonwealth. A scholarship program must include an application and review process for the purpose of making awards to eligible students. The award of scholarships to eligible students shall be made without limiting availability to only students of one school or one building within a school district or nonpublic school entity."School." A public or nonpublic pre-kindergarten, kindergarten, elementary school or secondary school at which the compulsory attendance requirements of the Commonwealth may be met and which meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964."School age." Children from the earliest admission age to a school's pre-kindergarten or kindergarten program or, when no pre-kindergarten or kindergarten program is provided, the school's earliest admission age for beginners, until the end of the school year, the student attains 21 years of age or graduation from high school, whichever occurs first."School district of residence." The school district in which the student's primary domicile is located."School-related fees." Fees charged by a school to all students for books, instructional materials, technology equipment and services, uniforms, activities and concurrent 20250HB1667PN3745 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enrollment programs under Article XVI-B of the Public School Code of 1949."Secondary school." A school with an eleventh grade."Special education school." A school or program within a school that is designated specifically and exclusively for students with any of the disabilities listed in 34 CFR 300.8 and meets one of the following:(1) Is licensed under the act of January 28, 1988 (P.L.24, No.11), known as the Private Academic Schools Act.(2) Is accredited by an accrediting association approved by the State Board of Education.(3) Is a school for the blind or deaf receiving Commonwealth appropriations.(4) Is operated by or under the authority of a bona fide religious institution or by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof."Student." An individual who meets all of the following:(1) Is school age.(2) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(3) Attends or is about to attend a school."Support level." The level of support needed by an eligible student with a disability, as set forth in the following matrix:Support Level 1 - The student is not enrolled in a special education school.Support Level 2 - The student is enrolled as a student in a special education school."Tax year." A taxpayer's annual accounting period or, if a return is made for a period of less than 12 months, the period for which the return is made.Section 1703-F. Qualification and application by organizations.20250HB1667PN3745 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment.--In accordance with section 14 of Article III of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, the educational improvement and opportunity scholarship tax credit programs are established to enhance the educational opportunities available to all students in this Commonwealth.(b) Information.--In order to qualify under this article, an educational improvement organization, a scholarship organization, a pre-kindergarten scholarship organization or an opportunity scholarship organization must submit information to the department that enables the department to confirm that the organization is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.(c) Scholarship organizations and pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations.--A scholarship organization or pre-kindergarten scholarship organization must certify to the department that the organization is eligible to participate in the educational improvement tax credit program established under this article and must agree to annually report the following information based on the immediately preceding fiscal year to the department by November 1 of each year:(1) For each fiscal year through the 2024-2025 fiscal year:(i) The number of scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible pre-kindergarten students.(ii) The total and average amounts of the scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible pre-kindergarten students.(iii) The number of scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible students in 20250HB1667PN3745 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grades kindergarten through eight.(iv) The total and average amounts of the scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible students in grades kindergarten through eight.(v) The number of scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible students in grades nine through 12.(vi) The total and average amounts of the scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible students in grades nine through 12.(vii) Where the scholarship organization or pre-kindergarten scholarship organization collects information on a county-by-county basis, the total number and the total amount of scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to residents of each county in which the scholarship organization or pre-kindergarten scholarship organization awarded scholarships.(viii) The total number of scholarship applications processed and the amounts of any application fees charged, either per scholarship application or in the aggregate through a third-party processor.(ix) The organization's Federal Form 990 or other Federal form indicating the tax status of the organization for Federal tax purposes, if any, and a copy of a compilation, review or audit of the organization's financial statements conducted by a certified public accounting firm.20250HB1667PN3745 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1.1) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter:(i) For each scholarship award given to an applicant:(A) An indicator of whether the applicant was an eligible student or an eligible student with a disability.(B) An indicator of whether the applicant was in grades kindergarten through eight or grades nine through 12.(C) The dollar amount of the scholarship award.(D) For the year in which the scholarship award was used:(I) The name of the applicant's school district of residence.(II) The name of the school entity that the applicant attended.(ii) The information provided under subparagraph (i) shall not include personally identifiable information.(2) The information required under paragraphs (1) and (1.1) shall be submitted on a form provided by the department. No later than September 1 of each year, the department shall annually distribute such sample forms, together with the forms on which the reports are required to be made, to each listed scholarship organization and pre-kindergarten scholarship organization.(2.1) Beginning with the annual report due November 1, 2026, the department shall annually post the information required under paragraph (1.1) in a downloadable spreadsheet on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.20250HB1667PN3745 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The department may not require any other information to be provided by scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations, except as expressly authorized in this article.(d) Educational improvement organization.--(1) An application submitted by an educational improvement organization must describe its proposed innovative educational program or programs in a form prescribed by the department. The department shall consult with the Department of Education as necessary. The department shall review and approve or disapprove the application. In order to be eligible to participate in the educational improvement tax credit program established under this article, an educational improvement organization must agree to annually report the following information to the department by November 1 of each year:(i) The name of the innovative educational program or programs and the total amount of the grant or grants made to those programs during the immediately preceding school year.(ii) A description of how each grant was utilized during the immediately preceding school year and a description of any demonstrated or expected innovative educational improvements.(iii) The names of the public schools and school districts where innovative educational programs that received grants during the immediately preceding school year were implemented.(iv) Where the educational improvement organization collects information on a county-by-county basis, the 20250HB1667PN3745 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 total number and the total amount of grants made during the immediately preceding school year for programs at public schools in each county in which the educational improvement organization made grants.(v) The organization's Federal Form 990 or other Federal form indicating the tax status of the organization for Federal tax purposes, if any, and a copy of a compilation, review or audit of the organization's financial statements conducted by a certified public accounting firm.(2) The information required under paragraph (1) shall be submitted on a form provided by the department. No later than September 1 of each year, the department shall annually distribute such sample forms, together with the forms on which the reports are required to be made, to each listed educational improvement organization.(2.1) The department shall annually post the information required under paragraph (1)(i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) in a downloadable spreadsheet on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) The department may not require any other information to be provided by educational improvement organizations, except as expressly authorized in this article.(d.1) Opportunity scholarship organizations.--(1) An opportunity scholarship organization must enhance the educational opportunities available to students in this Commonwealth by providing opportunity scholarships to eligible students who reside within the attendance boundary of low-achieving schools to attend schools which are not low-achieving schools and which are not public schools within the 20250HB1667PN3745 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 eligible student's school district of residence. By February 15 of each year, an opportunity scholarship organization must certify to the department that the organization is eligible to participate in the opportunity scholarship tax credit program.(2) For each fiscal year through the 2024-2025 fiscal year, an opportunity scholarship organization must agree to report the following information on a form provided by the department by November 1 of each year:(i) The total number of applications for opportunity scholarships received during the immediately preceding school year from eligible students in grades kindergarten through eight.(ii) The number of opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible students in grades kindergarten through eight.(iii) The total and average amounts of the opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible students in grades kindergarten through eight.(iv) The total number of applications for opportunity scholarships received during the immediately preceding school year from eligible students in grades nine through 12.(v) The number of opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible students in grades nine through 12.(vi) The total and average amounts of the opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to eligible students in grades nine 20250HB1667PN3745 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 through 12.(vii) Where the opportunity scholarship organization collects information on a county-by-county basis, the total number and the total amount of opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to residents of each county in which the opportunity scholarship organization awarded opportunity scholarships.(viii) The number of opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to applicants with a household income that does not exceed 185% of the Federal poverty level.(ix) The total and average amounts of opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to applicants with a household income that does not exceed 185% of the Federal poverty level.(x) The number of opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to applicants with a household income that does not exceed 185% of the Federal poverty level and who reside within a first class school district.(xi) The total and average amounts of opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to applicants with a household income that does not exceed 185% of the Federal poverty level and who reside within a first class school district.(xii) The number of opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to applicants with a household income that does not exceed 185% of the Federal poverty level and who reside within a 20250HB1667PN3745 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school district that was designated as a financial recovery school district under Article VI-A of the Public School Code of 1949 at the time of the award.(xiii) The total and average amounts of opportunity scholarships awarded during the immediately preceding school year to applicants with a household income that does not exceed 185% of the Federal poverty level and who reside within a school district that was designated as a financial recovery school district under Article VI-A of the Public School Code of 1949 at the time of the award.(xiv) The total number of opportunity scholarship applications processed and the amounts of any application fees charged either per opportunity scholarship application or in the aggregate through a third-party processor.(xv) The opportunity scholarship organization's Federal Form 990 or other Federal form indicating the tax status of the opportunity scholarship organization for Federal tax purposes, if any, and a copy of a compilation, review or audit of the opportunity scholarship organization's financial statements conducted by a certified public accounting firm.(2.1) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, an opportunity scholarship organization must agree to report the following information on a form provided by the department by November 1 of each year:(i) For each scholarship award given to an applicant:(A) An indicator of whether the applicant was an eligible student or an eligible student with a 20250HB1667PN3745 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disability.(B) An indicator of whether the applicant was in grades kindergarten through eight or grades nine through 12.(C) The dollar amount of the scholarship award.(D) For the year in which the scholarship award was used:(I) The name of the applicant's school district of residence.(II) The name of the school entity that the applicant attended.(ii) The information provided under subparagraph (i) may not include personally identifiable information.(3) No later than September 1 of each year, the department shall annually distribute such sample forms, together with the forms on which the reports are required to be made, to each listed opportunity scholarship organization.(3.1) Beginning with the annual report due November 1, 2026, the department shall annually post the information required under paragraph (2.1) in a downloadable spreadsheet on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(4) The department may not require other information to be provided by opportunity scholarship organizations, except as expressly authorized in this article.(d.2) Verification of income.--Each scholarship organization, pre-kindergarten scholarship organization and opportunity scholarship organization shall provide for an application and review process for scholarship applicants that includes a means of verification of household income, which may include submission of the household members' most recently 20250HB1667PN3745 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available Federal or State tax returns, if required to be filed by the household members.(d.3) Scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools.--(1) Effective July 1, 2022, in addition to the other requirements of this article, a scholarship organization that intends to provide scholarship awards to applicants of economically disadvantaged schools must demonstrate a history of serving schools throughout this Commonwealth and the capacity to distribute scholarships Statewide to applicants of economically disadvantaged schools.(2) A scholarship organization must agree to distribute scholarships to applicants of economically disadvantaged schools not later than December 15 of the applicable school year.(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, the department may not for any school year qualify more than one scholarship organization for the provision of scholarships to applicants of economically disadvantaged schools.(4) A scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools shall annually report the following information to the department by January 15 of each year:(i) Scholarship awards by family household income.(ii) The school district where the scholarship recipient currently resides.(iii) The school that the student attended in the year prior to the scholarship award.(iv) The total number, amount and average scholarship awarded.20250HB1667PN3745 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4.1) A scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools shall contribute at least 99% of its annual receipts for economically disadvantaged schools for scholarships.(5) The department may not require additional information to be provided by a scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools except as expressly authorized under this article.(e) Notification.--The department shall notify the scholarship organization, pre-kindergarten scholarship organization, educational improvement organization or opportunity scholarship organization that the organization meets the requirements of and is qualified under this article no later than 60 days after the organization has submitted the information required under this section.(f) Publication.--The department shall annually transmit a list of each scholarship organization, pre-kindergarten scholarship organization, educational improvement organization and opportunity scholarship organization qualified under this section to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The list shall also be posted and updated as necessary on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department. The list shall separately identify the opportunity scholarship organization that qualifies under subsection (d.3).Section 1704-F. Application by business firms.(a) Scholarship organization, pre-kindergarten scholarship organization or opportunity scholarship organization.--(1) A business firm shall apply to the department for a tax credit for contributions to a scholarship organization, 20250HB1667PN3745 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pre-kindergarten scholarship organization or opportunity scholarship organization under section 1705-F.(2) A business firm that intends to apply to the department for a tax credit for contributions for students attending an economically disadvantaged school must submit an application separate from an application for tax credits to another scholarship organization, pre-kindergarten scholarship organization or opportunity scholarship organization. The contribution shall be made to the designated scholarship organization for the economically disadvantaged schools and shall be separately accounted for and distributed by the designated scholarship organization.(3) A business firm shall receive a tax credit under this article if the scholarship organization, pre-kindergarten scholarship organization or opportunity scholarship organization that receives the contribution appears on the list established under section 1703-F(f), subject to the limitations in sections 1705-F and 1706-F.(b) Educational improvement organization.--A business firm must apply to the department for a credit for a contribution to an educational improvement organization under section 1705-F. A business firm shall receive a tax credit under this article if the department has approved the program provided by the educational improvement organization that receives the contribution, subject to the limitations in sections 1705-F and 1706-F.(c) Availability of tax credits.--Tax credits under this article shall be made available by the department on a first-come, first-served basis within the limitation established under section 1706-F(a).20250HB1667PN3745 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Contributions.--A contribution by a business firm to a scholarship organization, pre-kindergarten scholarship organization, opportunity scholarship organization or educational improvement organization shall be made no later than 60 days following the approval of an application under subsection (a) or (b). In the event a business firm does not make a minimum of 50% of the full amount of the approved contribution and has not notified the department of the amount of unused contributions within 14 days of approval, the business firm's application may not be approved in the immediately succeeding fiscal year for more than 150% of the actual amount contributed in the previous fiscal year.(e) Application in the alternative.--At the time of application for an educational improvement or opportunity scholarship tax credit, the department shall advise a business firm that the firm may elect that its application for a particular credit will, in the alternative, be deemed an application received by the department on the same date as the preferred application, but for a different tax credit authorized under this section if the business firm's preferred choice of tax credit is not available. When a business firm does not receive its preferred choice of tax credit, the department shall promptly consider the business firm's application in the alternative for a different tax credit authorized under this section.Section 1705-F. Tax credits.(a) Scholarship or educational improvement organizations.--In accordance with section 1706-F, the Department of Revenue shall grant a tax credit against any applicable tax to a business firm providing proof of a contribution to a scholarship 20250HB1667PN3745 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization or educational improvement organization in the taxable year in which the contribution is made in accordance with the following:(1) The tax credit shall not exceed 75% or, in the case of a contribution to the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools, 85% of the total amount contributed during the taxable year by the business firm.(2) For fiscal year 2014-2015, the tax credit shall not exceed $750,000 annually per business firm for contributions made to scholarship organizations or educational improvement organizations except as provided under subsection (i).(3) For fiscal year 2024-2025 and each fiscal year thereafter, the $750,000 annual tax credit limitation in paragraph (2) shall not apply for contributions made by a business firm to the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools.(a.1) Opportunity scholarship organizations.--In accordance with section 1706-F, the Department of Revenue shall grant a tax credit against any applicable tax to a business firm providing proof of a contribution to an opportunity scholarship organization in the taxable year in which the contribution is made in accordance with the following:(1) The tax credit shall not exceed 75% of the total amount contributed during the taxable year by the business firm.(2) For fiscal year 2014-2015, and each fiscal year thereafter, the tax credit shall not exceed $750,000 annually per business firm for contributions made to opportunity scholarship organizations, except as provided in subsection (i).20250HB1667PN3745 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Additional amount.--Notwithstanding subsections (a)(1) and (a.1)(1), in accordance with section 1706-F, the Department of Revenue shall grant a tax credit of up to 90% or, in the case of a contribution to the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools, 99% of the total amount contributed during the taxable year if the business firm provides a written commitment to provide the scholarship organization, educational improvement organization or opportunity scholarship organization with the same amount of contribution for two consecutive tax years. The business firm must provide the written commitment under this subsection to the department at the time of application.(c) Pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations.--In accordance with section 1706-F, the Department of Revenue shall grant a tax credit against any applicable tax to a business firm providing proof of a contribution to a pre-kindergarten scholarship organization in the taxable year in which the contribution is made in accordance with the following:(1) The tax credit shall be equal to 100% of the first $10,000 contributed during the taxable year by the business firm and shall not exceed 90% of the remaining amount contributed during the taxable year by the business firm. At the time of application, a business firm may provide a written commitment to the department to provide the pre-kindergarten scholarship organization with at least the same amount of contribution for two consecutive years.(2) The tax credit shall not exceed $200,000 annually per business firm for contributions made to pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations, except as provided in subsection (i).20250HB1667PN3745 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Combination of tax credits.--In accordance with section 1706-F, a business firm may receive tax credits from the Department of Revenue in any tax year for any combination of contributions under subsection (a), (a.1), (b) or (c). Except as provided in subsection (i), in no case may a business firm receive tax credits in any tax year in excess of the following:(1) $750,000 for combined contributions to scholarship organizations, other than the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools, and educational improvement organizations under subsections (a) and (b).(2) $750,000 for contributions to opportunity scholarship organizations under subsections (a.1) and (b).(3) $200,000 for contributions to pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations under subsection (c).(e) Pass-through entity.--(1) If a pass-through entity does not intend to use all approved tax credits under this section, it may elect in writing to distribute for no consideration all or a portion of the credit to shareholders, members or partners in proportion to the percentage interest of the shareholder, member or partner in distributions from the pass-through entity, which credits may be used by the shareholders, members or partners in the taxable year in which the contribution is made or in the taxable year immediately following the year in which the contribution is made. The election shall designate the year in which the distributed credits are to be used and shall be made according to procedures established by the Department of Revenue. A pass-through entity that received a distribution from a pass-through entity under this paragraph may make a distribution 20250HB1667PN3745 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this paragraph.(2) A pass-through entity and a shareholder, member or partner of a pass-through entity shall not claim the credit under this section for the same contribution.(3) The shareholder, member or partner may not carry forward, carry back, obtain a refund of or sell or assign the credit.(4) An individual shareholder, partner or member may apply a credit distributed under this section to income taxable under Article III to the shareholder, partner or member, to the spouse of the shareholder, partner or member or to both, if both the shareholder, partner or member and the spouse report income on a joint personal income tax return.(f) Restriction on applicability of credits.--No credits granted under this section shall be applied against any tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III.(g) Time of application for credits.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the department may accept applications for tax credits available during a fiscal year no earlier than July 1 of each fiscal year.(2) The application of any business firm for tax credits available during a fiscal year as part of the second year of a two-year commitment or as a renewal of a two-year commitment which was fulfilled in the previous fiscal year may be accepted no earlier than May 15 preceding the fiscal year. In order to be eligible for the early application date under this paragraph, the contributions included in the second year of a two-year commitment or renewal of a two-year commitment must be made to the same type of organization.20250HB1667PN3745 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Applications for tax credits submitted on July 1 under paragraph (1) for a two-year commitment by a business firm that applied for and was denied credits in the prior fiscal year and that had been approved for tax credits in a prior fiscal year shall be considered prior to an application from a business firm that does not meet the criteria in this paragraph. A business firm seeking preference under this paragraph shall include proof of prior approval tax credits in its July 1 application.(g.1) Approval of tax credits.--Unless otherwise requested by the business firm and agreed to by both the business firm and the department, and unless all authorized credits have already been awarded:(1) For fiscal year 2016-2017, and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall give written notice of its approval to each business firm that submitted a completed application under subsection (g) by August 15, or 30 days following receipt of the completed application, whichever is later.(2) For fiscal year 2016-2017, and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall give written notice of its approval to each business firm that submitted a completed application under subsection (j)(2) within 30 days following receipt of the completed application.(3) Should the department fail, for a period of at least 10 days, to timely transmit any of the written notices required by this subsection, the affected business may bring an action for injunction or other appropriate relief in Commonwealth Court.(h) Waiting list.--The department shall maintain a waiting 20250HB1667PN3745 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 list consisting of each business firm which chooses to be included on the list and whose application has not been approved because all available tax credits have been awarded. A business firm that was not awarded a tax credit due to a lack of available tax credits shall be notified of and offered a place on the waiting list. When tax credits become available, the department shall award the tax credits to the business firms in the order in which the business firms were placed on the waiting list.(i) Temporary increase in maximum tax credits available.--(1) If all tax credits authorized under this article for contributions to the category of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations have not been awarded as of October 1 of any fiscal year, then for applications accepted by the department from October 1 through November 30 of such fiscal year, the limitations set forth in subsections (a), (a.1), (c) and (d) relating to the maximum amount of tax credits a business firm can receive during a fiscal year for contributions to each such category of organizations shall not apply. Under this paragraph, the department may accept applications under section 1704-F from October 1 through November 30 as follows:(i) A business firm, including a business firm that already applied for the maximum tax credits available pursuant to subsections (a) and (d), may apply under section 1704-F(a) for up to the total amount of tax credits remaining available for contributions to scholarship organizations for the fiscal year as set forth in section 1706-F(a)(1).20250HB1667PN3745 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) A business firm, including a business firm that already applied for the maximum tax credits available pursuant to subsections (a.1) and (d), may apply under section 1704-F(a) for up to the total amount of tax credits remaining available for contributions to opportunity scholarship organizations for the fiscal year as set forth in section 1706-F(a)(3).(iii) A business firm, including a business firm that already applied for the maximum tax credits available pursuant to subsections (c) and (d), may apply under section 1704-F(a) for up to the total amount of tax credits remaining available for contributions to pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations for the fiscal year as set forth in section 1706-F(a)(2).(2) The provisions of subsection (b) shall not apply to applications for tax credits made under this subsection. Tax credits awarded under this subsection shall not exceed 75% of the total amount contributed during the taxable year by a business firm pursuant to an application filed under this subsection.(3) Prior to the award of tax credits applied for under this subsection, the department shall first award tax credits applied for by a business firm during the period October 1 through November 30 in an amount no greater than the maximum amount of tax credits for which a business firm is eligible under subsections (a), (a.1), (c) and (d). The tax credits shall be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis as set forth in section 1704-F(c).(4) After the department has awarded tax credits under paragraph (3), any tax credits remaining available within the 20250HB1667PN3745 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 category of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations and pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations shall be awarded based on the total amount of tax credits within each category of organization for which applications are received under this subsection from October 1 through November 30 of the fiscal year as follows:(i) If the total amount of tax credits applied for by all business firms under this subsection does not exceed the total amount of tax credits that remained available for award within a category as of October 1, less those tax credits awarded under paragraph (3), then each business firm may be awarded the full amount of tax credits applied for.(ii) If the total amount of tax credits applied for by all business firms under this subsection exceeds the total amount of tax credits that remained available for award within a category as of October 1, less those tax credits awarded under paragraph (3), then each business firm may be awarded an amount of tax credits determined by multiplying the amount of tax credits applied for by the business firm by a ratio, the numerator of which is the total amount of tax credits that remained available for award within the category as of October 1, less those awarded as set forth in paragraph (3), and the denominator of which is the total amount of tax credits applied for by all business firms under this subsection.(4.1) If all tax credits authorized under this article for contributions to the category of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations have not been awarded 20250HB1667PN3745 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as of November 30 of any fiscal year, then for applications accepted by the department from December 1 through the end of the fiscal year, the limitations set forth in subsections (a), (a.1), (c) and (d) relating to the maximum amount of tax credits a business firm can receive during a fiscal year for contributions to each such category of organizations shall not apply. Under this paragraph, the department may accept applications under section 1704-F from December 1 through the end of the fiscal year and shall award tax credits under this article for contributions to the category of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations on a first-come, first-served basis until all tax credits available for the fiscal year have been exhausted.(5) Notwithstanding a temporary increase in maximum tax credits available under this subsection, the limitations set forth in subsections (a), (a.1), (c) and (d) relating to the maximum amount of tax credits a business firm can receive during a year for contributions to a category of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations shall be reinstated for all applications accepted by the department after June 30 of the fiscal year.(j) Reallocation of tax credits.--(1) Beginning on January 1 of any fiscal year, if any tax credits authorized under this article for contributions to any of the categories of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations remain unawarded, such unawarded tax credits may be reallocated to any of the categories of 20250HB1667PN3745 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations for which all available tax credits have been awarded. The department shall, within 10 business days, inform each business firm on the waiting list maintained by the department under subsection (h) that tax credits remain available under another category for which the business firm has not yet applied. If a business firm notified under this paragraph elects, the department shall reallocate available tax credits for award to the business firm in the business firm's preferred tax credit category, notwithstanding the limitations contained in section 1706-F(a). Each business firm shall have 10 business days from the date of the department's notice to elect a reallocation of tax credits under this paragraph. The department shall award tax credits on a first-come, first-served basis.(2) After the department has awarded tax credits under paragraph (1), the department shall accept new applications for reallocation of tax credits from any of the categories of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations for which tax credits remain available to the applicant's preferred category of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations for which all available tax credits have been awarded, notwithstanding any limitations contained in section 1706-F(a) or the limitations in subsections (a), (a.1), (c) and (d). The department shall award tax credits on a first-come, first-served basis.(2.1) In any fiscal year, the first $10,000,000 in tax 20250HB1667PN3745 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credits available for reallocation under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be set aside for contributions to pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations. If $10,000,000 in tax credits have not been awarded to pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations under paragraphs (1) and (2) prior to March 1 of any fiscal year, the remaining tax credits available for reallocation under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be made available for contributions to any of the categories of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations.(3) No tax credits shall be awarded under this subsection until the department has completed the award of tax credits for applications made under subsection (i).(4) The department shall not reallocate tax credits from any of the categories of scholarship organizations, opportunity scholarship organizations or pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations to the category of educational improvement organizations.(5) Subsections (b) and (g) shall not apply to an application for reallocation of tax credits under this subsection.Section 1706-F. Limitations.(a) Amount.--(1) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved for contributions from business firms to scholarship organizations, educational improvement organizations and pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations shall not exceed $615,000,000 in a fiscal year. The following shall apply:(i) No less than $400,000,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for 20250HB1667PN3745 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contributions from business firms to scholarship organizations.(ii) No less than $74,500,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from business firms to educational improvement organizations.(iii) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved for contributions from business firms to pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations shall not exceed $30,500,000 in a fiscal year.(iv) No less than $110,000,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from business firms to increase the scholarship or pre-kindergarten scholarship by up to $2,000 or, in the case of a scholarship for a student attending a secondary school, by up to $4,000, for a student attending an economically disadvantaged school, to the extent that the total amount of scholarships, pre-kindergarten scholarships and opportunity scholarships will not exceed the lesser of $8,500 or the school's tuition.(2) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved for contributions from business firms to opportunity scholarship organizations shall not exceed $90,000,000 in a fiscal year.(b) Activities.--No tax credit shall be approved for activities that are a part of a business firm's normal course of business.(c) Tax liability.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a tax credit 20250HB1667PN3745 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 granted for any one taxable year may not exceed the tax liability of a business firm.(2) In the case of a credit granted to a pass-through entity which elects to distribute the credit according to section 1705-F(e), a tax credit granted for any one taxable year and distributed to a shareholder, member or partner may not exceed the tax liability of the shareholder, member or partner.(d) Use.-- Subject to subsection (d.1), a tax credit not used by the applicant in the taxable year the contribution was made or in the year designated by the shareholder, member or partner to whom the credit was transferred under section 1705-F(e) may not be carried forward or carried back and is not refundable or transferable.(d.1) Pandemic relief.--(1) A tax credit awarded to a business firm during the 2020-2021 or 2021-2022 fiscal year that cannot be used by the business firm during the fiscal year in which awarded may be carried forward and used during the two taxable years following the taxable year in which the tax credit was awarded.(2) Tax credits that are carried forward under this subsection shall not diminish the total amount of tax credits that may otherwise be awarded to a business firm under section 1705-F or that may be awarded to all business firms in the aggregate under subsection (a).(e) Nontaxable income.--A scholarship from any category of organization received by an eligible student or eligible pre-kindergarten student shall not be considered to be taxable income for the purposes of Article III.20250HB1667PN3745 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Financial assistance.--A scholarship from any category of organization received by an eligible student or eligible pre-kindergarten student shall not constitute an appropriation or financial assistance to the school attended by the recipient.Section 1707-F. Lists.The Department of Revenue shall provide a list of all scholarship organizations, pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations, educational improvement organizations and opportunity scholarship organizations receiving contributions from business firms granted a tax credit under this article to the General Assembly by June 30 of each year.Section 1708-F. Guidelines.The department in consultation with the Department of Education shall develop guidelines to determine the eligibility of an innovative educational program.Section 1709-F. Opportunity scholarships.(a) Notice.--By February 1 of each year, the department shall provide all opportunity scholarship organizations with a list of the low-achieving schools located within each school district.(b) Award.--An opportunity scholarship organization may award an opportunity scholarship to an applicant who resides within the attendance boundary of a low-achieving school to attend a participating public school or a participating nonpublic school selected by the parent of the applicant. If an applicant who received an opportunity scholarship for the prior school year resides within the attendance boundary of a school that was removed from the list of low-achieving schools provided by the department under subsection (a), the applicant may receive an opportunity scholarship. The opportunity scholarship 20250HB1667PN3745 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be for each year of enrollment in a participating public school or participating nonpublic school for up to the lesser of five years or until completion of grade 12, provided the applicant otherwise remains eligible. In awarding scholarships, an opportunity scholarship organization shall give preference to any of the following:(1) An applicant who received an opportunity scholarship for the prior school year.(2) An applicant of a household with a household income that does not exceed 185% of the Federal poverty level for the school year preceding the school year for which the application is being made.(3) An applicant of a household with a household income that does not exceed 185% of the Federal poverty level for the school year preceding the school year for which the application is being made and who resides within any of the following:(i) A first class school district.(ii) A school district designated as a financial recovery school district under Article VI-A of the Public School Code of 1949 for the year for which the award is made.(c) Home schooling.--An opportunity scholarship organization shall not award an opportunity scholarship to an applicant for enrollment in a home education program under section 1327.1 of the Public School Code of 1949.(d) Funding.--The aggregate amount of opportunity scholarships shall not exceed the aggregate amount of contributions made by business firms to the opportunity scholarship organization.20250HB1667PN3745 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Amount.--(1) The maximum amount of an opportunity scholarship awarded to an applicant without a disability shall be $8,500.(2) The maximum amount of an opportunity scholarship awarded to an applicant with a disability shall be $15,000.(3) In no case shall the combined amount of the opportunity scholarship awarded to a recipient and any additional financial assistance provided to the recipient exceed the tuition rate and school-related fees for the participating public school or participating nonpublic school that the recipient will attend.Section 1709.1-F. Economically disadvantaged school scholarships.(a) Reports.--(1) Each school that desires to be designated as an economically disadvantaged school for a school year must report the following information to the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools by the January 1 preceding the applicable school year:(i) The total number of students who attend the school as of the date of the report and are the recipients of a scholarship under this article in an amount, exclusive of any amount received under section 1706-F(a)(1)(iv), for a pre-kindergarten, kindergarten or elementary school of at least $500 and for a secondary school of at least $1,000.(ii) The total number of students attending the school as of the date of the report.(2) The information required under paragraph (1) shall be submitted on a form provided by the scholarship 20250HB1667PN3745 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization for economically disadvantaged schools. No later than the October 15 preceding each school year, the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools shall annually distribute or make available electronically to each school in this Commonwealth the forms on which the reports are required to be made.(3) The scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools shall submit the school's information to the department by the February 1 preceding the school year.(b) Notice of designation.--(1) No later than March 1 after the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools has submitted the information received under subsection (a)(1) to the department, the department shall notify the school and the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools whether the school meets the requirements of, and will be designated as, an economically disadvantaged school for the applicable school year.(2) The department shall annually transmit notice of a list of each school designated as an economically disadvantaged school under this section to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The list shall be posted and updated as necessary on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Administration.--(1) Each school that has been designated by the department as an economically disadvantaged school for an applicable school year shall notify the scholarship 20250HB1667PN3745 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization for economically disadvantaged schools no later than November 15 of the applicable school year of the following information for each recipient of a scholarship registered to attend the school for the applicable school year:(i) The recipient's name and address.(ii) The grade of the recipient for the school year with respect to which the scholarship and tuition grant shall be received.(iii) The type and amount of scholarships under this article entitled to educational tax credits that were received by the recipient, exclusive of any amount received under section 1706-F(a)(1)(iv).(iv) The names and addresses of the recipient's parents or guardians.(v) The amount of tuition charged.(2) The scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools shall distribute the money on a pro rata basis among all students in accordance with section 1703-F(d.3).(3) Information submitted under this section by a school designated as an economically disadvantaged school shall remain confidential and shall not be accessible for inspections and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law. The information may be used for administration of the program.(d) References.--A scholarship award under this article paid to an economically disadvantaged school may be referred to as a scholarship supplement.20250HB1667PN3745 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1710-F. Low-achieving schools.(a) List of low-achieving schools.--By February 1 of each year, the Department of Education shall publish on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website a list of the low-achieving schools for the following school year. The Department of Education shall transmit notice of the list to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Notice.--By February 1 of each year, the Department of Education shall notify every school district identified as having at least one low-achieving school of such identification and shall furnish the school district with a list of the low-achieving schools located within the school district.(c) Publication.--Within 15 days of receipt of a notification under subsection (b), a school district shall post on the district's publicly accessible Internet website notice of all of the following:(1) A description of the opportunity scholarship program.(2) Instructions for applying for an opportunity scholarship.(3) A list of schools in the school district that have been designated by the Department of Education as low-achieving schools.(4) Notice that a parent must directly contact a school district of a participating public school or a participating nonpublic school if the parent seeks to enroll the student in the opportunity scholarship program.(d) Notification to parents.--(1) Within 15 days of receipt of a notification under 20250HB1667PN3745 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (b), a school district shall notify the parents of each student who is currently attending or residing within the attendance boundary of a low-achieving school during the school year of the school's designation.(2) Upon registration of a kindergarten student, a school district shall notify the parents of the kindergarten student that the student will be assigned to a low-achieving school during the school year of the school's designation.(3) The notice shall be in a form provided by the Department of Education and shall provide the following information regarding the opportunity scholarship program:(i) A description of the opportunity scholarship program.(ii) Instructions for obtaining information about applying for an opportunity scholarship under the opportunity scholarship program.(iii) Notice of the parent's responsibilities with regard to applying to a school district of a participating public school or a participating nonpublic school if the parent seeks to enroll the student in the opportunity scholarship program.(e) Average daily membership.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a recipient who was enrolled in the recipient's resident school district or in a charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school when the recipient first received an opportunity scholarship shall continue to be counted in the average daily membership of the school district for a period of one year after enrolling in a participating public school or a participating nonpublic 20250HB1667PN3745 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school.(2) During the year referenced in paragraph (1) and each school year thereafter, a school district of a participating public school in which the recipient is enrolled shall not include the recipient in the school district's average daily membership.Section 1711-F. School participation in program.(a) Election.--(1) By February 15 of each year, a nonpublic school may elect to participate in the opportunity scholarship program for the following school year.(2) By February 15 of each year, a school district may elect to participate in the opportunity scholarship program for the following school year.(b) Notice.--(1) A school district or nonpublic school that elects to participate under subsection (a) must notify the Department of Education of the district's or nonpublic school's intent to participate.(2) For a school district, the notice under paragraph (1) must be submitted on a form developed by the Department of Education and shall specify all of the following:(i) Each school within the school district which the school district intends to make a participating public school.(ii) The amount of tuition and school-related fees attributable to each available seat. The amount under this subparagraph shall not exceed the amount calculated under section 2561 of the Public School Code of 1949.(3) For a nonpublic school, the notice under paragraph 20250HB1667PN3745 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) must be submitted on a form developed by the Department of Education and shall specify the amount of tuition and school-related fees attributable to an available seat.(c) Tuition rates.--(1) No school district of a participating public school or participating nonpublic school may charge a recipient a higher tuition rate or school-related fee than the school district of the participating public school or participating nonpublic school would have charged to a similarly situated student who is not receiving an opportunity scholarship.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 2561 of the Public School Code of 1949, a school district of a participating public school may charge a recipient a tuition rate that is lower than that charged to students who are not recipients of opportunity scholarships.(d) Participating public school criteria.--The following criteria apply to a participating public school:(1) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a school district shall enroll students in a participating public school on a lottery basis from a pool of recipients who meet the application deadline set by the Department of Education until the participating public school fills the school's available seats. The pool may not include a recipient who:(i) Has been expelled or is in the process of being expelled under section 1317.2 , 1318 or 1318.1 of the Public School Code of 1949 and applicable regulations of the State Board of Education.(ii) Has been recruited by the school district or its representatives for athletic purposes.20250HB1667PN3745 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The enrollment of recipients may not place the school district in violation of a valid and binding desegregation order.(3) Priority shall be given to:(i) An existing recipient.(ii) A recipient who is a sibling of a student currently enrolled in the school district.(e) Participating nonpublic school criteria.--The following criteria apply to a participating nonpublic school:(1) The participating nonpublic school may not discriminate on a basis which is illegal under Federal or State laws applicable to nonpublic schools.(2) The participating nonpublic school shall comply with section 1521 of the Public School Code of 1949.(3) The participating nonpublic school or its representatives may not recruit a student for athletic purposes.(f) Student rules, policies and procedures.--(1) Prior to enrollment of a recipient, a school district of a participating public school or a participating nonpublic school shall inform the parent of a recipient of any and all rules, policies and procedures of the participating public school or participating nonpublic school, including any academic policies, disciplinary rules and administrative procedures of the participating public school or participating nonpublic school.(2) Enrollment of a recipient in a participating public school or participating nonpublic school shall constitute acceptance of any rules, policies and procedures of the participating public school or participating nonpublic 20250HB1667PN3745 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school.(g) Transportation.--(1) Transportation of recipients shall be provided under section 1361 of the Public School Code of 1949.(2) Reimbursement shall be as follows:(i) Transportation of a recipient attending a participating public school shall be subject to reimbursement under section 2541 of the Public School Code of 1949.(ii) Transportation of a recipient attending a participating nonpublic school shall be subject to reimbursement under sections 2509.3 and 2541 of the Public School Code of 1949.(h) Construction.--Nothing in this article shall be construed to:(1) Prohibit a participating nonpublic school from limiting admission to a particular grade level, a single gender or areas of concentration of the participating nonpublic school, including mathematics, science and the arts.(2) Authorize the Commonwealth or any of its agencies or officers or political subdivisions to impose any additional requirements on a participating nonpublic school which are not otherwise authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth or to require a participating nonpublic school to enroll a recipient if the participating nonpublic school does not offer appropriate programs or is not structured or equipped with the necessary facilities to meet the special needs of the recipient or does not offer a particular program requested.20250HB1667PN3745 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1712-F. Tuition grants by school districts.(a) General rule.--The board of school directors of a school district may use funds received from the Commonwealth for educational purposes to establish a program of tuition grants to provide for the education of students who reside within the district and attend or will attend a public or nonpublic school on a tuition-paying basis.(b) Nonpublic school grant amount.--For students who attend or will attend a nonpublic school, the grant amount for each student shall not exceed the amount of the per pupil State subsidy for basic education of the school district of residence.(c) Average daily membership.--(1) A student who receives a tuition grant under this section shall be included in the average daily membership for purposes of determining the school district of residence's basic education funding.(2) A student who receives a grant under this section to attend a public school outside the school district awarding the tuition grant shall not be included in the average daily membership of the school district the student attends.(d) Guidelines.--(1) The board of school directors of a school district shall prepare guidelines on all the following:(i) Establishment of an application form and approval process.(ii) Standards for verification of the accuracy of application information.(iii) Confirmation of attendance by a student who receives a tuition grant.(iv) Restrictive endorsement of grant checks by 20250HB1667PN3745 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parents to the school chosen by the parents.(v) Pro rata refunds of grants for students who withdraw during the school year.(vi) Repayment of refunded grants to the school district.(vii) Reasonable deadline dates for submission of grant applications.(2) The board of school directors of a school shall announce the award of grants no later than August 1 of the school year in which the grants will be utilized.(3) Upon receipt of written confirmation of enrollment from the student's school of choice, grants shall be paid to the parents of a student by a check that may only be endorsed to the selected school.(4) In the event a student is no longer enrolled prior to the completion of the school term, the school shall send written notice to the school district.(e) Nontaxable.--Grants awarded to students under this section shall not:(1) Be considered taxable income for purposes of a local taxing ordinance or for purposes of Article III.(2) Constitute financial assistance or appropriations to the school attended by the student.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to empower the Commonwealth or a school district or any of their agencies or officers to do any of the following:(1) Prescribe the course content or admissions criteria for any religiously affiliated school.(2) Compel any private school to accept or enroll a student.20250HB1667PN3745 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Impose any additional requirements on any private school that are not otherwise authorized.(4) Require any school to accept or retain a student if the school does not offer programs or is not structured or equipped with the necessary facilities to meet the special needs of the student or does not offer a particular program requested.Section 1713-F. Original jurisdiction.The Pennsylvania Supreme Court shall have exclusive and original jurisdiction to hear a challenge or to render a declaratory judgment concerning the constitutionality of this article. The Pennsylvania Supreme Court may take such action as the court deems appropriate, consistent with the Pennsylvania Supreme Court's retaining jurisdiction over such a matter, to find facts or to expedite a final judgment in connection with a challenge or request for declaratory relief.Section 3.1. Section 1828-G(c) of the act is amended to read:Section 1828-G. Business firms.* * *(c) Limitation.--The department may not approve more than [$30,000,000] $60,000,000 in credit-eligible capital contributions under this part.Section 3.2. Section 1829-G(a)(3) and (b)(3) of the act are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1829-G. Tax credit certificates.(a) Application.--* * *(3) [The] With respect to program one tax credit 20250HB1667PN3745 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority, the application shall be filed no later than February 1 for credit-eligible capital contributions made in the preceding calendar year.(4) With respect to program two tax credit authority, the application shall be filed no later than February 1 for credit-eligible capital contributions made in the preceding calendar year.(b) Review, recommendation and approval.--* * *(3) In awarding tax credit certificates under this part, the department:(i) Beginning with fiscal year 2020-2021, may not award tax credit certificates that would result in the utilization of more than [$6,000,000] $12,000,000 in tax credits in any fiscal year, except for tax credits carried forward.(ii) May not award more than [$30,000,000] $60,000,000 in tax credit certificates, in the aggregate, under this part.Section 3.3. Article XXIX-D of the act is repealed:[ARTICLE XXIX-DCOMPUTER DATA CENTEREQUIPMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAMSUBARTICLE APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 2901-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Blockchain." A distributed ledger technology in which the 20250HB1667PN3745 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 data is:(1) shared across a network that creates a digital ledger of verified transactions or information among network participants; and(2) typically linked using cryptography to maintain the integrity of the digital ledger and execute other functions, including the transfer of ownership or value."Computer data center." All or part of a facility that may be composed of one or more businesses, owners or tenants, that is or will be predominantly used to house working servers or similar data storage systems and that may have uninterruptible energy supply or generator backup power, or both, cooling systems, towers and other temperature control infrastructure."Computer data center equipment." Equipment that is used to outfit, operate or benefit a computer data center and component parts, installations, refreshments, replacements and upgrades to the equipment, whether any of the equipment is affixed to or incorporated into real property, including:(1) All equipment necessary for the transformation, generation, distribution or management of electricity that is required to operate computer servers or similar data storage equipment, including generators, uninterruptible energy supplies, conduit, gaseous fuel piping, cabling, duct banks, switches, switchboards, batteries and testing equipment.(2) All equipment necessary to cool and maintain a controlled environment for the operation of the computer servers or data storage systems and other components of the computer data center, including mechanical equipment, refrigerant piping, gaseous fuel piping, adiabatic and free cooling systems, cooling towers, water softeners, air 20250HB1667PN3745 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 handling units, indoor direct exchange units, fans, ducting and filters.(3) All water conservation systems, including facilities or mechanisms that are designed to collect, conserve and reuse water.(4) All software, including, but not limited to, enabling software and licensing agreements, computer servers or similar data storage equipment, chassis, networking equipment, switches, racks, cabling, trays and conduits.(5) All monitoring equipment and security systems.(6) Modular data centers and preassembled components of any item described in this definition, including components used in the manufacturing of modular data centers.(7) Other tangible personal property that is essential to the operations of a computer data center."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Facility." One or more parcels of land in this Commonwealth and any structures and personal property contained on the land."New investment." Construction, expansion or build out of data center space at either a new or an existing computer data center on or after January 1, 2014, and the purchase and installation of computer data center equipment, except for items described under paragraph (4) of the definition of "computer data center equipment.""Owner or operator." Includes a single entity, multiple entities or affiliated entities."Proof of work crypto-asset mining." The process of performing computations to add a valid block of data to a blockchain, excluding computations required to validate individual transactions, typically in exchange for a reward or 20250HB1667PN3745 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fee."Qualification period." Except as provided under sections 2931-D(d), 2935-D(b) and 2937-D(c), as follows:(1) With respect to the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article, a period of time beginning on the date of certification of the computer data center and expiring at the end of the fifteenth full calendar year following the calendar year in which the owner or operator filed an application for certification.(2) With respect to a qualified tenant of the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article, a period of time beginning on the date that the qualified tenant enters into an agreement concerning the use or occupancy of the computer data center and expiring at the earlier of the expiration of the term of the agreement or the end of the 10th full calendar year following the calendar year in which the qualified tenant enters into the agreement."Qualified tenant." An entity that contracts with the owner or operator of a computer data center that is certified pursuant to this article to use or occupy part of the computer data center for at least 100 kilowatts per month for two or more years."Tax exemption." The tax exemption provided under Subarticle C."Tax refund." The tax refund provided for under Subarticle B."Telecommunications provider." A provider of telecommunications services as defined in 61 Pa. Code § 60.20 (relating to telecommunications service)."Tenant." An entity that contracts with the owner or 20250HB1667PN3745 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operator of a computer data center to use or occupy part of the computer data center.SUBARTICLE BSALES AND USE TAX REFUND PROGRAMSection 2911-D. Sales and use tax refund.(a) Application.--Beginning July 1, 2017, an owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center certified under this article may apply for a tax refund of taxes paid under Article II upon the sale at retail or use of computer data center equipment for installation in a computer data center, purchased by:(1) An owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article.(2) A qualified tenant certified under this article.(b) Applicability.--Taxes paid under Article II during the qualification period shall be eligible for a refund under this article.(c) Exclusions.--The following do not qualify for a tax refund:(1) Computer data center equipment used by the computer data center to:(i) generate electricity for resale purposes to a power utility, except for sales incidental to the primary sale to computer data centers and which qualify under subparagraph (ii); or(ii) generate, provide or sell more than 5% of its electricity outside of the computer data center.(2) (Reserved).Section 2912-D. Application for certification.To be considered for a certification, an owner or operator of 20250HB1667PN3745 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a computer data center shall submit to the department an application on a form prescribed by the department that includes the following:(1) The owner's or operator's name, address and telephone number.(2) The address of the site where the facility is or will be located, including, if applicable, information sufficient to identify the specific portion or portions of the facility comprising the computer data center.(3) If the computer data center is to qualify under section 2915-D(1), the following information:(i) The anticipated investment associated with the computer data center for which the certification is being sought.(ii) An affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center is expected to satisfy the certification requirements prescribed in section 2915-D(1).(4) If the computer data center is to qualify under section 2915-D(2), an affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center has satisfied, or will satisfy, the certification requirements prescribed in section 2915-D(2).(5) The department shall begin accepting applications no later than 90 days after the effective date of this section.Section 2913-D. Review of application.(a) General rule.--Within 60 days after receiving a complete and correct application, the department shall review the application and either issue a written certification that the 20250HB1667PN3745 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 computer data center qualifies for the certification or provide written reasons for its denial.(b) Deemed approval.--Failure of the department to approve or deny an application within 60 days after the date the owner or operator of a computer data center submits the application to the department constitutes certification of the computer data center, and the department shall issue written certification to the owner or operator within 14 days. The department may not certify any computer data center after December 31, 2021.Section 2914-D. Separation of facilities.(a) Separate certification.--An owner or operator of a computer data center may separate a facility into one or more computer data centers, which may each receive a separate certification, if each computer data center individually meets the requirements prescribed in section 2915-D.(b) Limitation.--A portion of a facility or an article of computer data equipment shall not be deemed to be a part of more than one computer data center.(c) Aggregation.--An owner or operator may aggregate one or more parcels, buildings or condominiums in a facility into a single computer data center if, in the aggregate, the parcels, buildings and condominiums meet the requirements of this article.Section 2915-D. Eligibility requirements.A computer data center must meet one of the following requirements, after taking into account the combined investments made and annual compensation paid by the owner or operator of the computer data center or the qualified tenant:(1) On or before the fourth anniversary of certification, the computer data center creates a minimum 20250HB1667PN3745 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investment of:(i) At least $25,000,000 of new investment if the computer data center is located in a county with a population of 250,000 or fewer individuals; or(ii) At least $50,000,000 of new investment if the computer data center is located in a county with a population of more than 250,000 individuals.(2) One or more taxpayers operating or occupying a computer data center, in the aggregate, pay annual compensation of at least $1,000,000 to employees at the certified computer data center site for each year of the certification after the fourth anniversary of certification.Section 2916-D. Notification.(a) Requirements satisfied.--On or before the fourth anniversary of the certification of a computer data center, the owner or operator of a computer data center shall notify the department in writing whether the computer data center for which the certification is requested has satisfied the requirements prescribed in section 2915-D.(b) Records.--Until a computer data center satisfies the requirements prescribed in section 2915-D, the owner, operator and qualified tenants shall maintain detailed records of all investments created by the computer data center, including costs of buildings and computer data center equipment, and all tax refunds directly received by the owner, operator or qualified tenant.Section 2917-D. Revocation of certification.(a) Revocation.--If the department determines that the requirements of section 2915-D have not been satisfied, the department may revoke the certification of a computer data 20250HB1667PN3745 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 center.(b) Appeal.--The owner or operator of the computer data center may appeal the revocation. Appeals filed under this section shall be governed by Article II.(c) Recapture.--If certification is revoked pursuant to this section, the qualification period of any owner, operator or qualified tenant of the computer data center expires, and the department may recapture from the owner, operator or qualified tenant all or part of the tax refund provided directly to the owner or operator or qualified tenant. The department may give special consideration or allow a temporary exemption from recapture of the tax refund if there is extraordinary hardship due to factors beyond the control of the owner or operator or qualified tenant.Section 2918-D. Guidelines.The department shall publish guidelines and prescribe forms and procedures as necessary for the purposes of this article.Section 2919-D. Confidential information.Proprietary business information contained in the application form described in section 2912-D and the written notice described in section 2916-D, as well as information concerning the identity of a qualified tenant, are confidential and may not be disclosed to the public. The department may disclose the name of a computer data center that has been certified under this article.Section 2920-D. List of tenants.An owner or operator of a computer data center shall provide, to the extent permissible under Federal law, the department with a list of qualified tenants, including the commencement and expiration dates of each qualified tenant's agreement to use or 20250HB1667PN3745 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occupy part of the computer data center. The list shall be provided to the department annually, upon request by the department.Section 2921-D. Sale or transfer.Except as provided in section 2917-D, a computer data center retains its certification regardless of a transfer, sale or other disposition, directly or indirectly, of the computer data center.Section 2922-D. Application.(a) General rule.--An owner, operator or qualified tenant may apply for a tax refund under this article on or before July 30, 2017, and each July 30 thereafter.(b) Notification.--No later than September 30, 2017, and each September 30 thereafter, the department shall notify each applicant of the amount of tax refund approved by the department.Section 2923-D. Limitations.(a) Total.--The total amount of State tax refunds approved by the department under this article shall not exceed $7,000,000 in any fiscal year.(b) Allocation.--If the total amount of tax refunds approved for all applicants exceeds the limitation on the amount of tax refunds in subsection (a) in a fiscal year, the tax refund to be received by each applicant shall be determined as follows:(1) Divide:(i) the tax refund approved for the applicant; by(ii) the total of all tax refunds approved for all applicants.(2) Multiply:(i) the amount under subsection (a); by20250HB1667PN3745 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) the quotient under paragraph (1).(3) The algebraic form of the calculation under this subsection is:Taxpayer's tax refund = amount allocated for those tax refunds X (tax refund approved for the applicant/total of all tax refunds approved for all applicants).Section 2924-D. Applicability.Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the department may not issue a tax refund under this subarticle for the tax imposed upon the sale at retail or use of computer data center equipment purchased after December 31, 2021.SUBARTICLE CSALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION PROGRAMSection 2931-D. Sales and use tax exemption.(a) Sales and use tax.--Beginning January 1, 2022, the tax imposed under Article II shall not be imposed upon the sale at retail or use of computer data center equipment purchased for installation in a certified computer data center, if purchased by any of the following:(1) An owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this subarticle.(2) A qualified tenant of a computer data center certified under this subarticle.(b) Applicability.--A tax exemption approved under this subarticle shall apply during the qualification period as provided under section 2942-D.(c) Exclusions.--The following shall not qualify for a tax exemption:(1) A telecommunications provider's computer data center 20250HB1667PN3745 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that does not have retail or wholesale customers being billed or paying for services and does provide a majority of services for internal use or use by the telecommunications provider's subsidiaries.(2) Computer data center equipment used by the certified computer data center for any of the following purposes:(i) Generating electricity for resale purposes to a power utility.(ii) Generating, providing or selling more than 5% of its electricity outside of the certified computer data center.(iii) Proof of work crypto-asset mining.(3) Laptop computers, handheld devices and motor vehicles for use both inside and outside the computer data center.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "qualification period" shall mean the following:(1) With respect to the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article, a period of time beginning on the date of certification of the computer data center and expiring at the end of the 25th full calendar year following the calendar year in which the owner or operator filed an application for certification.(2) With respect to a qualified tenant of the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article, a period of time beginning on the date that the qualified tenant enters into an agreement concerning the use or occupancy of the computer data center and expiring at the earlier of the expiration of the term of the agreement or the end of the 10th full calendar year following the calendar 20250HB1667PN3745 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year in which the qualified tenant enters into the agreement.Section 2932-D. Application for certification.(a) Application.--To be considered for a certification, an owner or operator of a computer data center shall submit to the department an application on a form prescribed by the department that includes all of the following:(1) The owner's or operator's name, address and telephone number.(2) The address of the site where the computer data center is or will be located, including, if applicable, information sufficient to identify the specific portion of a facility comprising the computer data center.(3) An affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center is expected to satisfy the certification requirements prescribed under section 2935-D.(b) Acceptance.--The department shall begin accepting applications no later than 60 days after the effective date of this section.(c) Compliance in reporting.--An owner or operator or qualified tenant eligible for a certification shall comply with all reporting, filing and compliance requirements under this act.(d) Compliance in tax laws.--No owner or operator or qualified tenant may receive a certification under this subarticle unless that owner or operator or qualified tenant is in full compliance with all State tax laws.Section 2933-D. Review of application.(a) General rule.--Within 60 days after receiving a complete and correct application, the department shall review the 20250HB1667PN3745 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application and either issue a written certification that the computer data center qualifies for the certification or provide written reasons for its denial.(b) Deemed approval.--Failure of the department to approve or deny an application that has been acknowledged as received by the department within 60 days after the date the owner or operator of a computer data center submits the application to the department shall constitute certification of the computer data center, and the department shall issue written certification to the owner or operator within 14 days.Section 2934-D. Separation of facilities.(a) Separate certification.--An owner or operator of a computer data center may separate a facility into one or more computer data centers, which may each receive a separate certification, if each computer data center individually meets the requirements prescribed in section 2935-D.(b) Limitation.--A portion of a facility or an article of computer data equipment shall not be deemed to be a part of more than one computer data center for certification under this subarticle.(c) Aggregation.--An owner or operator may aggregate one or more parcels, buildings or condominiums in a facility into a single computer data center for certification under this subarticle if, in the aggregate, the parcels, buildings and condominiums meet the requirements prescribed in section 2935-D.Section 2935-D. Eligibility requirements.(a) General rule.--In order to be certified under this subarticle, an owner or operator of a computer data center must meet all of the following requirements:(1) On or before the fourth anniversary of 20250HB1667PN3745 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certification, the combined investment, in the aggregate, of the owner or operator or qualified tenant of the computer data center must total a minimum of any of the following:(i) At least $75,000,000 of new investment if the computer data center is located in a county with a population of 250,000 or fewer individuals and creates 25 new jobs.(ii) At least $100,000,000 of new investment if the computer data center is located in a county with a population of more than 250,000 individuals and creates 45 new jobs.(2) On or before the fourth anniversary of certification, the owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center, in the aggregate, must pay annual compensation of at least $1,000,000 to employees at the certified computer data center site for each year of the certification after the fourth anniversary of certification.(b) Prior applications.--A computer data center that has met the eligibility requirements as prescribed under section 2915-D and has, prior to July 1, 2021, been certified under section 2913-D shall be deemed to meet the certification requirements of this section. The certification shall not be revoked, except as provided under section 2917-D, and shall remain in effect for the remainder of the qualification period, as defined in section 2931-D(d).(c) Limitation.--The department may not certify any computer data center under this subarticle after December 31, 2032.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "new investment" means construction, expansion or build out of data center space at either a new or an existing computer data center 20250HB1667PN3745 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on or after January 1, 2022, and the purchase and installation of computer data center equipment, except for items described under paragraph (4) of the definition of "computer data center equipment" in section 2901-D.Section 2936-D. Notification and records.(a) Requirements satisfied.--On or before the fourth anniversary of the certification of a computer data center, the owner or operator of the computer data center shall notify the department in writing whether the computer data center for which the certification is requested has satisfied the requirements prescribed under section 2935-D.(b) Records.--The owner or operator or qualified tenant shall:(1) Maintain detailed records of all investments created by the computer data center, including costs of buildings and computer data center equipment and all tax exemptions received by the owner or operator or qualified tenant.(2) Maintain purchase journals for examination by the department.Section 2937-D. Revocation of certification.(a) Revocation.--If the department determines that the requirements of section 2935-D have not been satisfied, the department may revoke the certification of a computer data center.(b) Appeal.--The owner or operator of the computer data center may appeal the revocation. Appeals filed under this section shall be governed by Article II.(c) Recapture.--If certification is revoked under this section, the qualification period, as defined in section 2931-D(d), of any owner or operator or qualified tenant of the 20250HB1667PN3745 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 computer data center shall expire and the department may recapture from the owner or operator or qualified tenant all or part of the tax exemption received by the owner or operator or qualified tenant under section 2942-D. The department may give special consideration or allow a temporary exemption from recapture of the tax exemption if there is extraordinary hardship due to factors beyond the control of the owner or operator or qualified tenant. The department may require the owner or operator or qualified tenant to file appropriate amended tax returns in order to reflect any recapture of the tax exemption.(d) Limitation on assessment.--Notwithstanding the limitation on assessment and collection in section 258, the department shall assess any tax determined not to be properly exempted under this subarticle within five years from the date an owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center purchases property exempt from a tax. A taxpayer may consent to an extension of the period as set forth in section 261.Section 2938-D. Guidelines.The department shall publish guidelines and prescribe forms and procedures as necessary for the purposes of this article.Section 2939-D. Confidential information.Proprietary business information contained in the application form described under section 2932-D and the written notice described under section 2936-D, as well as information concerning the identity of a qualified tenant, shall be confidential and may not be disclosed to the public. The department may disclose the name of a computer data center that has been certified under this subarticle.20250HB1667PN3745 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2940-D. List of tenants.An owner or operator of a certified computer data center shall provide, to the extent permissible under Federal law, the department with a list of qualified tenants, including the commencement and expiration dates of each qualified tenant's agreement to use or occupy part of the certified computer data center. The list shall be provided to the department annually, upon request by the department.Section 2941-D. Sale or transfer.Except as provided under section 2937-D, a computer data center retains its certification regardless of a transfer, sale or other disposition, directly or indirectly, of the computer data center.Section 2942-D. Certificate of exemption.(a) General rule.--A qualified owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center certified under this subarticle may submit for a sales and use tax certificate of exemption in a manner prescribed by the department on or before October 1, 2021, and renew each October 1 thereafter. The following shall apply:(1) The owner or operator or qualified tenant of a certified computer data center eligible for a sales and use tax certificate of exemption shall comply with all reporting, filing and compliance requirements under this act.(2) No owner or operator or qualified tenant may receive a sales and use tax certificate of exemption under this subarticle unless that owner or operator or qualified tenant is in full compliance with all State tax laws.(b) Notification.--No later than 60 days after the submission under subsection (a) for a sales and use tax 20250HB1667PN3745 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certificate of exemption, the department shall issue a sales and use tax certificate of exemption to each applicant approved by the department.(c) Exempt purchases.--The owner or operator or qualified tenant of a certified computer data center shall prepare and deliver a properly executed sales and use tax certificate of exemption to a vendor from which the owner or operator or qualified tenant purchases exempt computer data center equipment.]Section 3.4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3003.26. Data Centers.--(a) Unless certified under Article XXIX-D prior to February 3, 2026, a computer data center shall not be eligible for tax benefits under Article XVIII-C or XIX-B or the act of October 6, 1998 (P.L.705, No.92), known as the Keystone Opportunity Zone, Keystone Opportunity Expansion Zone and Keystone Opportunity Improvement Zone Act.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Computer data center." All or part of a facility that may be composed of one or more businesses, owners or tenants, that is or will be predominantly used to house working servers or similar data storage systems and that may have uninterruptible energy supply or generator backup power, or both, cooling systems, towers and other temperature control infrastructure.Section 4. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 1101(a.2) of the act.(2) Section 6 of the act of November 29, 2004 (P.L.1376, 20250HB1667PN3745 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.178), known as the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act, is repealed.(3) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (4) is necessary to effectuate the addition of Article XVII-F of the act.(4) Article XX-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is repealed.Section 5. The addition of section 1101(a.2) of the act is a continuation of section 6 of the act of November 29, 2004 (P.L.1376, No.178), known as the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act. Except as provided in section 1101(a.2) of the act, all activities initiated under section 6 of the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under section 1101(a.2) of the act. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under section 6 of the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act and which are in effect on the effective date of section 4 of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under section 1101(a.2) of the act. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under section 6 of the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of section 6 of the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act.Section 5.1. The addition of Article XVII-F of the act is a continuation of Article XX-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949. Except as otherwise provided in Article XVII-F of the act, all activities initiated under Article XX-B of the Public School Code of 1949 shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under Article XVII-F of the act. Orders, 20250HB1667PN3745 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulations, rules and decisions which were made under Article XX-B of the Public School Code of 1949 and which are in effect on the effective date of section 4 of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under Article XVII-F of the act. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under Article XX-B of the Public School Code of 1949 are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of Article XX-B of the Public School Code of 1949.Section 6. The following shall apply:(1) The amendment of sections 1101(b) and 1101.2 of the act and paragraph (2) are intended to eliminate the tax imposed upon each dollar of the gross receipts received from the sales of electric energy for fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2026.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2026, a tax shall not be imposed under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2810 upon each dollar of the gross receipts received from the sales of electric energy. The elimination of the taxes imposed under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2810 upon each dollar of the gross receipts received from the sales of electric energy shall derive to the benefit of the consumer purchasing services from the entities. The benefit shall be provided in the form of the elimination of or a reduction in the State tax surcharge. Failure to pass through the elimination or reduction to the consumer shall subject the entity to a civil penalty of at least $1,000, but not more than $5,000, and additional relief as the court may deem appropriate.(3) The amendment of section 1101(b) and 1101.2 of the act and paragraph (2) shall apply retroactively to July 1, 20250HB1667PN3745 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2026.Section 7. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of section 1101(a.2) and Article XVII-F of the act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.(2) Sections 4, 5 and 5.1 of this act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.AMENDING THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), ENTITLED "AN ACT RELATING TO TAX REFORM AND STATE TAXATION BY CODIFYING AND ENUMERATING CERTAIN SUBJECTS OF TAXATION AND IMPOSING TAXES THEREON; PROVIDING PROCEDURES FOR THE PAYMENT, COLLECTION, ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT THEREOF; PROVIDING FOR TAX CREDITS IN CERTAIN CASES; CONFERRING POWERS AND IMPOSING DUTIES UPON THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, CERTAIN EMPLOYERS, FIDUCIARIES, INDIVIDUALS, PERSONS, CORPORATIONS AND OTHER ENTITIES; PRESCRIBING CRIMES, OFFENSES AND PENALTIES," IN SALES AND USE TAX, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR EXCLUSIONS FROM TAX; IN CORPORATE NET INCOME TAX, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR DEFINITIONS, FOR DETERMINATION OF NET LOSS DEDUCTION, FOR IMPOSITION OF TAX, FOR REPORTS AND PAYMENT OF TAX, FOR TIMELY MAILING TREATED AS TIMELY FILING AND PAYMENT AND FOR ADDITIONAL WITHHOLDING REQUIREMENTS, REPEALING PROVISIONS RELATING TO CONSOLIDATED REPORTS, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR EXTENSION OF TIME TO FILE REPORTS, FOR CHANGES MADE BY FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, FOR LIMITATIONS ON ASSESSMENTS, FOR DEFINITIONS, FOR MANUFACTURING INNOVATION AND REINVESTMENT DEDUCTION, FOR ENFORCEMENT, RULES AND REGULATIONS AND INQUISITORIAL POWERS OF THE DEPARTMENT, FOR RETENTION OF RECORDS AND FOR PENALTIES; IN GROSS RECEIPTS TAX, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR IMPOSITION OF TAX AND PROVIDING FOR DEFINITIONS; IN TAX CREDIT AND TAX BENEFIT ADMINISTRATION, PROVIDING FOR APPLICATION OF TAX CREDITS OR TAX BENEFITS TO A UNITARY BUSINESS; PROVIDING FOR EDUCATION TAX CREDITS AND FOR EDUCATION OPTIONS TAX CREDITS; IN MANUFACTURING AND INVESTMENT TAX CREDIT, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR BUSINESS FIRMS AND FOR TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES; PROVIDING FOR RETURN ON EQUITY AND FOR SERVICE AND FACILITIES; REPEALING PROVISIONS RELATING TO COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAM; PROVIDING FOR ADDITIONAL PROPERTY TAX REBATE; IN GENERAL PROVISIONS, PROVIDING FOR DATA CENTERS; AND, IN GENERAL PROVISIONS, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR ESTIMATED TAX, FOR UNDERPAYMENT OF ESTIMATED TAX AND FOR RESTATEMENT OF TAX LIABILITY UNDER TREATIES AND PROVIDING FOR DATA CENTERS.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:20250HB1667PN3745 - 79 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748 SECTION 1. SECTION 204(58) OF THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CLAUSE TO READ:SECTION 204. EXCLUSIONS FROM TAX.--THE TAX IMPOSED BY SECTION 202 SHALL NOT BE IMPOSED UPON ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:* * *(58) THE SALE AT RETAIL OR USE OF A PERSONAL COMPUTER, A TABLET, A PERSONAL DIGITAL ASSISTANT, A PERIPHERAL DEVICE OR AN INTERNET ACCESS DEVICE, OR A SERVICE CONTRACT OR SINGLE-USER LICENSED SOFTWARE PURCHASED IN CONJUNCTION WITH A PERSONAL COMPUTER, TABLET, PERSONAL DIGITAL ASSISTANT, PERIPHERAL DEVICE OR INTERNET ACCESS DEVICE, WITH A SALES PRICE OF NOT MORE THAN ONE THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS ($1,500), DURING THE EXCLUSION PERIOD BY AN INDIVIDUAL PURCHASER FOR NONBUSINESS USE. THE EXCLUSION DOES NOT INCLUDE A SALE AT RETAIL OR USE OF, LEASING, RENTAL OR REPAIR OF A PERSONAL COMPUTER, TABLET, PERSONAL DIGITAL ASSISTANT, PERIPHERAL DEVICE OR INTERNET ACCESS DEVICE; MAINFRAME COMPUTERS; NETWORK SERVERS; LOCAL AREA NETWORK HUBS; ROUTERS AND NETWORK CABLING; NETWORK OPERATING SYSTEMS; MULTIPLE-USER LICENSED SOFTWARE; MINICOMPUTERS; [HAND-HELD COMPUTERS; PERSONAL DIGITAL ASSISTANTS WITHOUT INTERNET ACCESS;] HARDWARE WORD PROCESSORS; GRAPHICAL CALCULATORS; VIDEO GAME CONSOLES; TELEPHONES; DIGITAL CAMERAS; PAGERS; COMPACT DISCS ENCODED WITH MUSIC OR MOVIES; AND DIGITAL VERSATILE DISCS ENCODED WITH MUSIC OR MOVIES. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS CLAUSE, THE PHRASE "EXCLUSION PERIOD" MEANS THE PERIOD OF TIME FROM [AUGUST 5, 2001, TO AND INCLUDING AUGUST 12, 2001, AND FROM FEBRUARY 17, 2002, TO AND INCLUDING FEBRUARY 24, 2002.] THE FIRST SATURDAY IN AUGUST TO AND INCLUDING THE THIRD SATURDAY IN AUGUST. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS CLAUSE, "PURCHASER" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO 20250HB1667PN3745 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PLACES AN ORDER AND PAYS THE PURCHASE PRICE BY CASH OR CREDIT DURING THE EXCLUSION PERIOD EVEN IF DELIVERY TAKES PLACE AFTER THE EXCLUSION PERIOD.* * *(77) THE SALE AT RETAIL OR USE OF SCHOOL SUPPLIES DURING THE EXCLUSION PERIOD FOR NONBUSINESS PURPOSES. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS CLAUSE:(I) THE FOLLOWING TERMS OR PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING MEANINGS:"ART SUPPLIES" SHALL MEAN CLAY AND GLAZES, PAINTS, PAINTBRUSHES, SKETCH AND DRAWING PADS AND WATERCOLORS."EXCLUSION PERIOD" SHALL MEAN THE FIRST SATURDAY IN AUGUST TO AND INCLUDING THE THIRD SATURDAY IN AUGUST."INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS" SHALL MEAN REFERENCE BOOKS, REFERENCE MAPS AND GLOBES, TEXTBOOKS AND WORKBOOKS."SCHOOL SUPPLIES" SHALL MEAN ITEMS SUCH AS BOOK BAGS, PENS, PENCILS, PENCIL SHARPENERS, MARKERS, HIGHLIGHTERS, ERASERS, CRAYONS, BLACKBOARD CHALK, NOTEBOOKS, BINDERS, FOLDERS, PAPER, INDEX CARDS, GLUE, TAPE, RULERS, SCISSORS, STAPLERS, STAPLES, PAPER CLIPS, PRINTER INK, CALCULATORS, COMPASSES, PROTRACTORS, LUNCH BOXES, SCHOOL SUPPLY BOXES, PERSONAL ORGANIZERS, ART SUPPLIES, CLIPBOARDS, DRY ERASE MARKERS, STICKY NOTES, BULLETIN BOARD PAPER, EDUCATIONAL POSTERS AND GAMES AND INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS WITH A SALES PRICE OF FIFTY DOLLARS ($50) OR LESS PER ITEM.(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY DEVELOP WRITTEN GUIDELINES TO INCLUDE OTHER SIMILAR ITEMS IN THE DEFINITIONS OF "ART SUPPLIES," "INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS" AND "SCHOOL SUPPLIES" UNDER THIS CLAUSE.SECTION 2. SECTION 401(3)1(A) AND (B), (3)2(A)(17)(E) AND 20250HB1667PN3745 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED, (3)1 AND 4 ARE AMENDED BY ADDING A PHRASES, (3)1(T) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH, (3)2(A)(1) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBPARAGRAPH, (3)2(A)(9)(A) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A UNIT AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING CLAUSES TO READ:SECTION 401. DEFINITIONS.--THE FOLLOWING WORDS, TERMS, AND PHRASES, WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE, SHALL HAVE THE MEANING ASCRIBED TO THEM IN THIS SECTION, EXCEPT WHERE THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES A DIFFERENT MEANING:* * *(3) "TAXABLE INCOME." 1. (A) IN CASE THE ENTIRE BUSINESS OF THE CORPORATION IS TRANSACTED WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR WHICH BEGINS ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 1971, TAXABLE INCOME FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR OR FISCAL YEAR AS RETURNED TO AND ASCERTAINED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT BEFORE SPECIAL DEDUCTIONS PROVIDED FOR IN 26 U.S.C. CH. 1 SUBCH. B PT. VIII (RELATING TO SPECIAL DEDUCTIONS FOR CORPORATIONS), NOT INCLUDING THE DEDUCTIONS PROVIDED FOR IN 26 U.S.C. § 243 (RELATING TO DIVIDENDS RECEIVED BY CORPORATIONS), OR IN THE CASE OF A CORPORATION PARTICIPATING IN THE FILING OF CONSOLIDATED RETURNS TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR THAT IS NOT REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN WITH THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE TAXABLE INCOME WHICH WOULD HAVE BEEN RETURNED TO AND ASCERTAINED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT BEFORE SPECIAL DEDUCTIONS PROVIDED FOR IN 26 U.S.C. CH. 1 SUBCH. B PT. VIII, NOT INCLUDING THE DEDUCTIONS PROVIDED FOR IN 26 U.S.C. § 243, IF SEPARATE RETURNS HAD BEEN MADE TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE CURRENT AND PRIOR TAXABLE YEARS, SUBJECT, HOWEVER, TO ANY CORRECTION THEREOF, FOR FRAUD, EVASION, OR ERROR AS FINALLY ASCERTAINED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.(B) ADDITIONAL DEDUCTIONS SHALL BE ALLOWED FROM TAXABLE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INCOME ON ACCOUNT OF ANY DIVIDENDS RECEIVED FROM ANY OTHER CORPORATION BUT ONLY TO THE EXTENT THAT SUCH DIVIDENDS ARE INCLUDED IN TAXABLE INCOME AS RETURNED TO AND ASCERTAINED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT. FOR TAX YEARS BEGINNING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 1991, ADDITIONAL DEDUCTIONS SHALL ONLY BE ALLOWED FOR AMOUNTS INCLUDED, UNDER [SECTION 78 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986 (PUBLIC LAW 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 78)] 26 U.S.C. § 78 (RELATING TO GROSS UP FOR DEEMED PAID FOREIGN TAX CREDIT), IN TAXABLE INCOME RETURNED TO AND ASCERTAINED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT AND FOR THE AMOUNT OF ANY DIVIDENDS RECEIVED FROM A FOREIGN CORPORATION INCLUDED IN TAXABLE INCOME TO THE EXTENT SUCH DIVIDENDS WOULD BE DEDUCTIBLE IN ARRIVING AT FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME IF RECEIVED FROM A DOMESTIC CORPORATION. FOR TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE ADDITIONAL DEDUCTION WITH RESPECT TO DIVIDENDS SHALL NOT BE ALLOWED FOR DIVIDENDS BETWEEN MEMBERS OF A UNITARY BUSINESS.* * *(P.1) FOR TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, IN THE CASE OF A CORPORATION THAT IS A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS, THE TERM "TAXABLE INCOME" SHALL MEAN THE COMBINED UNITARY INCOME OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS, AS DETERMINED ON A WATER'S-EDGE BASIS, PLUS THE CORPORATION'S NONBUSINESS INCOME.* * *(T) * * *(5) THE ADJUSTMENT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL NOT APPLY TO A TRANSACTION BETWEEN THE TAXPAYER AND AN AFFILIATED ENTITY IF THE TAXPAYER AND THE AFFILIATED ENTITY FILE AS PART OF THE SAME COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT IN THIS STATE.* * *2. IN CASE THE ENTIRE BUSINESS OF ANY CORPORATION, OTHER 20250HB1667PN3745 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THAN A CORPORATION ENGAGED IN DOING BUSINESS AS A REGULATED INVESTMENT COMPANY AS DEFINED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986, IS NOT TRANSACTED WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, THE TAX IMPOSED BY THIS ARTICLE SHALL BE BASED UPON SUCH PORTION OF THE TAXABLE INCOME OF SUCH CORPORATION FOR THE FISCAL OR CALENDAR YEAR, AS DEFINED IN SUBCLAUSE 1 HEREOF, AND MAY BE DETERMINED AS FOLLOWS:(A) DIVISION OF INCOME.(1) AS USED IN THIS DEFINITION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:* * *(E.1) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBPARAGRAPH (E), IN REGARD TO THE SALE, REDEMPTION, MATURITY OR EXCHANGE OF SECURITIES, HELD BY THE TAXPAYER PRIMARILY FOR SALE TO CUSTOMERS IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF ITS TRADE OR BUSINESS, SALES SHALL ONLY INCLUDE THE NET GAINS, EQUAL TO ZERO OR ABOVE, RECEIVED BY THE TAXPAYER.* * *(9) (A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (B):* * *(VI) (A) FOR TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE COMBINED UNITARY INCOME OF A UNITARY BUSINESS, AS DETERMINED ON A WATER'S-EDGE BASIS, SHALL BE APPORTIONED TO THIS STATE BY MULTIPLYING SAID INCOME BY THE MEMBER'S SALES FACTOR, THE NUMERATOR OF WHICH SHALL BE THE MEMBER'S TOTAL SALES IN THIS STATE DURING THE TAX PERIOD, AND THE DENOMINATOR OF WHICH SHALL BE THE COMBINED TOTAL SALES OF ALL MEMBERS OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS EVERYWHERE DURING THE TAX PERIOD. IN COMPUTING THE SALES OF EACH MEMBER FOR PURPOSES OF APPORTIONMENT, THE FOLLOWING SALES ARE EXCLUDED FROM THE NUMERATOR AND DENOMINATOR:(I) SALES FROM TRANSACTIONS BETWEEN OR AMONG MEMBERS OF THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 UNITARY BUSINESS THAT ARE DEFERRED UNDER 26 CFR 1.1502-13 (RELATING TO INTERCOMPANY TRANSACTIONS) FOR FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURPOSES; AND(II) THE SALES OF EACH MEMBER THAT ARE EXCLUDED FROM THE UNITARY BUSINESS PURSUANT TO THE DEFINITION OF WATER'S-EDGE BASIS.(B) THE PENNSYLVANIA SALES OF EACH NONTAXABLE MEMBER SHALL BE DETERMINED BASED UPON THE APPORTIONMENT RULES APPLICABLE TO THE MEMBER AND SHALL BE AGGREGATED. EACH TAXABLE MEMBER OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL INCLUDE IN ITS SALES FACTOR NUMERATOR A PORTION OF THE AGGREGATE PENNSYLVANIA SALES OF NONTAXABLE MEMBERS DURING THE TAX PERIOD BASED ON A RATIO, THE NUMERATOR OF WHICH IS THE TAXABLE MEMBER'S PENNSYLVANIA SALES DURING THE TAX PERIOD AND THE DENOMINATOR OF WHICH IS THE AGGREGATE PENNSYLVANIA SALES OF ALL THE TAXABLE MEMBERS OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS DURING THE TAX PERIOD.(C) NONBUSINESS INCOME OF EACH MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL BE ALLOCATED AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (5) THROUGH (8) OF PHRASE (A) OF SUBCLAUSE 2 OF THIS DEFINITION.(D) A MEMBER OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL BE SUBJECT TO TAX ON ITS APPORTIONED SHARE OF THE COMBINED UNITARY INCOME OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS, AS DETERMINED ON A WATER'S-EDGE BASIS, PLUS ITS NONBUSINESS INCOME OR LOSS ALLOCATED TO THIS STATE, MINUS THE MEMBER'S NET LOSS DEDUCTION, IF APPLICABLE.(E) THE AGGREGATE OF ALL SUCH FINAL SUMS OF EACH MEMBER OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS FROM PHRASE (D) SHALL CONSTITUTE THE PORTION OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS'S INCOME SUBJECT TO THE TAX IMPOSED BY THIS ARTICLE.(F) (1) THE SECRETARY OF REVENUE MAY DISTRIBUTE, APPORTION OR ALLOCATE GROSS INCOME, DEDUCTIONS, CREDITS OR ALLOWANCES 20250HB1667PN3745 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BETWEEN AND AMONG TWO OR MORE CORPORATIONS, PERSONS, ENTITIES, MEMBERS OR UNITARY BUSINESSES, WHETHER OR NOT INCORPORATED, WHETHER OR NOT ORGANIZED IN THE UNITED STATES AND WHETHER OR NOT AFFILIATED, IF:(A) THE CORPORATIONS, PERSONS, ENTITIES, MEMBERS OR UNITARY BUSINESSES ARE OWNED OR CONTROLLED DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY BY THE SAME INTERESTS WITHIN THE MEANING OF 26 U.S.C. § 482 (RELATING TO ALLOCATION OF INCOME AND DEDUCTIONS AMONG TAXPAYERS); AND(B) THE SECRETARY OF REVENUE DETERMINES THAT THE DISTRIBUTION, APPORTIONMENT OR ALLOCATION IS NECESSARY IN ORDER TO REFLECT AN ARM'S LENGTH STANDARD WITHIN THE MEANING OF 26 CFR 1.482-1 (RELATING TO ALLOCATION OF INCOME AND DEDUCTIONS AMONG TAXPAYERS) AND TO REFLECT CLEARLY THE INCOME OF THOSE CORPORATIONS, PERSONS, ENTITIES, MEMBERS OR UNITARY BUSINESSES.(2) THE SECRETARY OF REVENUE SHALL APPLY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AND JUDICIAL INTERPRETATIONS OF 26 U.S.C. § 482 IN ADMINISTERING THIS SECTION.(G) FOR TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, ANY MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS THAT WOULD OTHERWISE APPORTION ITS SHARE OF THE COMBINED UNITARY INCOME OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS, AS DETERMINED ON A WATER'S-EDGE BASIS, UNDER PHRASE (B), (C), (D) OR (E) OF SUBCLAUSE 2 OF THIS DEFINITION SHALL INSTEAD USE A SALES FACTOR AS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION.* * *(17) SALES, OTHER THAN SALES UNDER PARAGRAPHS (16) AND (16.1), ARE IN THIS STATE AS FOLLOWS:* * *(E) [GROSS RECEIPTS] NET GAINS, EQUAL TO ZERO OR ABOVE, FROM THE SALE, REDEMPTION, MATURITY OR EXCHANGE OF SECURITIES, HELD BY THE TAXPAYER PRIMARILY FOR SALE TO CUSTOMERS IN THE ORDINARY 20250HB1667PN3745 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COURSE OF ITS TRADE OR BUSINESS, IF THE CUSTOMERS ARE IN THIS STATE.* * *4. * * *(H) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SUBCLAUSE, ANY MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS THAT HAS UNUSED NET LOSS FROM TAXABLE YEARS THAT BEGAN PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2027, OR THAT GENERATES NET LOSSES WHILE A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS MAY ONLY TAKE THE NET LOSS DEDUCTION FOR TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, TO THE EXTENT OF THE MEMBER'S SHARE OF TAXABLE INCOME AFTER ALLOCATION AND APPORTIONMENT AND THE NET LOSSES MAY NOT BE USED BY OTHER MEMBERS OF THE SAME UNITARY BUSINESS EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY PHRASE (G) OF SUBCLAUSE 2 OF THIS DEFINITION.(I) ANY NET LOSS REALIZED FOR A TAXABLE YEAR UNUSED BY A CORPORATION WHICH SUBSEQUENTLY BECOMES A MEMBER OF ANOTHER UNITARY BUSINESS MAY ONLY BE USED BY THAT CORPORATION EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY PHRASE (G) OF SUBCLAUSE 2 OF THIS DEFINITION.* * *(5) "TAXABLE YEAR." [THE TAXABLE YEAR WHICH THE CORPORATION, OR ANY CONSOLIDATED GROUP WITH WHICH THE CORPORATION PARTICIPATES IN THE FILING OF CONSOLIDATED RETURNS, ACTUALLY USES IN REPORTING TAXABLE INCOME TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT. WITH REGARD TO THE TAX IMPOSED BY ARTICLE IV OF THIS ACT (RELATING TO THE CORPORATE NET INCOME TAX), THE TERMS "ANNUAL YEAR," "FISCAL YEAR," "ANNUAL OR FISCAL YEAR," "TAX YEAR" AND "TAX PERIOD" SHALL BE THE SAME AS THE CORPORATION'S TAXABLE YEAR, AS DEFINED IN THIS PARAGRAPH.]1. EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN SUBCLAUSE 2, THE TAXABLE YEAR 20250HB1667PN3745 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WHICH THE CORPORATION, OR ANY CONSOLIDATED GROUP WITH WHICH THE CORPORATION PARTICIPATES IN THE FILING OF CONSOLIDATED RETURNS, ACTUALLY USES IN REPORTING TAXABLE INCOME TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR WHICH THE CORPORATION WOULD HAVE USED IN REPORTING TAXABLE INCOME TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT HAD IT BEEN REQUIRED TO REPORT ITS TAXABLE INCOME TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT. WITH REGARD TO THE TAX IMPOSED BY ARTICLE IV, THE TERMS "ANNUAL YEAR," "FISCAL YEAR," "ANNUAL OR FISCAL YEAR," "TAX YEAR" AND "TAX PERIOD" SHALL BE THE SAME AS THE CORPORATION'S TAXABLE YEAR, AS DEFINED IN THIS SUBCLAUSE OR SUBCLAUSE 2.2. ALL MEMBERS OF A UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL HAVE A COMMON TAXABLE YEAR FOR PURPOSES OF COMPUTING TAX DUE UNDER THIS ARTICLE. THE TAXABLE YEAR SHALL BE THE COMMON TAXABLE YEAR ADOPTED, IN A MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT, BY ALL MEMBERS OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS. THE COMMON TAXABLE YEAR MUST BE USED BY ALL MEMBERS OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS IN THE YEAR OF ADOPTION AND ALL FUTURE YEARS UNLESS OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.* * *(12) "TAX HAVEN." A JURISDICTION THAT DURING THE TAX YEAR IN QUESTION:1. HAS LAWS OR PRACTICES THAT PREVENT EFFECTIVE EXCHANGE OF INFORMATION FOR TAX PURPOSES WITH OTHER GOVERNMENTS ON TAXPAYERS BENEFITING FROM THE TAX REGIME;2. HAS A TAX REGIME WHICH LACKS TRANSPARENCY;3. FACILITATES THE ESTABLISHMENT OF FOREIGN-OWNED ENTITIES WITHOUT THE NEED FOR A LOCAL SUBSTANTIVE PRESENCE OR PROHIBITS THESE ENTITIES FROM HAVING ANY COMMERCIAL IMPACT ON THE LOCAL ECONOMY;4. EXPLICITLY OR IMPLICITLY EXCLUDES THE JURISDICTION'S 20250HB1667PN3745 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RESIDENT TAXPAYERS FROM TAKING ADVANTAGE OF THE TAX REGIME BENEFITS OR PROHIBITS ENTERPRISES THAT BENEFIT FROM THE REGIME FROM OPERATING IN THE JURISDICTION'S DOMESTIC MARKET; OR5. HAS CREATED A TAX REGIME WHICH IS FAVORABLE FOR TAX AVOIDANCE, BASED UPON AN OVERALL ASSESSMENT OF RELEVANT FACTORS, INCLUDING WHETHER THE JURISDICTION HAS A SIGNIFICANT UNTAXED OFFSHORE FINANCIAL OR SERVICES SECTOR RELATIVE TO ITS OVERALL ECONOMY.(13) "UNITARY BUSINESS." A SINGLE ECONOMIC ENTERPRISE THAT IS MADE UP OF SEPARATE PARTS OF A SINGLE CORPORATION, OF A COMMONLY CONTROLLED GROUP OF CORPORATIONS, OR BOTH, THAT ARE SUFFICIENTLY INTERDEPENDENT, INTEGRATED AND INTERRELATED THROUGH THEIR ACTIVITIES SO AS TO PROVIDE A SYNERGY AND MUTUAL BENEFIT THAT PRODUCES A SHARING OR EXCHANGE OF VALUE AMONG THEM AND A FLOW OF VALUE TO THE SEPARATE PARTS. A UNITARY BUSINESS INCLUDES ALL PARTS AND CORPORATIONS THAT ARE INCLUDED IN A UNITARY BUSINESS UNDER THE CONSTITUTION OF THE UNITED STATES.(14) "WATER'S-EDGE BASIS." A SYSTEM OF REPORTING THAT INCLUDES THE INCOME AND APPORTIONMENT FACTORS OF CERTAIN MEMBERS OF A UNITARY BUSINESS, DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:1. ANY MEMBER INCORPORATED IN THE UNITED STATES OR FORMED UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY STATE OF THE UNITED STATES, THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, ANY TERRITORY OR POSSESSION OF THE UNITED STATES OR THE COMMONWEALTH OF PUERTO RICO.2. ANY MEMBER, REGARDLESS OF THE PLACE INCORPORATED OR FORMED, IF AT LEAST TWENTY PER CENT OF THE MEMBER'S SALES FACTOR IS WITHIN THE UNITED STATES, AND THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(A) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING WHETHER AT LEAST TWENTY PER CENT OF A MEMBER'S SALES FACTOR IS WITHIN THE UNITED STATES, THE CALCULATION MUST BE PERFORMED ON A STAND-ALONE BASIS. SALES 20250HB1667PN3745 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL BE GROSS FIGURES WITHOUT ELIMINATIONS FOR TRANSACTIONS WITH OTHER MEMBERS OF ANY UNITARY BUSINESS.(B) WHETHER SALES ARE WITHIN THE UNITED STATES IS BASED ON THE SALES FACTOR SOURCING RULES CONTAINED IN CLAUSE (3)2.3. ANY MEMBER WHICH IS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:(A) A DOMESTIC INTERNATIONAL SALES CORPORATION AS DESCRIBED IN 26 U.S.C. CH. 1 SUBCH. N PT. IV SUBPT. A (RELATING TO TREATMENT OF QUALIFYING CORPORATIONS).(B) A FOREIGN SALES CORPORATION AS DESCRIBED IN THE FORMER 26 U.S.C. §§ 921, 922, 923, 924, 925, 926 AND 927.(C) AN EXPORT TRADE CORPORATION AS DESCRIBED IN 26 U.S.C. CH. 1 SUBCH. N PT. III SUBPT. G (RELATING TO EXPORT TRADE CORPORATIONS).4. ANY MEMBER NOT DESCRIBED IN SUBCLAUSE 1, 2 OR 3 SHALL INCLUDE THE PORTION OF THE MEMBER'S TAXABLE INCOME DERIVED FROM OR ATTRIBUTABLE TO SOURCES WITHIN THE UNITED STATES, AS DETERMINED UNDER 26 U.S.C. (RELATING TO INTERNAL REVENUE CODE) WITHOUT REGARD TO FEDERAL TREATIES, AND ITS APPORTIONMENT FACTORS RELATED THERETO.5. ANY MEMBER THAT IS A "CONTROLLED FOREIGN CORPORATION" AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 957 (RELATING TO CONTROLLED FOREIGN CORPORATIONS; UNITED STATES PERSONS), TO THE EXTENT THE INCOME OF THAT MEMBER IS INCOME DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 952 (RELATING TO SUBPART F INCOME DEFINED) AS SUBPART F INCOME, NOT EXCLUDING LOWER-TIER SUBSIDIARIES' DISTRIBUTIONS OF SUCH INCOME WHICH WERE PREVIOUSLY TAXED, DETERMINED WITHOUT REGARD TO FEDERAL TREATIES, AND THE APPORTIONMENT FACTORS RELATED TO THAT INCOME; ANY ITEM OF INCOME RECEIVED BY A CONTROLLED FOREIGN CORPORATION AND THE APPORTIONMENT FACTORS RELATED TO SUCH INCOME SHALL BE EXCLUDED IF THE CORPORATION ESTABLISHES TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECRETARY OF REVENUE THAT SUCH INCOME WAS SUBJECT TO AN EFFECTIVE RATE OF INCOME TAX IMPOSED BY A FOREIGN COUNTRY GREATER THAN NINETY PER CENT OF THE MAXIMUM RATE OF TAX SPECIFIED IN 26 U.S.C. § 11 (RELATING TO TAX IMPOSED). THE EFFECTIVE RATE OF INCOME TAX DETERMINATION SHALL BE BASED UPON THE METHODOLOGY UNDER 26 CFR 1.954-1 (RELATING TO FOREIGN BASE COMPANY INCOME).6. ANY MEMBER THAT IS INCORPORATED IN OR IS DOING BUSINESS IN A TAX HAVEN UNLESS IT IS PROVEN TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE SECRETARY THAT SUCH MEMBER IS INCORPORATED IN OR DOING BUSINESS IN A TAX HAVEN FOR A LEGITIMATE BUSINESS PURPOSE.(15) "COMMONLY CONTROLLED GROUP." FOR A CORPORATION, THE CORPORATION IS A MEMBER OF A GROUP OF TWO OR MORE CORPORATIONS AND MORE THAN FIFTY PER CENT OF THE VOTING STOCK OR CONTROLLING INTEREST OF EACH MEMBER OF THE GROUP IS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY OWNED BY A COMMON OWNER OR BY COMMON OWNERS, EITHER CORPORATE OR NONCORPORATE, OR BY ONE OR MORE OF THE MEMBER CORPORATIONS OF THE GROUP.(16) "COMBINED UNITARY INCOME." THE AGGREGATE SEPARATE COMPANY TAXABLE INCOME OR LOSS OF ALL MEMBERS OF A UNITARY BUSINESS SUBJECT TO APPORTIONMENT EXCEPT:1. INCOME FROM AN INTERCOMPANY TRANSACTION BETWEEN MEMBERS OF A UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL BE DEFERRED IN A MANNER SIMILAR TO 26 CFR 1.1502-13 FOR FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURPOSES.2. DIVIDENDS PAID BY ONE MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS TO ANOTHER.3. INCOME OF THE FOLLOWING CORPORATIONS IS NOT INCLUDED IN THE DETERMINATION OF COMBINED UNITARY INCOME:(A) ANY CORPORATION SUBJECT TO TAXATION UNDER ARTICLE VII, VIII, IX OR XV;20250HB1667PN3745 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) ANY CORPORATION SPECIFIED IN THE DEFINITION OF "INSTITUTION" IN SECTION 701.5 THAT WOULD BE SUBJECT TO TAXATION UNDER ARTICLE VII, WERE IT DOING BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 701.5;(C) ANY CORPORATION COMMONLY KNOWN AS A TITLE INSURANCE COMPANY THAT WOULD BE SUBJECT TO TAXATION UNDER ARTICLE VIII, WERE IT INCORPORATED IN THIS STATE;(D) ANY CORPORATION SPECIFIED AS AN INSURANCE COMPANY, ASSOCIATION OR EXCHANGE IN ARTICLE IX THAT WOULD BE SUBJECT TO TAXATION UNDER ARTICLE IX, WERE IT TRANSACTING INSURANCE BUSINESS IN THIS STATE;(E) ANY CORPORATION SPECIFIED IN THE DEFINITION OF "INSTITUTION" IN SECTION 1501 THAT WOULD BE SUBJECT TO TAXATION UNDER ARTICLE XV, WERE IT LOCATED, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1501, IN THIS STATE; OR(F) ANY CORPORATION THAT HAS FILED A TIMELY ELECTION AND HAS QUALIFIED TO BE TAXED AS A REGULATED INVESTMENT COMPANY UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1954, AS AMENDED.(17) "MEMBER." A CORPORATION THAT IS A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A CORPORATION LISTED IN CLAUSE (16)3.(18) "TAXABLE MEMBER." A MEMBER WHICH WOULD BE SUBJECT TO THE TAX IMPOSED BY THIS ARTICLE UNDER SECTION 402 ON A SEPARATE ENTITY BASIS FOR EXERCISING, WHETHER IN ITS OWN NAME OR THROUGH ANY PERSON, ASSOCIATION, BUSINESS TRUST, CORPORATION, JOINT VENTURE, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, PARTNERSHIP, MEMBER OR OTHER ENTITY, ANY OF THE PRIVILEGES INCLUDED IN SECTION 402(A)(1), (2), (3), (4) AND (5).(19) "NONTAXABLE MEMBER." A MEMBER WHICH IS NOT A TAXABLE MEMBER.20250HB1667PN3745 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 3. SECTION 401.1 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 401.1. DETERMINATION OF NET LOSS DEDUCTION.--* * *(F) FOR TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, TAXPAYERS FILING COMBINED ANNUAL REPORTS MUST CALCULATE THE AVAILABLE NET LOSS DEDUCTION ON A TAXABLE MEMBER BY TAXABLE MEMBER BASIS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF SUBCLAUSE 4 OF SECTION 401(3).SECTION 4. SECTIONS 402(A) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND (5)(III) AND 403(C), (D) AND (F) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTIONS ARE AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 402. IMPOSITION OF TAX.--(A) A CORPORATION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO AND SHALL PAY AN EXCISE TAX FOR EXERCISING, WHETHER IN ITS OWN NAME OR THROUGH ANY PERSON, ASSOCIATION, BUSINESS TRUST, CORPORATION, JOINT VENTURE, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, PARTNERSHIP, MEMBER OR OTHER ENTITY, ANY OF THE FOLLOWING PRIVILEGES:* * *(5) * * *(III) THERE SHALL BE A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT A CORPORATION, OR IN THE CONTEXT OF A UNITARY BUSINESS, A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS WITH $500,000 OR MORE OF SALES SOURCED IN THE CURRENT TAX YEAR TO THIS COMMONWEALTH UNDER SECTION 401 HAS SUBSTANTIAL NEXUS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH WITHOUT REGARD TO PHYSICAL PRESENCE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.* * *(D) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "CORPORATION" SHALL INCLUDE A UNITARY BUSINESS, EXCEPT WHERE THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES A DIFFERENT MEANING.SECTION 403. REPORTS AND PAYMENT OF TAX.--* * *20250HB1667PN3745 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A.1) (1) EACH CORPORATION THAT IS A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS THAT CONSISTS OF TWO OR MORE CORPORATIONS, UNLESS EXCLUDED BY THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE, SHALL FILE AS PART OF A COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT. THE MEMBERS OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL DESIGNATE ONE MEMBER THAT IS SUBJECT TO TAX UNDER THIS ARTICLE TO FILE THE COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT AND TO ACT AS AGENT ON BEHALF OF ALL OTHER MEMBERS OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS. EACH CORPORATION THAT IS A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL BE LIABLE FOR ITS TAX LIABILITY UNDER THIS ARTICLE. THE AGENT ALSO SHALL BE LIABLE FOR THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS' TAX LIABILITY PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE.(2) THE OATH OR AFFIRMATION OF THE DESIGNATED MEMBER'S PRESIDENT, VICE PRESIDENT, TREASURER, ASSISTANT TREASURER OR OTHER AUTHORIZED OFFICER SHALL CONSTITUTE THE OATH OR AFFIRMATION OF EACH CORPORATION THAT IS A MEMBER OF THAT UNITARY BUSINESS.(3) THE DESIGNATED MEMBER SHALL TRANSMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT UPON A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT A COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT UNDER OATH OR AFFIRMATION OF THE MEMBER'S PRESIDENT, VICE PRESIDENT, TREASURER, ASSISTANT TREASURER OR OTHER AUTHORIZED OFFICER.(4) IN ADDITION TO THE INFORMATION REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (A), THE COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT SHALL SET FORTH:(I) ALL MEMBERS INCLUDED IN THE UNITARY BUSINESS.(II) ALL NECESSARY DATA, BOTH IN THE AGGREGATE AND FOR EACH MEMBER OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS, THAT SETS FORTH THE DETERMINATION OF TAX LIABILITY FOR EACH MEMBER OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS.(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE.(A.2) A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS OF TWO OR MORE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CORPORATIONS MUST DETERMINE THE MEMBER'S INCOME AND APPORTIONMENT FACTORS ON A WATER'S-EDGE BASIS.* * *(B.1) IT SHALL BE THE DUTY OF EACH UNITARY BUSINESS LIABLE TO PAY TAX UNDER THIS ARTICLE TO PAY ESTIMATED TAX UNDER SECTION 3003.2 AND TO MAKE FINAL PAYMENT OF TAX DUE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR WITH THE COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.(C) THE AMOUNT OF ALL TAXES, IMPOSED UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE, NOT PAID ON OR BEFORE THE TIMES AS ABOVE PROVIDED, SHALL BEAR INTEREST AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 806 OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS "THE FISCAL CODE," FROM THE DATE THEY ARE DUE AND PAYABLE UNTIL PAID, EXCEPT THAT IF THE TAXABLE INCOME HAS BEEN, OR IS INCREASED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF INTERNAL REVENUE, OR BY ANY OTHER AGENCY OR COURT OF THE UNITED STATES, INTEREST SHALL BE COMPUTED ON THE ADDITIONAL TAX DUE FROM THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE CORPORATION RECEIVES NOTICE OF THE CHANGE OF INCOME UNTIL PAID: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT ANY CORPORATION OR DESIGNATED MEMBER RESPONSIBLE FOR FILING A COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT MAY PAY THE FULL AMOUNT OF SUCH TAX, OR ANY PART THEREOF, TOGETHER WITH INTEREST DUE TO THE DATE OF PAYMENT, WITHOUT PREJUDICE TO ITS RIGHT TO PRESENT AND PROSECUTE, AN ADMINISTRATIVE PETITION OR AN APPEAL TO COURT. IF IT BE THEREAFTER DETERMINED THAT SUCH TAXES WERE OVERPAID, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENTER A CREDIT TO THE ACCOUNT OF SUCH CORPORATION OR DESIGNATED MEMBER, WHICH MAY BE USED BY IT IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY LAW.(D) IF THE OFFICERS OF ANY CORPORATION OR DESIGNATED MEMBER SHALL NEGLECT, OR REFUSE TO MAKE ANY REPORT AS HEREIN REQUIRED, OR SHALL KNOWINGLY MAKE ANY FALSE REPORT, A PENALTY OF FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS ($500) PLUS AN ADDITIONAL ONE PER CENT FOR EVERY 20250HB1667PN3745 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DOLLAR OF TAX DETERMINED TO BE DUE IN EXCESS OF TWENTY-FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($25,000) SHALL BE ADDED TO THE TAX DETERMINED TO BE DUE. NO AMOUNTS ADDED TO THE TAX SHALL BEAR ANY INTEREST WHATSOEVER.* * *(E.1) IF THE MEMBERS OF A UNITARY BUSINESS HAVE A COMMON TAXABLE YEAR THAT CLOSES NOT UPON DECEMBER 31, BUT UPON SOME OTHER DATE, SUCH UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL MAKE THE COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT, HEREIN REQUIRED, ON OR BEFORE THE FIFTEENTH DAY OF THE MONTH FOLLOWING WHAT IS OR WOULD BE THE DUE DATE OF THE RETURN TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, SUBJECT IN ALL OTHER RESPECTS TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE.(F) IF THE CORPORATION OR ANY MEMBERS OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL CLAIM IN ITS REPORT OR IN ITS COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT THAT THE RETURN MADE TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT WAS INACCURATE, THE AMOUNT CLAIMED [BY IT] TO BE THE TAXABLE INCOME, TAXABLE UNDER THIS ARTICLE, AND THE BASIS OF SUCH CLAIM OF INACCURACY, SHALL BE FULLY SPECIFIED.SECTION 5. SECTIONS 403.1 AND 403.2(B) AND (E) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 403.1. TIMELY MAILING TREATED AS TIMELY FILING AND PAYMENT.--NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF ANY STATE TAX LAW TO THE CONTRARY, WHENEVER A REPORT OR PAYMENT OF ALL OR ANY PORTION OF A STATE TAX IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO BE RECEIVED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE OR OTHER AGENCY OF THE COMMONWEALTH ON OR BEFORE A DAY CERTAIN, THE CORPORATION SHALL BE DEEMED TO HAVE COMPLIED WITH SUCH LAW IF THE LETTER TRANSMITTING THE REPORT OR PAYMENT OF SUCH TAX WHICH HAS BEEN RECEIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT IS POSTMARKED BY THE UNITED STATES POSTAL SERVICE ON OR PRIOR TO THE FINAL DAY ON WHICH THE PAYMENT 20250HB1667PN3745 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IS TO BE RECEIVED.FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE, PRESENTATION OF A RECEIPT INDICATING THAT THE REPORT OR PAYMENT WAS MAILED BY REGISTERED OR CERTIFIED MAIL ON OR BEFORE THE DUE DATE SHALL BE EVIDENCE OF TIMELY FILING AND PAYMENT.FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "CORPORATION" SHALL INCLUDE A UNITARY BUSINESS.SECTION 403.2. ADDITIONAL WITHHOLDING REQUIREMENTS.--* * *(B) A PARTNERSHIP REQUIRED TO FILE A REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL WITHHOLD AND PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT A TAX ON BEHALF OF ITS NONFILING CORPORATE PARTNERS IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ITS NET NONFILING CORPORATE PARTNERS' SHARES OF INCOME AND DEDUCTIONS AS REPORTED TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT MULTIPLIED BY THE TAX RATE APPLICABLE TO THE TAXABLE YEAR BEING REPORTED. ANY AMOUNT WITHHELD AND PAID TO THE DEPARTMENT ON BEHALF OF A NONFILING CORPORATE PARTNER SHALL BE CONSIDERED A TAX PAYMENT BY THAT PARTNER AND CREDITED TO ITS ACCOUNT [AS IF IT WAS DIRECTLY PAID BY THE PARTNER] OR THE ACCOUNT OF THE DESIGNATED MEMBER OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS.* * *(E) THE FOLLOWING WORDS, TERMS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS SECTION SHALL HAVE THE MEANING ASCRIBED TO THEM IN THIS SECTION, EXCEPT WHERE THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES A DIFFERENT MEANING:"NET NONFILING CORPORATE PARTNERS' SHARES OF INCOME AND DEDUCTIONS AS REPORTED TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT." THAT PORTION OF THE INCOME, LESS THE DEDUCTIONS:(1) REPORTED ON SCHEDULE K OF THE FEDERAL FORM 1065, RETURN OF PARTNERSHIP INCOME, FILED WITH THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR; AND(2) ALLOCATED ON FEDERAL SCHEDULE K-1 TO NONFILING CORPORATE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARTNERS.IF THE ENTIRE BUSINESS OF THE PARTNERSHIP IS NOT TRANSACTED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, THE AMOUNT COMPUTED UNDER THIS DEFINITION SHALL BE APPORTIONED TO THIS COMMONWEALTH AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 401(3)2 AS IF THE PARTNERSHIP WERE A CORPORATION SUBJECT TO TAX UNDER THIS ARTICLE."NONFILING CORPORATE PARTNER." A PARTNER WHICH:(1) IS A CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 401; AND(2) HAS [NOT] NEITHER FILED A TAX REPORT NOR BEEN INCLUDED IN A COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT AND HAS NOT PAID THE TAX REQUIRED BY SECTIONS 402 AND 403 FOR THE PREVIOUS TAXABLE YEAR."PARTNER." AN OWNER OF AN INTEREST IN THE PARTNERSHIP, IN WHATEVER MANNER THAT OWNER AND OWNERSHIP INTEREST ARE DESIGNATED."PARTNERSHIP." AN ENTITY CLASSIFIED AS A PARTNERSHIP FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.(1) THE TERM INCLUDES:(I) A PARTNERSHIP, LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP OR LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY; AND(II) ANY SYNDICATE, GROUP, POOL, JOINT VENTURE, BUSINESS TRUST, ASSOCIATION OR OTHER UNINCORPORATED ORGANIZATION THROUGH OR BY WHICH A BUSINESS, FINANCIAL OPERATION OR VENTURE IS CARRIED ON.(2) THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE AN ENTITY THAT IS:(I) LISTED ON A UNITED STATES NATIONAL STOCK EXCHANGE; OR(II) DESCRIBED IN SECTION 401(1)1 OR 2.SECTION 6. SECTION 404 OF THE ACT IS REPEALED:[SECTION 404. CONSOLIDATED REPORTS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT PERMIT ANY CORPORATION OWNING OR CONTROLLING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, ANY OF THE VOTING CAPITAL STOCK OF ANOTHER 20250HB1667PN3745 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CORPORATION OR OF OTHER CORPORATIONS, SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE, TO MAKE A CONSOLIDATED REPORT, SHOWING THE COMBINED NET INCOME.]SECTION 7. SECTION 405 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 405. EXTENSION OF TIME TO FILE REPORTS.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY, UPON APPLICATION MADE TO IT, IN SUCH FORM AS IT SHALL PRESCRIBE, ON OR PRIOR TO THE LAST DAY FOR FILING ANY ANNUAL REPORT, AND UPON PROPER CAUSE SHOWN, GRANT TO THE CORPORATION, REQUIRED TO FILE SUCH REPORT, AN EXTENSION OF NOT MORE THAN SIXTY DAYS WITHIN WHICH SUCH REPORT MAY BE FILED. IF THE FEDERAL INCOME TAX AUTHORITIES GRANT AN EXTENSION OF TIME FOR FILING THE REPORTS WITH THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AUTOMATICALLY GRANT AN EXTENSION OF TIME FOR FILING THE ANNUAL REPORT UNDER THIS ARTICLE UNTIL THE FIFTEENTH DAY OF THE MONTH FOLLOWING THE TERMINATION OF THE FEDERAL EXTENSION, BUT THE AMOUNT OF TAX DUE SHALL, IN SUCH CASES, NEVERTHELESS, BE SUBJECT TO INTEREST FROM THE DUE DATES AND AT THE RATES FIXED BY THIS ARTICLE. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION THE TERM "REPORT," WHEN USED IN THE CONTEXT OF FILINGS WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL INCLUDE COMBINED ANNUAL REPORTS AND THE TERM "CORPORATION" SHALL INCLUDE A UNITARY BUSINESS.SECTION 8. SECTION 406(E) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 406. CHANGES MADE BY FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.--* * *(E) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION SHALL APPLY TO EVERY CORPORATION WHICH WAS DOING BUSINESS IN PENNSYLVANIA IN THE YEAR FOR WHICH THE FEDERAL INCOME HAS BEEN CHANGED, IRRESPECTIVE OF WHETHER OR NOT SUCH CORPORATION OR ANY MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS HAS THEREAFTER MERGED, CONSOLIDATED, WITHDRAWN OR DISSOLVED. ANY CLEARANCE CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT 20250HB1667PN3745 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL BE CONDITIONED UPON THE REQUIREMENT THAT IN THE EVENT OF A CHANGE IN FEDERAL INCOME FOR ANY YEAR FOR WHICH TAXES HAVE BEEN PAID TO THE COMMONWEALTH, THE CORPORATION OR ITS SUCCESSOR OR ITS OFFICERS OR ITS DIRECTORS SHALL FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT A REPORT OF CHANGE AND PAY ANY ADDITIONAL STATE TAX RESULTING THEREFROM.(F) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "CORPORATION" SHALL INCLUDE A UNITARY BUSINESS.SECTION 9. SECTIONS 407.3(F), 407.6(A)(5), (6) AND (8) AND 407.7(D)(3) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 407.3. LIMITATIONS ON ASSESSMENTS.--* * *(F) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION[,]:(1) A REPORT FILED BEFORE THE LAST DAY PRESCRIBED FOR FILING SHALL BE DEEMED TO HAVE BEEN FILED ON THE LAST DAY[.]; AND(2) THE TERM "REPORT" SHALL INCLUDE COMBINED ANNUAL REPORTS.SECTION 407.6. DEFINITIONS.--(A) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART ONLY, THE FOLLOWING WORDS, TERMS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANING ASCRIBED TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION, EXCEPT WHERE THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES A DIFFERENT MEANING:* * *(5) "QUALIFIED MANUFACTURING INNOVATION AND REINVESTMENT DEDUCTION." AN ALLOWABLE DEDUCTION AS DETERMINED, CALCULATED AND EXECUTED IN A COMMITMENT LETTER BETWEEN THE DEPARTMENT AND THE TAXPAYER. THE DEDUCTION SHALL BE APPLIED TO THE TAXABLE INCOME OF THE TAXPAYER TO REDUCE A QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY OF THE TAXPAYER FOLLOWING THE ALLOCATION AND APPORTIONMENT OF THE INCOME OF THE TAXPAYER. IF THE TAXPAYER IS A UNITARY BUSINESS FILING A COMBINED ANNUAL RETURN, THE DEDUCTION SHALL BE APPLIED TO THE SPECIFIC MEMBER OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS WHICH QUALIFIES UNDER THIS PART. SUCH MEMBER SHALL REDUCE TAXABLE INCOME 20250HB1667PN3745 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOLLOWING ALLOCATION AND THE APPORTIONMENT OF THE COMBINED UNITARY INCOME OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS, AS DETERMINED ON A WATER'S-EDGE BASIS, AND THE APPLICATION OF ANY NET LOSS OF THE MEMBER.(6) "QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY." A TAXPAYER'S TAX LIABILITY UNDER THIS ARTICLE. IN THE CASE OF A UNITARY BUSINESS, THE TERM ONLY INCLUDES THE PORTION OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS'S OVERALL TAX LIABILITY UNDER THIS ARTICLE ASSOCIATED WITH THE TAXABLE MEMBER QUALIFIED TO RECEIVE THE DEDUCTION UNDER THIS PART.* * *(8) "TAXPAYER." AN EMPLOYER SUBJECT TO THE TAX UNDER THIS ARTICLE. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS DEFINITION, AN EMPLOYER SHALL INCLUDE A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS.* * *SECTION 407.7. MANUFACTURING INNOVATION AND REINVESTMENT DEDUCTION.--* * *(D) * * *(3) (I) A TAXPAYER CANNOT USE THE DEDUCTION TO REDUCE THE TAXPAYER'S TAX LIABILITY BY MORE THAN FIFTY PER CENT OF THE TAX LIABILITY UNDER THIS ARTICLE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR. FOR A UNITARY BUSINESS, THE LIMITATION SHALL APPLY TO THE PORTION OF THE TAX LIABILITY OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS UNDER THIS ARTICLE ASSOCIATED WITH THE TAXABLE MEMBER WHICH QUALIFIES FOR THE DEDUCTION UNDER THIS SECTION.(II) THE DEDUCTION IS NONTRANSFERABLE AND ANY UNUSED PORTION IN A TAX YEAR SHALL EXPIRE AT THE END OF THE CORRESPONDING TAX YEAR.SECTION 10. SECTION 408 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 408. ENFORCEMENT; RULES AND REGULATIONS; 20250HB1667PN3745 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INQUISITORIAL POWERS OF THE DEPARTMENT.--* * *(E) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "CORPORATION" SHALL INCLUDE A UNITARY BUSINESS.SECTION 11. SECTIONS 409 AND 410(C) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 409. RETENTION OF RECORDS.--EACH CORPORATION SHALL MAINTAIN AND KEEP FOR A PERIOD OF THREE YEARS AFTER ANY REPORT IS FILED UNDER THIS ARTICLE, SUCH RECORD OR RECORDS OF ITS BUSINESS WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH FOR THE PERIOD COVERED BY SUCH REPORT AND OTHER PERTINENT PAPERS, AS MAY BE REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "CORPORATION" SHALL INCLUDE A UNITARY BUSINESS.SECTION 410. PENALTIES.--* * *(C) ANY PERSON, WHO WILFULLY FAILS, NEGLECTS, OR REFUSES TO MAKE A REPORT OR TO PAY THE TAX AS HEREIN PRESCRIBED, OR WHO SHALL REFUSE TO PERMIT THE DEPARTMENT TO EXAMINE THE BOOKS, PAPERS, AND RECORDS OF ANY CORPORATION LIABLE TO PAY TAX UNDER THIS ARTICLE, SHALL BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR, AND, UPON CONVICTION THEREOF, SHALL BE SENTENCED TO PAY A FINE NOT EXCEEDING ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($1,000) AND COSTS OF PROSECUTION, OR TO UNDERGO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING SIX MONTHS, OR BOTH. SUCH PENALTY SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTIES IMPOSED BY THIS ARTICLE. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE TERM "CORPORATION" SHALL INCLUDE A UNITARY BUSINESS.SECTION 12. SECTION 1101(A), (B) AND (H) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 1101. IMPOSITION OF TAX.--(A) GENERAL RULE.--EVERY PIPELINE COMPANY, CONDUIT COMPANY, STEAMBOAT COMPANY, CANAL 20250HB1667PN3745 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMPANY, SLACK WATER NAVIGATION COMPANY, TRANSPORTATION COMPANY, AND EVERY OTHER COMPANY, ASSOCIATION, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, OR LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, NOW OR HEREAFTER INCORPORATED OR ORGANIZED BY OR UNDER ANY LAW OF THIS COMMONWEALTH, OR NOW OR HEREAFTER ORGANIZED OR INCORPORATED BY ANY OTHER STATE OR BY THE UNITED STATES OR ANY FOREIGN GOVERNMENT, AND DOING BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, AND EVERY COPARTNERSHIP, PERSON OR PERSONS OWING, OPERATING OR LEASING TO OR FROM ANOTHER CORPORATION, COMPANY, ASSOCIATION, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, COPARTNERSHIP, PERSON OR PERSONS, ANY PIPELINE, CONDUIT, STEAMBOAT, CANAL, SLACK WATER NAVIGATION, OR OTHER DEVICE FOR THE TRANSPORTATION OF FREIGHT, PASSENGERS, BAGGAGE, OR OIL, EXCEPT MOTOR VEHICLES AND RAILROADS, AND EVERY LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, ASSOCIATION, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, CORPORATION OR COMPANY ENGAGED IN, OR HEREINAFTER ENGAGED IN, THE TRANSPORTATION OF FREIGHT OR OIL WITHIN THIS STATE, AND EVERY TELEPHONE COMPANY, TELEGRAPH COMPANY OR PROVIDER OF MOBILE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES NOW OR HEREAFTER INCORPORATED OR ORGANIZED BY OR UNDER ANY LAW OF THIS COMMONWEALTH, OR NOW OR HEREAFTER ORGANIZED OR INCORPORATED BY ANY OTHER STATE OR BY THE UNITED STATES OR ANY FOREIGN GOVERNMENT AND DOING BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, AND EVERY LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, ASSOCIATION, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, COPARTNERSHIP, PERSON OR PERSONS, ENGAGED IN TELEPHONE OR TELEGRAPH BUSINESS OR PROVIDING MOBILE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, AND EVERY LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, ASSOCIATION, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, CORPORATION OR COMPANY PROVIDING DIGITAL ADVERTISING SERVICES IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, SHALL PAY TO THE STATE TREASURER, THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, A TAX OF FORTY-FIVE MILLS WITH A SURTAX EQUAL TO FIVE MILLS UPON EACH DOLLAR OF THE GROSS RECEIPTS OF 20250HB1667PN3745 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE CORPORATION, COMPANY OR ASSOCIATION, LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, COPARTNERSHIP, PERSON OR PERSONS RECEIVED FROM:(1) PASSENGERS, BAGGAGE, OIL AND FREIGHT TRANSPORTED WHOLLY WITHIN THIS STATE;(2) TELEGRAPH OR TELEPHONE MESSAGES TRANSMITTED WHOLLY WITHIN THIS STATE AND TELEGRAPH OR TELEPHONE MESSAGES TRANSMITTED IN INTERSTATE COMMERCE WHERE SUCH MESSAGES ORIGINATE OR TERMINATE IN THIS STATE AND THE CHARGES FOR SUCH MESSAGES ARE BILLED TO A SERVICE ADDRESS IN THIS STATE, EXCEPT GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM:(I) THE SALES OF ACCESS TO THE INTERNET, AS SET FORTH IN ARTICLE II, MADE TO THE ULTIMATE CONSUMER;(II) THE SALES FOR RESALE TO PERSONS, PARTNERSHIPS, ASSOCIATIONS, CORPORATIONS, OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS SUBJECT TO THE TAX IMPOSED BY THIS ARTICLE UPON GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM SUCH RESALE OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES, INCLUDING:(A) TELECOMMUNICATIONS EXCHANGE ACCESS TO INTERCONNECT WITH A LOCAL EXCHANGE CARRIER'S NETWORK;(B) NETWORK ELEMENTS ON AN UNBUNDLED BASIS; AND(C) SALES OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES TO INTERCONNECT WITH PROVIDERS OF MOBILE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES; AND(III) THE SALES OF TELEPHONES, TELEPHONE HANDSETS, MODEMS, TABLETS AND RELATED ACCESSORIES, INCLUDING CASES, CHARGERS, HOLSTERS, CLIPS, HANDS-FREE DEVICES, SCREEN PROTECTORS AND BATTERIES; [AND](3) MOBILE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES MESSAGES SOURCED TO THIS COMMONWEALTH BASED ON THE PLACE OF PRIMARY USE STANDARD SET FORTH IN THE MOBILE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SOURCING ACT (4 U.S.C. § 117), EXCEPT GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM:20250HB1667PN3745 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) THE SALES OF ACCESS TO THE INTERNET, AS SET FORTH IN ARTICLE II, MADE TO THE ULTIMATE CONSUMER;(II) THE SALES FOR RESALE TO PERSONS, PARTNERSHIPS, ASSOCIATIONS, CORPORATIONS OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS SUBJECT TO THE TAX IMPOSED BY THIS ARTICLE UPON GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM SUCH RESALE OF MOBILE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES, INCLUDING SALES OF MOBILE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES TO INTERCONNECT WITH PROVIDERS OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES; AND(III) THE SALES OF TELEPHONES, TELEPHONE HANDSETS, MODEMS, TABLETS AND RELATED ACCESSORIES, INCLUDING CASES, CHARGERS, HOLSTERS, CLIPS, HANDS-FREE DEVICES, SCREEN PROTECTORS AND BATTERIES[.]; AND(4) DIGITAL ADVERTISING SERVICES DISPLAYED TO A USER ON A DIGITAL INTERFACE WHOLLY WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING BANNER ADVERTISING, SEARCH ENGINE ADVERTISING, INTERSTITIAL ADVERTISING AND COMPARABLE ADVERTISING SERVICES THAT UTILIZE THE PERSONAL INFORMATION OF THE USERS TO WHOM THE ADVERTISEMENTS ARE SERVED. AS USED IN THIS CLAUSE, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS CLAUSE:"DIGITAL ADVERTISING SERVICES." THE PROVISION OF ADVERTISEMENTS DISPLAYED ON A DIGITAL INTERFACE."DIGITAL INTERFACE." ANY SOFTWARE, INCLUDING AN INTERNET WEBSITE, PART OF AN INTERNET WEBSITE OR APPLICATION, ACCESSIBLE TO A USER."USER." AN INDIVIDUAL OR OTHER PERSON ACCESSING A DIGITAL INTERFACE VIA A DEVICE.* * *(A.2) TRANSFER TO ALTERNATIVE FUELS INCENTIVE FUND.--NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027, AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, SEVEN MILLION 20250HB1667PN3745 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DOLLARS ($7,000,000) OF THE TAXES RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE TRANSFERRED TO THE ALTERNATIVE FUELS INCENTIVE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 3 OF THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 29, 2004 (P.L.1376, NO.178), KNOWN AS THE ALTERNATIVE FUELS INCENTIVE ACT. THE TRANSFER REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE MADE ANNUALLY BY MAY 31, 2027, AND EACH MAY 31 THEREAFTER.(B) ELECTRIC LIGHT, WATERPOWER AND HYDRO-ELECTRIC UTILITIES.--(1) EVERY ELECTRIC LIGHT COMPANY, WATERPOWER COMPANY AND HYDRO-ELECTRIC COMPANY NOW OR HEREAFTER INCORPORATED OR ORGANIZED BY OR UNDER ANY LAW OF THIS COMMONWEALTH, OR NOW OR HEREAFTER ORGANIZED OR INCORPORATED BY ANY OTHER STATE OR BY THE UNITED STATES OR ANY FOREIGN GOVERNMENT AND DOING BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, AND EVERY LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, ASSOCIATION, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, COPARTNERSHIP, PERSON OR PERSONS, ENGAGED IN ELECTRIC LIGHT AND POWER BUSINESS, WATERPOWER BUSINESS AND HYDRO-ELECTRIC BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, SHALL PAY TO THE STATE TREASURER, THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, A TAX OF FORTY-FOUR MILLS UPON EACH DOLLAR OF THE GROSS RECEIPTS OF THE CORPORATION, COMPANY OR ASSOCIATION, LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, COPARTNERSHIP, PERSON OR PERSONS, RECEIVED FROM:[(1)] (I) THE SALES OF ELECTRIC ENERGY WITHIN THIS STATE, EXCEPT GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM THE SALES FOR RESALE OF ELECTRIC ENERGY TO PERSONS, PARTNERSHIPS, ASSOCIATIONS, CORPORATIONS OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS SUBJECT TO THE TAX IMPOSED BY THIS SUBSECTION UPON GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM SUCH RESALE; AND[(2)] (II) THE SALES OF ELECTRIC ENERGY PRODUCED IN PENNSYLVANIA AND MADE OUTSIDE OF PENNSYLVANIA IN A STATE THAT 20250HB1667PN3745 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HAS TAKEN ACTION SINCE DECEMBER 21, 1977 WHICH RESULTS IN HIGHER COSTS FOR ELECTRIC ENERGY PRODUCED IN THAT STATE AND SOLD IN PENNSYLVANIA UNLESS THE ACTION THAT WAS TAKEN AFTER DECEMBER 21, 1977 IS RESCINDED ACCORDING TO THE FOLLOWING APPORTIONMENT FORMULA: EXCEPT FOR GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM SALES UNDER [CLAUSE (1)] SUBCLAUSE (I), THE GROSS RECEIPTS FROM ALL SALES OF ELECTRICITY OF THE PRODUCER SHALL BE APPORTIONED TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA BY THE RATIO OF THE PRODUCER'S OPERATING AND MAINTENANCE EXPENSES IN PENNSYLVANIA AND DEPRECIATION ATTRIBUTABLE TO PROPERTY IN PENNSYLVANIA TO THE PRODUCER'S TOTAL OPERATING AND MAINTENANCE EXPENSES AND DEPRECIATION.(2) THIS SUBSECTION SHALL EXPIRE JULY 1, 2026.(B.1) IMPOSITION.--BEGINNING ON JULY 1, 2026, EVERY ELECTRIC LIGHT COMPANY, WATERPOWER COMPANY AND HYDRO-ELECTRIC COMPANY NOW OR HEREAFTER INCORPORATED OR ORGANIZED BY OR UNDER ANY LAW OF THIS COMMONWEALTH, OR NOW OR HEREAFTER ORGANIZED OR INCORPORATED BY ANY OTHER STATE OR BY THE UNITED STATES OR ANY FOREIGN GOVERNMENT AND DOING BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, AND EVERY LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, ASSOCIATION, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, COPARTNERSHIP, PERSON OR PERSONS, ENGAGED IN ELECTRIC LIGHT AND POWER BUSINESS, WATERPOWER BUSINESS AND HYDRO-ELECTRIC BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, SHALL PAY TO THE STATE TREASURER, THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, A TAX OF FORTY-FOUR MILLS UPON EACH DOLLAR OF THE GROSS RECEIPTS OF THE CORPORATION, COMPANY OR ASSOCIATION, LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION, COPARTNERSHIP, PERSON OR PERSONS, RECEIVED FROM:(1) THE SALES OF ELECTRIC ENERGY TO A COMMERCIAL ACCOUNT OR INDUSTRIAL ACCOUNT WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, EXCEPT GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM THE SALES FOR RESALE OF ELECTRIC ENERGY TO 20250HB1667PN3745 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PERSONS, PARTNERSHIPS, ASSOCIATIONS, CORPORATIONS OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS SUBJECT TO THE TAX IMPOSED BY THIS SUBSECTION UPON GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM SUCH RESALE, PROVIDED THAT THE SALES OF ELECTRIC ENERGY TO A RESIDENTIAL ACCOUNT WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM TAX UNDER THIS ARTICLE; AND(2) THE SALES OF ELECTRIC ENERGY PRODUCED IN PENNSYLVANIA AND MADE OUTSIDE OF PENNSYLVANIA IN A STATE THAT HAS TAKEN ACTION SINCE DECEMBER 21, 1977, WHICH RESULTS IN HIGHER COSTS FOR ELECTRIC ENERGY PRODUCED IN THAT STATE AND SOLD IN PENNSYLVANIA UNLESS THE ACTION THAT WAS TAKEN AFTER DECEMBER 21, 1977 IS RESCINDED ACCORDING TO THE FOLLOWING APPORTIONMENT FORMULA: EXCEPT FOR GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM SALES UNDER CLAUSE (1), THE GROSS RECEIPTS FROM ALL SALES OF ELECTRICITY OF THE PRODUCER SHALL BE APPORTIONED TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA BY THE RATIO OF THE PRODUCER'S OPERATING AND MAINTENANCE EXPENSES IN PENNSYLVANIA AND DEPRECIATION ATTRIBUTABLE TO PROPERTY IN PENNSYLVANIA TO THE PRODUCER'S TOTAL OPERATING AND MAINTENANCE EXPENSES AND DEPRECIATION.* * *(G.1) EXEMPTION FOR BROADCAST AND NEWS MEDIA ENTITIES.--THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION ON GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM DIGITAL ADVERTISING SERVICES SHALL NOT HOWEVER BE IMPOSED ON GROSS RECEIPTS FROM ADVERTISING SERVICES DISPLAYED ON A DIGITAL INTERFACE OWNED OR OPERATED BY A BROADCAST ENTITY OR NEWS MEDIA ENTITY. AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:"BROADCAST ENTITY." AN ENTITY PRIMARILY ENGAGED IN OPERATING A BROADCAST TELEVISION OR RADIO STATION."DIGITAL ADVERTISING SERVICES." AS DEFINED IN SUBSECTION (A)20250HB1667PN3745 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4)."DIGITAL INTERFACE." AS DEFINED IN SUBSECTION (A)(4)."NEWS MEDIA ENTITY." AN ENTITY PRIMARILY ENGAGED IN NEWSGATHERING, REPORTING OR PUBLISHING ARTICLES OR COMMENTARY ON NEWS, CURRENT EVENTS, CULTURE OR OTHER MATTERS OF PUBLIC INTEREST.(H) BENEFITS TO CONSUMER.--(1) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE, THE REDUCTION IN THE TAXES IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) SHALL DERIVE TO THE BENEFIT OF THE CONSUMER PURCHASING SERVICES FROM SAID UTILITIES. SAID BENEFIT SHALL BE PROVIDED IN THE FORM OF A REDUCTION IN THE STATE TAX SURCHARGE. FAILURE TO PASS THROUGH THE REDUCTION TO THE CONSUMER SHALL SUBJECT THE PUBLIC UTILITY TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF AT LEAST ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($1,000), BUT NOT MORE THAN FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($5,000), AND SUCH ADDITIONAL RELIEF AS THE COURT MAY DEEM APPROPRIATE.(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE, THE EXEMPTION OF RESIDENTIAL ACCOUNTS FROM THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (B.1) SHALL DERIVE TO THE BENEFIT OF THE RESIDENTIAL ACCOUNT PURCHASING ELECTRIC ENERGY. THE BENEFIT SHALL BE PROVIDED IN THE FORM OF THE ELIMINATION OF OR A REDUCTION IN THE STATE TAX SURCHARGE. FAILURE TO PASS THROUGH THE ELIMINATION OR REDUCTION TO THE CONSUMER SHALL SUBJECT THE ENTITY TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF AT LEAST ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($1,000), BUT NOT MORE THAN FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($5,000), AND ADDITIONAL RELIEF AS THE COURT MAY DEEM APPROPRIATE.* * *SECTION 13. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING SECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 1104. DEFINITIONS.--THE FOLLOWING WORDS, TERMS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANING 20250HB1667PN3745 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASCRIBED TO THEM IN THIS SECTION, EXCEPT WHERE THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES A DIFFERENT MEANING:"COMMERCIAL ACCOUNT." AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SERVICE ACCOUNT SERVED UNDER A COMMERCIAL RATE SCHEDULE APPROVED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION."INDUSTRIAL ACCOUNT." AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SERVICE ACCOUNT SERVED UNDER AN INDUSTRIAL RATE SCHEDULE APPROVED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION."RESIDENTIAL ACCOUNT." AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SERVICE ACCOUNT SERVED UNDER A RESIDENTIAL RATE SCHEDULE APPROVED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION.SECTION 1710-A.1. APPLICATION OF TAX CREDITS OR TAX BENEFITS TO A UNITARY BUSINESS.FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT OR TAX BENEFIT WHICH IS APPLICABLE TO THE TAX DUE BY A UNITARY BUSINESS UNDER ARTICLE IV, ANY TAX CREDIT OR TAX BENEFIT AWARDED TO OR CONFERRED UPON A CORPORATION WHICH IS A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL BE CALCULATED AS IF THAT MEMBER IS A SEPARATE COMPANY AND CAN ONLY BE APPLIED AGAINST THAT PORTION OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS'S ANNUAL TAX LIABILITY ASSOCIATED WITH THAT MEMBER WHICH RECEIVES THE TAX CREDIT OR TAX BENEFIT. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE, THE TERM "UNITARY BUSINESS" SHALL HAVE THE SAME MEANING AS IN SECTION 401(13) AND THE TERM "MEMBER" SHALL HAVE THE SAME MEANING AS IN SECTION 401(17).SECTION 14. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING ARTICLES TO READ:ARTICLE XVII-E.1EDUCATION TAX CREDITSSECTION 1701-E.1. LIMITATIONS.(A) AMOUNT.--NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 2006-B OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF 1949:(1) FOR FISCAL YEARS PRIOR TO THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR, THE TOTAL AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF ALL TAX CREDITS APPROVED FOR CONTRIBUTIONS FROM BUSINESS FIRMS TO SCHOLARSHIP ORGANIZATIONS, EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT ORGANIZATIONS AND PRE-KINDERGARTEN SCHOLARSHIP ORGANIZATIONS SHALL NOT EXCEED $590,000,000 IN A FISCAL YEAR.(2) FOR FISCAL YEARS PRIOR TO THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR, THE TOTAL AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF ALL TAX CREDITS APPROVED FOR CONTRIBUTIONS FROM BUSINESS FIRMS TO OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP ORGANIZATIONS SHALL NOT EXCEED $90,000,000 IN A FISCAL YEAR. (3) NO TAX CREDIT MAY BE APPROVED UNDER THIS ARTICLE FOR THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR OR A FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER.SECTION 1702-E.1. TERMINATION OF AUTHORITY.(A) APPLICATIONS.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ACCEPT AN APPLICATION FOR A TAX CREDIT UNDER ARTICLE XX-B OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, FOR THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR OR A FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER.(B) APPROVAL.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPROVE A TAX CREDIT UNDER ARTICLE XX-B OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949 FOR THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR OR A FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER.(C) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO AFFECT THE VALIDITY, USE, ADMINISTRATION, REPORTING, REVIEW, ENFORCEMENT OR RECAPTURE OF A TAX CREDIT APPROVED UNDER ARTICLE XX-B OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE FOR A FISCAL YEAR PRIOR TO THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR.ARTICLE XVII-FEDUCATION OPTIONS TAX CREDITSSECTION 1701-F. SCOPE OF ARTICLE.20250HB1667PN3745 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THIS ARTICLE RELATES TO EDUCATION OPTIONS TAX CREDITS.SECTION 1702-F. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ACCOUNT." THE ACCOUNTABILITY FOR DIVERTED TAX DOLLARS RESTRICTED ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 1703-F(F)."APPLICABLE TAX." ANY OF THE TAXES DUE UNDER ARTICLE III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XV OR XX OR A TAX UNDER ARTICLE XVI OF THE ACT OF MAY 17, 1921 (P.L.682, NO.284), KNOWN AS THE INSURANCE COMPANY LAW OF 1921."APPLICANT." AN ELIGIBLE EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENT OR ELIGIBLE STUDENT WHO APPLIES FOR A SCHOLARSHIP."ASSESSMENT." THE PENNSYLVANIA SYSTEM OF SCHOOL ASSESSMENT TEST, THE KEYSTONE EXAM, AN EQUIVALENT LOCAL ASSESSMENT OR ANOTHER TEST ESTABLISHED OR APPROVED BY THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION OR THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 2603-B(D)(10)(I) OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, OR REQUIRED UNDER THE EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT (PUBLIC LAW 114-95, 129 STAT. 1802) OR ITS SUCCESSOR STATUTE OR ANOTHER TEST REQUIRED TO ACHIEVE OTHER STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION FOR THE PUBLIC SCHOOL OR SCHOOL DISTRICT UNDER 22 PA. CODE § 403.3 (RELATING TO SINGLE ACCOUNTABILITY SYSTEM)."ATTENDANCE BOUNDARY." A GEOGRAPHIC AREA OF RESIDENCE USED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT TO ASSIGN A STUDENT TO A PUBLIC SCHOOL . "AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2501(3) OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949 . "BUSINESS FIRM." AN ENTITY AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH AND SUBJECT TO TAXES IMPOSED UNDER ARTICLE III, IV, 20250HB1667PN3745 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 VI, VII, VIII, IX, XV OR XX OR A TAX UNDER ARTICLE XVI OF THE INSURANCE COMPANY LAW OF 1921. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY THE PURPOSE OF WHICH IS MAKING CONTRIBUTIONS UNDER THIS ARTICLE."CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL." A PUBLIC SECONDARY SCHOOL ESTABLISHED UNDER ARTICLE XVIII OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949."CONTRIBUTION." A DONATION OF CASH, PERSONAL PROPERTY OR SERVICES, THE VALUE OF WHICH IS THE NET COST OF THE DONATION TO THE DONOR OR THE PRO RATA HOURLY WAGE, INCLUDING BENEFITS, OF THE INDIVIDUAL PERFORMING THE SERVICES."DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH."EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM." AN EARLY LEARNING AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM FOR CHILDREN UNDER SIX YEARS OF AGE, INCLUDING ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) A CHILD CARE CENTER AS DEFINED UNDER 55 PA. CODE § 3270.4 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS).(2) A GROUP CHILD CARE HOME AS DEFINED UNDER 55 PA. CODE § 3280.4 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS).(3) A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME AS DEFINED UNDER 55 PA. CODE § 3290.4 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS).(4) A PROGRAM OF INSTRUCTION FOR THREE-YEAR-OLD, FOUR-YEAR-OLD, FIVE-YEAR-OLD OR SIX-YEAR-OLD STUDENTS, OTHER THAN KINDERGARTEN, THAT USES A CURRICULUM ALIGNED WITH THE CURRICULUM OF THE SCHOOL WITH WHICH IT IS AFFILIATED AND PROVIDES ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) A MINIMUM OF TWO HOURS OF INSTRUCTIONAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL ACTIVITIES PER DAY FOR AT LEAST 60 DAYS PER SCHOOL YEAR.20250HB1667PN3745 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) A MINIMUM OF TWO HOURS OF INSTRUCTIONAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL ACTIVITIES PER DAY FOR AT LEAST 20 DAYS OVER THE SUMMER RECESS."EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM." A PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES SCHOLARSHIPS TO ELIGIBLE EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENTS TO ATTEND AN EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM OPERATING WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH. THE TERM INCLUDES A PROGRAM THAT HAS AN APPLICATION AND REVIEW PROCESS FOR MAKING AWARDS TO ELIGIBLE EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENTS AND AWARDS SCHOLARSHIPS TO ELIGIBLE EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENTS WITHOUT LIMITING AVAILABILITY TO STUDENTS OF ONE SCHOOL OR ONE BUILDING WITHIN A SCHOOL DISTRICT OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL."EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENT." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) IS YOUNGER THAN COMPULSORY SCHOOL AGE AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1326 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949.(2) IS A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(3) ATTENDS AN EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM."ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM." A PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES SCHOLARSHIPS TO ELIGIBLE STUDENTS WHO MEET ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) RESIDE WITHIN THE ATTENDANCE BOUNDARY OF A LOW-ACHIEVING SCHOOL.(2) ATTEND A SCHOOL THAT IS ON THE LIST PUBLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION UNDER SECTION 1703-F(B)(3) OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949."EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM." AN ADVANCED ACADEMIC OR SIMILAR PROGRAM THAT IS OPERATED BY OR IN CONJUNCTION WITH A PUBLIC SCHOOL, INCLUDING A CHARTERED SCHOOL AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1376.1 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, A PRIVATE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SCHOOL APPROVED UNDER SECTION 1376 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949 OR AN INTERMEDIATE UNIT, IS NOT PART OF THE REGULAR ACADEMIC PROGRAM OF THE SCHOOL AND ENHANCES THE CURRICULUM OR ACADEMIC PROGRAM OF THE SCHOOL. THE TERM INCLUDES A PROGRAM OR ACTIVITY THAT OTHERWISE MEETS THIS DEFINITION AND HAS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING CHARACTERISTICS:(1) INTEGRATES WITH THE INSTRUCTIONAL PROGRAM OF THE SCHOOL.(2) SUPPLEMENTS, RECONSTRUCTS OR INVOLVES A MAJOR REVISION TO THE CURRICULUM OR ACADEMIC PROGRAM OF THE SCHOOL.(3) PROVIDES A DIFFERENT FOCUS, DELIVERY, METHODOLOGY OR SKILL TRAINING THAN IS PROVIDED IN A TYPICAL ACADEMIC PROGRAM OF THE SCHOOL, INCLUDING INTERNET-BASED AND DISTANCE LEARNING TECHNOLOGIES.(4) IS OFFERED SEPARATELY FROM THE SCHOOL CURRICULUM OR ACADEMIC PROGRAM.(5) IS OFFERED BEFORE OR AFTER SCHOOL HOURS, ON WEEKENDS, AS A YEAR-ROUND PROGRAM OR AS AN EXTENSION OF THE SCHOOL YEAR.(6) IS OFFERED AS A STANDARDS-BASED PROGRAM OF INSTRUCTION THAT OPERATES OUTSIDE OF THE LENGTH AND TIME REQUIREMENTS OF THE SCHOOL BUT MEETS THE MINIMUM HOURS OR DAYS OF INSTRUCTION REQUIRED BY STATE LAW.(7) USES SPECIALIZED INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS, INSTRUCTORS OR INSTRUCTION NOT PROVIDED BY THE SCHOOL.(8) USES INTERNSHIPS AND OTHER WORK-BASED LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES FOR A STUDENT THAT SUPPLEMENT THE STUDENT'S CURRICULUM OR ACADEMIC PROGRAM AND PROVIDE THE STUDENT WITH THE OPPORTUNITY TO APPLY THE KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS LEARNED IN THE ACADEMIC PROGRAM.20250HB1667PN3745 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) OFFERS INSTRUCTION OR PROGRAMMING THAT PROVIDES CREDITS OR ADVANCED PLACEMENT AT A TWO-YEAR OR FOUR-YEAR COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY AUTHORIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.(10) RECONFIGURES, RENOVATES OR EQUIPS A FACILITY OWNED BY A PUBLIC SCHOOL TO CREATE A SPECIALIZED ENVIRONMENT THAT IS INTEGRAL AND NECESSARY TO THE OPERATION OF AN EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM.(11) OFFERS A CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAM OR ANOTHER OCCUPATIONAL-ORIENTED PROGRAM APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION.(12) PROVIDES SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS OR SERVICES.(13) HAS ANY OTHER SIMILAR CHARACTERISTIC APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION."ELEMENTARY SCHOOL." A SCHOOL THAT IS NOT A SECONDARY SCHOOL."ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR." A BUSINESS FIRM OR PASS-THROUGH ENTITY."ELIGIBLE EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENT." AN EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENT, INCLUDING AN ELIGIBLE STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY, WHO IS ENROLLED IN AN EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM AND IS A MEMBER OF A HOUSEHOLD WITH A HOUSEHOLD INCOME OF NOT MORE THAN THE MAXIMUM ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME."ELIGIBLE NONPROFIT ENTITY." AN ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT FROM FEDERAL TAXATION UNDER SECTION 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986 (PUBLIC LAW 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(C)(3)) AND LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH."ELIGIBLE STUDENT." A SCHOOL-AGE STUDENT, INCLUDING AN ELIGIBLE STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY, WHO IS ENROLLED IN A SCHOOL AND IS A MEMBER OF A HOUSEHOLD WITH A HOUSEHOLD INCOME OF NOT 20250HB1667PN3745 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MORE THAN THE MAXIMUM ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME."ELIGIBLE STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY." AN EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENT OR SCHOOL-AGE STUDENT WHO MEETS ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) HAS BEEN IDENTIFIED, IN ACCORDANCE WITH 22 PA. CODE CH. 14 (RELATING TO SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES AND PROGRAMS), AS A CHILD WITH A DISABILITY AS DEFINED IN 34 CFR 300.8 (RELATING TO CHILD WITH A DISABILITY).(2) NEEDS SPECIAL EDUCATION AND RELATED SERVICES.(3) IS ENROLLED IN AN EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM OR IN A SCHOOL.(4) IS A MEMBER OF A HOUSEHOLD WITH A HOUSEHOLD INCOME OF NOT MORE THAN THE MAXIMUM ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME."FAMILY MEMBER." A PARENT, STEPPARENT, CHILD, STEPCHILD, SPOUSE, DOMESTIC PARTNER, BROTHER, SISTER, STEPBROTHER OR STEPSISTER."FISCAL YEAR." THE COMMONWEALTH'S FISCAL YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1 AND ENDING JUNE 30."HOUSEHOLD." AN INDIVIDUAL LIVING ALONE OR WITH ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) A SPOUSE.(2) A PARENT AND THE PARENT'S UNEMANCIPATED MINOR CHILDREN.(3) OTHER UNEMANCIPATED MINOR CHILDREN WHO ARE RELATED BY BLOOD OR MARRIAGE.(4) OTHER ADULTS OR UNEMANCIPATED MINOR CHILDREN LIVING IN THE HOUSEHOLD WHO ARE DEPENDENT UPON THE INDIVIDUAL."HOUSEHOLD INCOME." ALL MONEY OR PROPERTY RECEIVED OF WHATEVER NATURE AND FROM WHATEVER SOURCE DERIVED. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) PERIODIC PAYMENTS FOR SICKNESS AND DISABILITY OTHER 20250HB1667PN3745 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THAN REGULAR WAGES RECEIVED DURING A PERIOD OF SICKNESS OR DISABILITY.(2) DISABILITY, RETIREMENT OR OTHER PAYMENTS ARISING UNDER WORKERS' COMPENSATION ACTS, OCCUPATIONAL DISEASE ACTS AND SIMILAR LEGISLATION BY ANY GOVERNMENT.(3) PAYMENTS COMMONLY RECOGNIZED AS OLD-AGE OR RETIREMENT BENEFITS PAID TO AN INDIVIDUAL RETIRED FROM SERVICE AFTER REACHING A SPECIFIC AGE OR AFTER A STATED PERIOD OF EMPLOYMENT.(4) PAYMENTS COMMONLY KNOWN AS PUBLIC ASSISTANCE OR UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION PAYMENTS BY A GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY.(5) PAYMENTS TO REIMBURSE ACTUAL EXPENSES.(6) PAYMENTS MADE BY EMPLOYERS OR LABOR UNIONS FOR PROGRAMS COVERING HOSPITALIZATION, SICKNESS, DISABILITY OR DEATH, SUPPLEMENTAL UNEMPLOYMENT BENEFITS, STRIKE BENEFITS, SOCIAL SECURITY OR RETIREMENT.(7) COMPENSATION RECEIVED BY UNITED STATES SERVICEMEN SERVING IN A COMBAT ZONE.(8) PAYMENTS RECEIVED FROM A GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY TO RELIEVE THE ECONOMIC EFFECTS OF THE COVID-19 PANDEMIC."KINDERGARTEN." A ONE-YEAR FORMAL EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM THAT OCCURS DURING THE SCHOOL YEAR IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO FIRST GRADE. THE TERM INCLUDES A PART-TIME AND FULL-TIME PROGRAM."LOW-ACHIEVING SCHOOL." A PUBLIC SCHOOL THAT RANKED IN THE LOWEST 15% OF THE SCHOOL'S DESIGNATION AS AN ELEMENTARY SCHOOL OR A SECONDARY SCHOOL BASED ON COMBINED MATHEMATICS AND READING SCORES FROM THE ASSESSMENT ADMINISTERED IN ANY OF THE PREVIOUS FIVE SCHOOL YEARS AND FOR WHICH THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION HAS POSTED RESULTS ON THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A CHARTER 20250HB1667PN3745 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL OR CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL."MAXIMUM ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME." THE AMOUNT CALCULATED AS FOLLOWS:(1) SUBJECT TO ADJUSTMENT UNDER PARAGRAPHS (2), (3) AND (4), $120,000.(2) FOR EACH ELIGIBLE STUDENT, ELIGIBLE EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENT AND DEPENDENT MEMBER OF THE HOUSEHOLD , THE AMOUNT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) PLUS 10% OF THE AMOUNT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1).(3) FOR EACH ELIGIBLE STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY, THE AMOUNT CALCULATED BY MULTIPLYING THE APPLICABLE AMOUNT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) BY 1.5.(4) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ANNUALLY ADJUST THE INCOME AMOUNT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) BY THE PERCENTAGE CHANGE IN THE MINIMUM WAGE UNDER THE ACT OF JANUARY 17, 1968 (P.L.11, NO.5), KNOWN AS THE MINIMUM WAGE ACT OF 1968, FROM THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR."NONPUBLIC SCHOOL." A NONPROFIT SCHOOL, OTHER THAN A PUBLIC SCHOOL, IN WHICH A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH MAY LEGALLY FULFILL THE COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS ACT AND WHICH MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE VI OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 (PUBLIC LAW 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 ET SEQ.)."PARENT." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH AND MEETS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) HAS LEGAL CUSTODY OR GUARDIANSHIP OF A STUDENT.(2) KEEPS A STUDENT IN THE INDIVIDUAL'S HOME AND SUPPORTS THE STUDENT GRATIS AS IF THE STUDENT WERE A LINEAL DESCENDANT OF THE INDIVIDUAL."PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL." A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT IS 20250HB1667PN3745 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ELIGIBLE UNDER SECTION 1711-F TO ACCEPT RECIPIENTS."PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL." A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN A SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT IS ELIGIBLE UNDER SECTION 1711-F TO ACCEPT RECIPIENTS. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A LOW-ACHIEVING SCHOOL."PASS-THROUGH ENTITY." A PARTNERSHIP AS DEFINED IN SECTION 301(N.0), A SINGLE-MEMBER LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY TREATED AS A DISREGARDED ENTITY FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES OR A PENNSYLVANIA S CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 301(N.1). THE TERM INCLUDES A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY THAT OWNS AN INTEREST IN A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY. THE TERM INCLUDES A QUALIFIED SUBCHAPTER S TRUST. THE TERM INCLUDES A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY THE PURPOSE OF WHICH IS MAKING CONTRIBUTIONS UNDER THIS ARTICLE AND WHOSE SHAREHOLDERS, PARTNERS OR MEMBERS ARE COMPOSED OF OWNERS OR EMPLOYEES OF BUSINESS FIRMS."PUBLIC SCHOOL." A PUBLIC PREKINDERGARTEN AT WHICH COMPULSORY ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS DO NOT APPLY OR A PUBLIC KINDERGARTEN, ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, SECONDARY SCHOOL OR CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL AT WHICH THE COMPULSORY ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH MAY BE MET AND WHICH MEETS THE APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE VI OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 (PUBLIC LAW 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 ET SEQ.)."QUALIFIED SUBCHAPTER S TRUST." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1361(D) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986."RECIPIENT." AN APPLICANT WHO RECEIVES A SCHOLARSHIP."SCHOLARSHIP." AN AWARD UNDER A SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM OR EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM TO PAY TUITION AND SCHOOL-RELATED FEES TO ATTEND A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL, PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM."SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION." AN ELIGIBLE NONPROFIT 20250HB1667PN3745 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ENTITY THAT HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO OPERATE A SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM UNDER THIS ARTICLE."SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM." A PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES SCHOLARSHIPS TO ELIGIBLE STUDENTS TO ATTEND A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL OR PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH. THE TERM INCLUDES A PROGRAM THAT HAS AN APPLICATION AND REVIEW PROCESS FOR MAKING AWARDS TO ELIGIBLE STUDENTS AND AWARDS SCHOLARSHIPS TO ELIGIBLE STUDENTS WITHOUT LIMITING AVAILABILITY TO STUDENTS OF ONE SCHOOL OR ONE BUILDING WITHIN A SCHOOL DISTRICT OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL."SCHOOL." ANY OF THE FOLLOWING THAT MEETS THE APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE VI OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964:(1) A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC PREKINDERGARTEN.(2) A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC KINDERGARTEN, ELEMENTARY SCHOOL OR SECONDARY SCHOOL AT WHICH THE COMPULSORY ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH MAY BE MET."SCHOOL AGE." CHILDREN FROM THE EARLIEST ADMISSION AGE TO A SCHOOL'S KINDERGARTEN PROGRAM OR, IF NO PREKINDERGARTEN OR KINDERGARTEN PROGRAM IS PROVIDED, THE SCHOOL'S EARLIEST ADMISSION AGE FOR BEGINNERS, UNTIL THE END OF THE SCHOOL YEAR IN WHICH THE STUDENT ATTAINS 21 YEARS OF AGE OR GRADUATES FROM HIGH SCHOOL, WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST."SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE." THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IN WHICH A STUDENT'S PRIMARY DOMICILE IS LOCATED."SCHOOL-RELATED FEES." FEES CHARGED BY A SCHOOL TO ALL STUDENTS FOR BOOKS, INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS, TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT AND SERVICES, UNIFORMS, ACTIVITIES AND CONCURRENT ENROLLMENT PROGRAMS UNDER ARTICLE XVI-B OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL 20250HB1667PN3745 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CODE OF 1949."SECONDARY SCHOOL." A SCHOOL WITH AN ELEVENTH GRADE."STUDENT." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) IS SCHOOL AGE.(2) IS A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(3) ATTENDS OR IS ABOUT TO ATTEND A SCHOOL."TAX YEAR." A TAXPAYER'S ANNUAL ACCOUNTING PERIOD OR, IF A RETURN IS MADE FOR A PERIOD OF LESS THAN 12 MONTHS, THE PERIOD FOR WHICH THE RETURN IS MADE.SECTION 1703-F. ADMINISTRATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY.(A) DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:(1) ESTABLISH GUIDELINES NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS ARTICLE.(2) ESTABLISH THE PROCESS THROUGH WHICH AND CRITERIA BY WHICH AN ELIGIBLE NONPROFIT ENTITY MAY APPLY AND RECEIVE APPROVAL TO OPERATE AS A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION.(3) DEVELOP GUIDELINES, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, FOR THE ELIGIBILITY OF AN EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM.(4) ESTABLISH THE PROCESS THROUGH WHICH AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR MAY APPLY FOR A TAX CREDIT UNDER SECTION 1705-F.(5) BY JANUARY 1 OF EACH YEAR, PUBLISH A LIST OF SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS APPROVED TO OPERATE DURING THE FOLLOWING FISCAL YEAR.(6) MONITOR SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE AND PUBLISH COMPLIANCE INFORMATION ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE IN A DOWNLOADABLE SPREADSHEET FORMAT.(7) PUBLISH REPORTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1713-20250HB1667PN3745 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 F(E).(8) NO LATER THAN NOVEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH NOVEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, PUBLISH A LIST IN A DOWNLOADABLE SPREADSHEET FORMAT ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF EACH ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR MADE UNDER THIS ARTICLE BY SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION AND BY PROGRAM CATEGORY, INCLUDING SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM, AS APPLICABLE.(B) DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.--THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:(1) PUBLISH THE LISTS OF PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS AND PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOLS UNDER SECTION 1711-F ON THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE IN A DOWNLOADABLE SPREADSHEET FORMAT.(2) ANNUALLY PUBLISH A LIST OF LOW-ACHIEVING SCHOOLS UNDER SECTION 1710-F ON THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE IN A DOWNLOADABLE SPREADSHEET FORMAT.(3) FOR THE PURPOSES OF ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMS, ANNUALLY DETERMINE AND PUBLISH A LIST OF PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS THAT MEET BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:(I) THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL IS LOCATED IN A ZIP CODE WITH A MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME, BASED ON THE MOST RECENT CENSUS DATA, OF LESS THAN HALF THE MAXIMUM ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME.(II) THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL HAS A 20250HB1667PN3745 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TUITION RATE BELOW THE MEDIAN TUITION RATE BASED ON DATA SUBMITTED UNDER SECTION 1711-F.(C) DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.--THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:(1) REVIEW APPLICATIONS AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 1705-F.(2) NO LATER THAN NOVEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH NOVEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, PROVIDE THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WITH A LIST OF THE 10 SHAREHOLDERS, PARTNERS OR MEMBERS OF PASS-THROUGH ENTITIES WITH THE HIGHEST AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF CONTRIBUTIONS UNDER THIS ARTICLE FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.(3) BY JUNE 30 OF EACH YEAR, PROVIDE THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WITH A LIST OF THE 10 SHAREHOLDERS, PARTNERS OR MEMBERS OF PASS-THROUGH ENTITIES WITH THE HIGHEST AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF CONTRIBUTIONS UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(D) DUTIES OF AUDITOR GENERAL.--THE AUDITOR GENERAL SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:(1) CONDUCT A COMPLIANCE AUDIT OF THE AFFAIRS AND ACTIVITIES OF A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION.(2) CONDUCT A COMPLIANCE AUDIT OF A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL RELATED TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SECTION 1711-F.(3) PUBLISH THE AUDITS UNDER PARAGRAPHS (1) AND (2) ON THE AUDITOR GENERAL'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.(E) DUTIES OF INDEPENDENT FISCAL OFFICE.--THE INDEPENDENT FISCAL OFFICE SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:(1) BEGINNING WITH INFORMATION REPORTED FOR THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR, PUBLISH ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE A REPORT OF A REVIEW OF THE EDUCATION OPTIONS TAX CREDIT ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS ARTICLE EVERY FIVE YEARS.20250HB1667PN3745 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) INCLUDE ALL OF THE FOLLOWING IN THE REPORT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1):(I) THE COSTS OF PROVIDING THE TAX CREDIT, INCLUDING ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS TO THE COMMONWEALTH AND LOST REVENUES TO THE COMMONWEALTH.(II) AN ANALYSIS OF ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS BY CONTRIBUTIONS MADE, REGION AND TYPE.(III) AN ANALYSIS OF SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS BY CONTRIBUTIONS RECEIVED, REGION AND TYPE OF PROGRAM SUPPORTED.(IV) AN ANALYSIS OF THE DATA REPORTED UNDER SECTION 1713-F.(V) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, AN ANALYSIS OF CHANGES IN EDUCATIONAL OUTCOMES.(VI) RECOMMENDATIONS ON HOW THE TAX CREDIT COULD BE MORE EFFICIENTLY IMPLEMENTED OR EVALUATED.(F) ACCOUNT.--(1) THE ACCOUNTABILITY FOR DIVERTED TAX DOLLARS RESTRICTED ACCOUNT IS ESTABLISHED AS A RESTRICTED ACCOUNT IN THE GENERAL FUND.(2) MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT IS APPROPRIATED ON A CONTINUING BASIS AS FOLLOWS:(I) 40% TO THE DEPARTMENT TO OFFSET COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH ADMINISTERING THIS ARTICLE.(II) 20% TO THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE TO OFFSET COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH ADMINISTERING THIS ARTICLE.(III) 20% TO THE AUDITOR GENERAL TO OFFSET THE COSTS OF CONDUCTING AUDITS UNDER SUBSECTION (D).(IV) 20% TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION TO OFFSET COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH ADMINISTERING THIS ARTICLE.20250HB1667PN3745 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) THE STATE TREASURER MAY ACCEPT APPROPRIATIONS, TRANSFERS, GIFTS, DONATIONS, LEGACIES OR OTHER REVENUES, INCLUDING ALLOWABLE FEDERAL FUNDS, FOR DEPOSIT INTO THE ACCOUNT. INTEREST THAT ACCRUES IN THE ACCOUNT SHALL REMAIN IN THE ACCOUNT.SECTION 1704-F. SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS.(A) REQUIREMENTS.--(1) A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:(I) CONTRIBUTE AT LEAST 90% OF ITS ANNUAL CASH RECEIPTS TO A SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM, OR CONTRIBUTE AT LEAST 85% OF ITS ANNUAL CASH RECEIPTS IF THE SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION REPORTS AN ANNUAL INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE PROGRAM EXPENSE PERCENTAGE OF GREATER THAN 90% ON THE SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION'S INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE FORM 990 FILING.(II) PROVIDE AN APPLICATION AND REVIEW PROCESS FOR SCHOLARSHIP APPLICANTS THAT INCLUDES A MEANS OF VERIFYING HOUSEHOLD INCOME, WHICH MAY INCLUDE SUBMISSION OF THE HOUSEHOLD MEMBERS' MOST RECENTLY AVAILABLE FEDERAL OR STATE TAX RETURNS, IF THE HOUSEHOLD MEMBERS ARE REQUIRED TO FILE THE RETURNS.(III) REFRAIN FROM EARMARKING A CONTRIBUTION BY AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR FOR A SPECIFIC STUDENT.(IV) REFRAIN FROM PROVIDING A SCHOLARSHIP TO A FAMILY MEMBER OF A PERSON RECEIVING COMPENSATION FROM OR INVOLVED IN THE GOVERNANCE OF THE SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION.20250HB1667PN3745 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (V) REFRAIN FROM AWARDING A SCHOLARSHIP TO AN APPLICANT FOR ENROLLMENT IN A HOME EDUCATION PROGRAM UNDER SECTION 1327.1 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949.(VI) REFRAIN FROM AWARDING A SCHOLARSHIP TO AN APPLICANT TO ATTEND A SCHOOL THAT IS NOT ON THE LIST UNDER SECTION 1711-F.(VII) TIMELY REPORT THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 1713-F TO THE DEPARTMENT.(VIII) REMIT 2% OF ITS TOTAL CONTRIBUTIONS UNDER THIS ARTICLE TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR DEPOSIT INTO THE ACCOUNT.(IX) MAINTAIN SEPARATE ACCOUNTS IN ITS BUDGET TO FACILITATE MONITORING AND AUDITING OF THE USE OF CONTRIBUTIONS.(2) FOR PURPOSES OF PARAGRAPH (1)(I), A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION CONTRIBUTES ITS ANNUAL CASH RECEIPTS TO A SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM WHEN THE SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION EXPENDS OR OTHERWISE IRREVOCABLY ENCUMBERS THE FUNDS FOR DISTRIBUTION DURING THE THEN-CURRENT FISCAL YEAR OF THE SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION OR DURING THE NEXT SUCCEEDING FISCAL YEAR OF THE SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION.(B) ALLOWABLE USES FOR CONTRIBUTIONS NOT USED TO FUND SCHOLARSHIPS OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS.--A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION MAY USE CONTRIBUTIONS NOT USED TO FUND SCHOLARSHIPS OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) OVERHEAD COSTS DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ADMINISTRATION OF A SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM, INCLUDING ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) PERSONNEL COSTS FOR EMPLOYEES WHO WORK REGULARLY IN THE COMMONWEALTH.(II) OPERATIONAL COSTS FOR OFFICE SPACE LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(2) PAYMENT FOR THIRD-PARTY HOUSEHOLD INCOME VALIDATION RELATED TO MAXIMUM ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME REQUIREMENTS.(3) ANOTHER USE DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE.(C) NONCOMPLIANCE.--A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION, INCLUDING ITS SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION, THAT FAILS TO COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (A) OR USES CONTRIBUTIONS FOR A PURPOSE NOT AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) MAY NOT PARTICIPATE IN THE EDUCATION OPTIONS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM FOR THE TWO FISCAL YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION FAILED TO MEET THE REQUIREMENT.SECTION 1705-F. APPLICATION BY ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS.(A) APPLICATION.--(1) AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR SHALL APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT ON A FORM AND IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR AN EDUCATION OPTIONS TAX CREDIT FOR CONTRIBUTIONS TO A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION UNDER SECTION 1706-F.(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ACCEPT APPLICATIONS FOR TAX CREDITS AVAILABLE DURING A FISCAL YEAR NO EARLIER THAN JULY 1 OF EACH FISCAL YEAR.(3) AT A MINIMUM, THE APPLICATION MUST INCLUDE THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR'S NAME, ADDRESS, STATUS AS A BUSINESS FIRM OR PASS-THROUGH ENTITY AND CONTRIBUTION AMOUNT BY PROGRAM UNDER SECTION 1707-F(A).(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE TAX CREDITS UNDER THIS ARTICLE AVAILABLE ON A FIRST-COME, FIRST-SERVED BASIS WITHIN THE LIMITATION SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 1707-F(A).(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN A WAITING LIST CONSISTING OF EACH ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR THAT CHOOSES TO BE INCLUDED ON THE LIST AND WHOSE APPLICATION HAS NOT BEEN CONDITIONALLY APPROVED BECAUSE ALL AVAILABLE TAX CREDITS HAVE BEEN AWARDED.(B) REVIEW.--(1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE WITH THE LIST OF ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS THAT SUBMITTED AN APPLICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A).(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL CONDUCT COMPLIANCE CHECKS ON THE ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS SUBMITTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) AND TAKE THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS:(I) IF THE TAXPAYER IS COMPLIANT, COMMUNICATE A CLEARANCE STATUS TO THE DEPARTMENT.(II) IF THE TAXPAYER IS NOT COMPLIANT, ISSUE A NONCOMPLIANCE LETTER TO THE TAXPAYER AND PROVIDE THE TAXPAYER WITH A REASONABLE OPPORTUNITY TO RESOLVE THE COMPLIANCE ISSUE.(III) IF THE TAXPAYER DOES NOT RESOLVE THE COMPLIANCE ISSUE, COMMUNICATE A FINAL NONCOMPLIANCE STATUS TO THE DEPARTMENT, AND THE TAXPAYER SHALL BE INELIGIBLE FOR THE TAX CREDIT.(C) CONDITIONAL APPROVAL.--20250HB1667PN3745 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS UNDER SECTIONS 1706-F AND 1707-F, UPON RECEIPT OF A CLEARANCE STATUS UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I), THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR THAT CONDITIONAL CREDITS HAVE BEEN RESERVED AND SHALL INFORM THE ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR OF THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (D).(2) UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUESTED BY THE ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR AND AGREED TO BY THE ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR AND THE DEPARTMENT, AND UNLESS ALL AUTHORIZED CREDITS HAVE ALREADY BEEN AWARDED, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL GIVE WRITTEN NOTICE OF ITS CONDITIONAL APPROVAL TO EACH ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR THAT SUBMITTED A COMPLETED APPLICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) BY AUGUST 30, OR 30 DAYS FOLLOWING RECEIPT OF THE COMPLETED APPLICATION, WHICHEVER IS LATER.(3) IF THE DEPARTMENT FAILS FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 10 DAYS TO TIMELY TRANSMIT A WRITTEN NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE AFFECTED ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR INJUNCTIVE OR OTHER APPROPRIATE RELIEF IN COMMONWEALTH COURT.(D) CONTRIBUTIONS.--TO RECEIVE A TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS ARTICLE, AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR SHALL MAKE THE CONTRIBUTION TO A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION THAT APPEARS ON THE LIST REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 1703-F(A)(5) NO LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE CONDITIONAL APPROVAL NOTICE RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (C).(E) PROOF OF CONTRIBUTION.--(1) AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR SHALL PROVIDE PROOF OF CONTRIBUTION TO THE DEPARTMENT ON A FORM AND IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(2) IF AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR DOES NOT MAKE A MINIMUM 20250HB1667PN3745 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF 50% OF THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE CONDITIONALLY APPROVED CONTRIBUTION, THE ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR'S TAX CREDIT APPLICATION MAY NOT BE APPROVED IN THE IMMEDIATELY SUCCEEDING FISCAL YEAR.(3) UPON RECEIVING SATISFACTORY PROOF OF CONTRIBUTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.(F) REALLOCATION.--UNAWARDED TAX CREDITS MAY NOT BE REALLOCATED TO ANY OF THE CATEGORIES OF PROGRAMS.(G) APPLICATION IN THE ALTERNATIVE.--AT THE TIME OF APPLICATION FOR A TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS ARTICLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADVISE AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR THAT THE ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR MAY ELECT THAT ITS APPLICATION FOR A PARTICULAR TAX CREDIT WILL, IN THE ALTERNATIVE, BE DEEMED AN APPLICATION RECEIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT ON THE SAME DATE AS THE PREFERRED APPLICATION, BUT FOR A DIFFERENT TAX CREDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS ARTICLE IF THE ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR'S PREFERRED CHOICE OF TAX CREDIT IS NOT AVAILABLE. IF AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR DOES NOT RECEIVE ITS PREFERRED CHOICE OF TAX CREDIT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROMPTLY CONSIDER THE ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR'S ALTERNATIVE APPLICATION FOR A DIFFERENT TAX CREDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.SECTION 1706-F. TAX CREDITS.(A) AWARD.--IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1707-F, THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL GRANT A TAX CREDIT AGAINST AN APPLICABLE TAX TO AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR FOR WHICH THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE HAS RECEIVED NOTICE UNDER SECTION 1705-F(E)(3) AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE TAX CREDIT SHALL NOT EXCEED 75% OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT CONTRIBUTED DURING THE TAX YEAR BY AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR TO A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION FOR A 20250HB1667PN3745 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM.(2) THE TAX CREDIT SHALL NOT EXCEED 90% OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT CONTRIBUTED DURING THE TAX YEAR BY AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR TO A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION FOR AN EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM.(3) THE TAX CREDIT SHALL NOT EXCEED 99% OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT CONTRIBUTED DURING THE TAX YEAR BY AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR TO A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION FOR AN ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM.(4) THE TAX CREDIT SHALL NOT EXCEED $750,000 ANNUALLY PER ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR FOR CONTRIBUTIONS MADE TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS FOR SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMS, EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMS OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS.(5) SUBJECT TO SECTION 1707-F(A)(4) AND (C), NO ANNUAL LIMIT PER ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR SHALL APPLY TO CONTRIBUTIONS MADE TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS FOR ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMS.(B) COMBINATION OF TAX CREDITS.--IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1707-F, AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR MAY RECEIVE TAX CREDITS FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE IN A TAX YEAR FOR ANY COMBINATION OF CONTRIBUTIONS TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS. AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR MAY NOT RECEIVE TAX CREDITS IN A TAX YEAR IN EXCESS OF $750,000 FOR COMBINED CONTRIBUTIONS TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS FOR SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMS, EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMS OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS.(C) PASS-THROUGH ENTITY.--(1) A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY MAY ELECT IN WRITING TO DISTRIBUTE FOR NO CONSIDERATION ALL OR A PORTION OF THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CREDIT TO SHAREHOLDERS, MEMBERS OR PARTNERS IN PROPORTION TO THE PERCENTAGE INTEREST OF THE SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER IN DISTRIBUTIONS FROM THE PASS-THROUGH ENTITY. THE SHAREHOLDERS, MEMBERS OR PARTNERS MAY USE THE CREDITS IN THE TAX YEAR IN WHICH THE CONTRIBUTION IS MADE OR IN THE TAX YEAR IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE YEAR IN WHICH THE CONTRIBUTION IS MADE. THE ELECTION SHALL DESIGNATE THE TAX YEAR IN WHICH THE DISTRIBUTED CREDITS ARE TO BE USED AND SHALL BE MADE ACCORDING TO PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY THAT RECEIVED A DISTRIBUTION FROM A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY MAKE A DISTRIBUTION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.(2) A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY AND A SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER OF A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY MAY NOT CLAIM THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE SAME CONTRIBUTION.(3) A SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER MAY NOT CARRY FORWARD, CARRY BACK, OBTAIN A REFUND OF, SELL OR ASSIGN THE CREDIT.(4) AN INDIVIDUAL SHAREHOLDER, PARTNER OR MEMBER MAY APPLY A CREDIT DISTRIBUTED UNDER THIS SECTION TO INCOME TAXABLE UNDER ARTICLE III TO THE SHAREHOLDER, PARTNER OR MEMBER, TO THE SPOUSE OF THE SHAREHOLDER, PARTNER OR MEMBER OR TO BOTH, IF BOTH THE SHAREHOLDER, PARTNER OR MEMBER AND THE SPOUSE REPORT INCOME ON A JOINT PERSONAL INCOME TAX RETURN.(D) RESTRICTION.--NO CREDIT GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE APPLIED AGAINST A TAX WITHHELD BY AN EMPLOYER FROM AN EMPLOYEE UNDER ARTICLE III.SECTION 1707-F. LIMITATIONS.(A) AMOUNT.--THE TOTAL AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF ALL TAX CREDITS 20250HB1667PN3745 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 APPROVED FOR CONTRIBUTIONS FROM ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS SHALL NOT EXCEED $705,000,000 IN THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER. THE TOTAL AGGREGATE AMOUNT SHALL BE ALLOCATED AS FOLLOWS:(1) NO LESS THAN $375,000,000 OF THE TOTAL AGGREGATE AMOUNT SHALL BE USED TO PROVIDE TAX CREDITS FOR CONTRIBUTIONS FROM ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS FOR SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMS.(2) NO LESS THAN $74,500,000 OF THE TOTAL AGGREGATE AMOUNT SHALL BE USED TO PROVIDE TAX CREDITS FOR CONTRIBUTIONS FROM ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS FOR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS.(3) NO LESS THAN $30,500,000 OF THE TOTAL AGGREGATE AMOUNT SHALL BE USED TO PROVIDE TAX CREDITS FOR CONTRIBUTIONS FROM ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS FOR EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMS.(4) NO LESS THAN $225,000,000 OF THE TOTAL AGGREGATE AMOUNT SHALL BE USED TO PROVIDE TAX CREDITS FOR CONTRIBUTIONS FROM ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS FOR ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMS.(B) ACTIVITIES.--NO TAX CREDIT MAY BE APPROVED FOR ACTIVITIES THAT ARE A PART OF AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR'S NORMAL COURSE OF BUSINESS.(C) TAX LIABILITY.--(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2), A TAX CREDIT GRANTED FOR A TAX YEAR MAY NOT EXCEED THE TAX LIABILITY OF AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR.(2) IN THE CASE OF A CREDIT GRANTED TO A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY WHICH ELECTS TO DISTRIBUTE THE CREDIT UNDER SECTION 20250HB1667PN3745 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1706-F(C), A TAX CREDIT GRANTED FOR A TAX YEAR AND DISTRIBUTED TO A SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER MAY NOT EXCEED THE TAX LIABILITY OF THE SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER.(D) TAX CREDIT USE.--A TAX CREDIT NOT USED BY AN ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTOR IN THE TAX YEAR THE CONTRIBUTION WAS MADE OR IN THE TAX YEAR DESIGNATED UNDER SECTION 1706-F(C) MAY NOT BE CARRIED FORWARD OR CARRIED BACK AND IS NOT REFUNDABLE OR TRANSFERABLE.SECTION 1708-F. SCHOLARSHIPS.(A) NONTAXABLE INCOME.--A RECIPIENT'S SCHOLARSHIP SHALL NOT BE CONSIDERED TAXABLE INCOME FOR PURPOSES OF ARTICLE III.(B) FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE.--A RECIPIENT'S SCHOLARSHIP SHALL NOT CONSTITUTE AN APPROPRIATION OR FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO THE SCHOOL OR EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM ATTENDED BY THE RECIPIENT.(C) AMOUNT.--THE COMBINED AMOUNT OF THE SCHOLARSHIP AWARDED TO A RECIPIENT AND ADDITIONAL FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED TO THE RECIPIENT MAY NOT EXCEED THE TUITION RATE AND SCHOOL-RELATED FEES FOR THE PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL OR PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT THE RECIPIENT ATTENDS OR WILL ATTEND.SECTION 1709-F. EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS.A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION MAY PROVIDE FUNDS TO AN EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.SECTION 1710-F. LOW-ACHIEVING SCHOOLS.(A) LIST.--BY FEBRUARY 1 OF EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL PUBLISH ON THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE A LIST OF THE LOW-ACHIEVING SCHOOLS FOR THE FOLLOWING SCHOOL YEAR.(B) NOTICE.--BY FEBRUARY 1 OF EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT OF 20250HB1667PN3745 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EDUCATION SHALL NOTIFY EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT IDENTIFIED AS HAVING AT LEAST ONE LOW-ACHIEVING SCHOOL AND SHALL FURNISH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT WITH A LIST OF THE LOW-ACHIEVING SCHOOLS LOCATED WITHIN THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.(C) AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP.--(1) A RECIPIENT WHO WAS ENROLLED IN THE RECIPIENT'S SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE OR IN A CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL OR CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL WHEN THE RECIPIENT FIRST RECEIVED A SCHOLARSHIP UNDER AN ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM SHALL CONTINUE TO BE COUNTED IN THE AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT FOR ONE YEAR AFTER ENROLLING IN A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL OR PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.(2) DURING THE YEAR REFERENCED IN PARAGRAPH (1) AND EACH SCHOOL YEAR THEREAFTER, A SCHOOL DISTRICT OF A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL IN WHICH THE RECIPIENT IS ENROLLED MAY NOT INCLUDE THE RECIPIENT IN THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP.SECTION 1711-F. SCHOOL PARTICIPATION IN PROGRAM.(A) NOTICE.--(1) BY NOVEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR, A SCHOOL DISTRICT WITH A PUBLIC SCHOOL THAT WISHES TO BE A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL FOR THE FOLLOWING FISCAL YEAR SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION. THE NOTIFICATION MUST INCLUDE ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) EACH SCHOOL WITHIN THE SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT THE SCHOOL DISTRICT INTENDS TO MAKE A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL.(II) THE AMOUNT OF TUITION AND SCHOOL-RELATED FEES ATTRIBUTABLE TO EACH AVAILABLE SEAT. THE AMOUNT UNDER 20250HB1667PN3745 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THIS SUBPARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT CALCULATED UNDER SECTION 2561 OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949 . (2) BY NOVEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR, A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT WISHES TO BE A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL FOR THE FOLLOWING FISCAL YEAR SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, ON A FORM DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE AMOUNT OF TUITION AND SCHOOL-RELATED FEES ATTRIBUTABLE TO EACH AVAILABLE SEAT FOR THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL FOR THE CURRENT SCHOOL YEAR.(II) THE COMPLETE LIST OF APPLICATION AND ADMISSIONS REQUIREMENTS USED BY THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL TO DETERMINE WHETHER A STUDENT IS ACCEPTED TO ENROLL IN THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.(III) THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL'S INSTITUTIONAL FINANCIAL AID POLICY.(IV) THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL'S POLICIES REGARDING THE EXPULSION AND SUSPENSION OF PUPILS.(V) THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL'S TOTAL ENROLLMENT FOR THE PREVIOUS SCHOOL YEAR.(VI) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO APPLIED AND WERE NOT ACCEPTED TO ENROLL IN THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE PREVIOUS SCHOOL YEAR.(VII) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO WERE UNENROLLED FROM THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL AT THE INITIATION OF THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE PREVIOUS SCHOOL YEAR, NOT INCLUDING STUDENTS WHO GRADUATED.(B) LIST.--BY JANUARY 1 OF EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT OF 20250HB1667PN3745 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EDUCATION SHALL PUBLISH ON THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE THE COMPLETE LIST OF PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOLS AND PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS THAT PROVIDED SATISFACTORY NOTICE AND INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A). THE PUBLISHED LIST SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:(1) AN ELIGIBLE STUDENT MAY NOT RECEIVE A SCHOLARSHIP TO ATTEND A SCHOOL THAT IS NOT ON THE LIST.(2) THE LIST SHALL INCLUDE THE INFORMATION PROVIDED BY EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1).(3) THE LIST SHALL INCLUDE THE INFORMATION PROVIDED BY EACH NONPUBLIC SCHOOL UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2).(4) THE LIST MAY NOT INCLUDE A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT DISCRIMINATES ON A BASIS THAT IS ILLEGAL UNDER TITLE VI OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 (PUBLIC LAW 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 ET SEQ.).(C) PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL CRITERIA.--THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA SHALL APPLY TO A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL:(1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS ARTICLE, A SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL ENROLL STUDENTS IN A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL ON A LOTTERY BASIS FROM A POOL OF RECIPIENTS WHO MEET THE APPLICATION DEADLINE SET BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION UNTIL THE PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL FILLS THE SCHOOL'S AVAILABLE SEATS. THE POOL MAY NOT INCLUDE A RECIPIENT WHO:(I) HAS BEEN EXPELLED OR IS IN THE PROCESS OF BEING EXPELLED UNDER SECTION 1317.2, 1318 OR 1318.1 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949 AND APPLICABLE REGULATIONS OF THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION.(II) HAS BEEN RECRUITED BY THE SCHOOL DISTRICT OR 20250HB1667PN3745 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ITS REPRESENTATIVES FOR ATHLETIC PURPOSES.(2) ENROLLMENT OF RECIPIENTS MAY NOT PLACE THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IN VIOLATION OF A VALID AND BINDING DESEGREGATION ORDER.(3) PRIORITY SHALL BE GIVEN TO:(I) AN EXISTING RECIPIENT.(II) A RECIPIENT WHO IS A SIBLING OF A STUDENT CURRENTLY ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.(D) PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL CRITERIA.--THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA SHALL APPLY TO A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL:(1) THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL MAY NOT DISCRIMINATE ON A BASIS WHICH IS ILLEGAL UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAWS APPLICABLE TO NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS.(2) THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL COMPLY WITH SECTION 1521 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949.(3) THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR ITS REPRESENTATIVES MAY NOT RECRUIT A STUDENT FOR ATHLETIC PURPOSES.(E) STUDENT RULES, POLICIES AND PROCEDURES.--(1) PRIOR TO ENROLLMENT OF A RECIPIENT, A SCHOOL DISTRICT OF A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL OR A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL INFORM THE RECIPIENT'S PARENT OF THE RULES, POLICIES AND PROCEDURES OF THE PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL OR PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, INCLUDING ACADEMIC POLICIES, DISCIPLINARY RULES AND ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURES OF THE PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL OR PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.(2) ENROLLMENT OF A RECIPIENT IN A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL OR PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL CONSTITUTE ACCEPTANCE OF THE RULES, POLICIES AND PROCEDURES OF THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL OR PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.(F) TRANSPORTATION.--(1) TRANSPORTATION OF RECIPIENTS SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE EXTENT REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 1361 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949.(2) REIMBURSEMENT SHALL BE AS FOLLOWS:(I) TRANSPORTATION OF A RECIPIENT ATTENDING A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL BE SUBJECT TO REIMBURSEMENT UNDER SECTION 2541 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949.(II) TRANSPORTATION OF A RECIPIENT ATTENDING A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL BE SUBJECT TO REIMBURSEMENT UNDER SECTIONS 2509.3 AND 2541 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949.(G) INSTITUTIONAL FINANCIAL AID.--A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL MAY NOT USE A RECIPIENT'S SCHOLARSHIP AWARD TO REDUCE OR SUPPLANT THE AMOUNT OF INSTITUTIONAL FINANCIAL AID PROVIDED BY THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, EXCEPT IF THE RECIPIENT'S SCHOLARSHIP AWARD EXCEEDS THE RECIPIENT'S TOTAL COST OF TUITION AND SCHOOL-RELATED FEES.(H) TUITION RATES.--(1) A SCHOOL DISTRICT OF A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY NOT CHARGE A RECIPIENT A HIGHER TUITION RATE OR SCHOOL-RELATED FEE THAN THE SCHOOL DISTRICT WOULD HAVE CHARGED TO A SIMILARLY SITUATED STUDENT WHO IS NOT RECEIVING A SCHOLARSHIP.(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 2561 OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, A SCHOOL DISTRICT OF A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY CHARGE A RECIPIENT A TUITION RATE THAT IS LOWER 20250HB1667PN3745 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THAN THAT CHARGED TO A STUDENT WHO IS NOT RECEIVING A SCHOLARSHIP.(3) A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL MAY NOT CHARGE A RECIPIENT A HIGHER TUITION RATE OR SCHOOL-RELATED FEE THAN THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL WOULD HAVE CHARGED TO A SIMILARLY SITUATED STUDENT WHO IS NOT RECEIVING A SCHOLARSHIP.(I) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO:(1) PROHIBIT A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL FROM LIMITING ADMISSION TO A PARTICULAR GRADE LEVEL, A SINGLE GENDER OR AREAS OF CONCENTRATION OF THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, INCLUDING MATHEMATICS, SCIENCE AND THE ARTS.(2) AUTHORIZE THE COMMONWEALTH OR AN AGENCY, OFFICER OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE COMMONWEALTH TO IMPOSE AN ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENT ON A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT IS NOT OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS ARTICLE OR OTHER LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH OR TO REQUIRE A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL TO ENROLL A RECIPIENT IF THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL DOES NOT OFFER APPROPRIATE PROGRAMS, IS NOT STRUCTURED OR EQUIPPED WITH THE NECESSARY FACILITIES TO MEET THE RECIPIENT'S SPECIAL NEEDS OR DOES NOT OFFER A PARTICULAR PROGRAM REQUESTED.SECTION 1712-F. ORIGINAL JURISDICTION.THE PENNSYLVANIA SUPREME COURT SHALL HAVE EXCLUSIVE AND ORIGINAL JURISDICTION TO HEAR A CHALLENGE OR TO RENDER A DECLARATORY JUDGMENT CONCERNING THE CONSTITUTIONALITY OF THIS ARTICLE. THE PENNSYLVANIA SUPREME COURT MAY TAKE AN ACTION THE COURT DEEMS APPROPRIATE, CONSISTENT WITH THE PENNSYLVANIA 20250HB1667PN3745 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUPREME COURT'S RETAINING JURISDICTION OVER THE MATTER, TO FIND FACTS OR TO EXPEDITE A FINAL JUDGMENT IN CONNECTION WITH A CHALLENGE OR REQUEST FOR DECLARATORY RELIEF.SECTION 1713-F. REPORTING.(A) PROGRAMS PROVIDING SCHOLARSHIPS .-- EACH SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION THAT OPERATES A SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM OR EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM SHALL ANNUALLY REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT, BY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM AND EARLY CHILDHOOD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM, ALL OF THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION BASED ON THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR BY OCTOBER 1 OF EACH YEAR:(1) THE NUMBER OF SCHOLARSHIPS AWARDED TO APPLICANTS WITH A HOUSEHOLD INCOME THAT DOES NOT EXCEED 50% OF THE MAXIMUM ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME, DISAGGREGATED BY PROGRAM CATEGORY.(2) THE NUMBER OF SCHOLARSHIPS AWARDED TO APPLICANTS WITH A HOUSEHOLD INCOME THAT IS GREATER THAN 50% BUT DOES NOT EXCEED 75% OF THE MAXIMUM ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME, DISAGGREGATED BY PROGRAM CATEGORY.(3) THE NUMBER OF SCHOLARSHIPS AWARDED TO APPLICANTS WITH A HOUSEHOLD INCOME THAT IS GREATER THAN 75% BUT DOES NOT EXCEED 100% OF THE MAXIMUM ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME, DISAGGREGATED BY PROGRAM CATEGORY.(4) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF CONTRIBUTIONS RECEIVED FROM ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS GRANTED A TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS ARTICLE DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.(5) FOR EACH SCHOLARSHIP AWARDED TO AN APPLICANT:(I) AN INDICATOR OF WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WAS AN ELIGIBLE EARLY CHILDHOOD STUDENT, ELIGIBLE STUDENT OR 20250HB1667PN3745 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ELIGIBLE STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY.(II) AN INDICATOR OF WHETHER THE RECIPIENT WAS IN AN EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM, IN GRADES KINDERGARTEN THROUGH 8 OR IN GRADES 9 THROUGH 12.(III) THE DOLLAR AMOUNT OF THE SCHOLARSHIP AWARD.(IV) THE DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TUITION AND SCHOOL-RELATED FEES PAID BY THE STUDENT AFTER THE SCHOLARSHIP AWARD WAS APPLIED.(V) THE YEAR IN WHICH THE SCHOLARSHIP AWARD WAS USED.(VI) THE NAME OF THE RECIPIENT'S SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE.(VII) THE NAME OF THE SCHOOL OR EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM THAT THE RECIPIENT ATTENDED.(B) EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS.--EACH SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION THAT OPERATES AN EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM SHALL ANNUALLY REPORT THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION BASED ON THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR TO THE DEPARTMENT BY OCTOBER 1 OF EACH YEAR:(1) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF CONTRIBUTIONS RECEIVED FROM ELIGIBLE CONTRIBUTORS GRANTED A TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS ARTICLE DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.(2) A DESCRIPTION OF EACH EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM SUPPORTED BY THE SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION.(3) THE AMOUNT DISTRIBUTED TO EACH EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM SUPPORTED BY THE SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION.(C) SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS.--EACH SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION SHALL ANNUALLY REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT, BASED ON THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR, THE USE OF 20250HB1667PN3745 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONTRIBUTIONS NOT USED TO FUND SCHOLARSHIPS OR EDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS, DISAGGREGATED BY ELIGIBLE USE UNDER SECTION 1704-F(B). THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUEST SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION.(D) FORMS.--THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A), (B) AND (C) SHALL BE SUBMITTED ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT. NO LATER THAN AUGUST 1 OF EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE FORMS TO EACH SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT UNDER THIS SECTION.(E) PUBLICATION.--BEGINNING NOVEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ANNUALLY PUBLISH A DOWNLOADABLE SPREADSHEET ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE CONTAINING THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A), (B) AND (C). TO PROTECT STUDENT PRIVACY AND PREVENT THE IDENTIFICATION OF STUDENTS, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT DISCLOSE THE NAMES OF SCHOLARSHIP AWARD RECIPIENTS.SECTION 14.1. SECTION 1828-G(C) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1828-G. BUSINESS FIRMS.* * *(C) LIMITATION.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPROVE MORE THAN [$30,000,000] $60,000,000 IN CREDIT-ELIGIBLE CAPITAL CONTRIBUTIONS UNDER THIS PART.SECTION 14.2. SECTION 1829-G(A)(3) AND (B)(3) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (A) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 1829-G. TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES.(A) APPLICATION.--* * *(3) [THE] WITH RESPECT TO PROGRAM ONE TAX CREDIT 20250HB1667PN3745 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AUTHORITY, THE APPLICATION SHALL BE FILED NO LATER THAN FEBRUARY 1 FOR CREDIT-ELIGIBLE CAPITAL CONTRIBUTIONS MADE IN THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.(4) WITH RESPECT TO PROGRAM TWO TAX CREDIT AUTHORITY, THE APPLICATION SHALL BE FILED NO LATER THAN FEBRUARY 1 FOR CREDIT-ELIGIBLE CAPITAL CONTRIBUTIONS MADE IN THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.(B) REVIEW, RECOMMENDATION AND APPROVAL.--* * *(3) IN AWARDING TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES UNDER THIS PART, THE DEPARTMENT:(I) BEGINNING WITH FISCAL YEAR 2020-2021, MAY NOT AWARD TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES THAT WOULD RESULT IN THE UTILIZATION OF MORE THAN [$6,000,000] $12,000,000 IN TAX CREDITS IN ANY FISCAL YEAR, EXCEPT FOR TAX CREDITS CARRIED FORWARD.(II) MAY NOT AWARD MORE THAN [$30,000,000] $60,000,000 IN TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES, IN THE AGGREGATE, UNDER THIS PART.SECTION 14.3. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING ARTICLES TO READ:ARTICLE XXIIRETURN ON EQUITYSECTION 2201. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"10-YEAR TREASURY." THE MARKET YIELD ON UNITED STATES TREASURY SECURITIES AT 10-YEAR CONSTANT MATURITY, QUOTED ON AN INVESTMENT BASIS, AS REPORTED BY THE FEDERAL RESERVE SYSTEM."AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN." THE UNIFORM RATE OF RETURN 20250HB1667PN3745 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ESTABLISHED AS THE CLEARING PRICE IN A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION CONDUCTED UNDER SECTION 2203(E)."AUCTION EQUITY INTEREST." THE FOLLOWING:(1) AN ECONOMIC INTEREST ISSUED UNDER A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION UNDER SECTION 2203. AN AUCTION EQUITY INTEREST REPRESENTS PARTICIPATION IN THE FINANCIAL PERFORMANCE OF A SPECIFIC REGULATED SERVICE, WHICH CARRIES THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN AS ADJUSTED UNDER SECTION 2203(C), AND IS DISTINCT FROM THE COVERED UTILITY'S BASE COMMON STOCK. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO AN AUCTION EQUITY INTEREST:(I) THE AUTHORIZED RETURN AND FINANCIAL PERFORMANCE OF AN AUCTION EQUITY INTEREST SHALL BE DETERMINED SOLELY BY REFERENCE TO THE REGULATED SERVICE TO WHICH IT RELATES AND SHALL NOT BE AFFECTED BY THE FINANCIAL PERFORMANCE OF, OR RETURNS APPLICABLE TO, ANY OTHER REGULATED SERVICE OR ANY ACTIVITY OF THE COVERED UTILITY NOT SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE COMMISSION.(II) EXCEPT IF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS ARE ISSUED BY A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 2203(L), AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS ISSUED DIRECTLY BY THE COVERED UTILITY ARE OBLIGATIONS OF THE COVERED UTILITY AND MAY BE SUBJECT TO ALL RISKS APPLICABLE TO THE COVERED UTILITY GENERALLY, INCLUDING THE RISK OF INSOLVENCY OR BANKRUPTCY OF THE COVERED UTILITY.(III) IF THE COVERED UTILITY HAS ESTABLISHED A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND REGULATED SERVICE LLC UNDER SECTION 2203, AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS SHALL BE ISSUED BY THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION RATHER THAN BY THE COVERED UTILITY ITSELF.(2) AS USED IN THIS DEFINITION, THE TERM "COVERED 20250HB1667PN3745 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 UTILITY'S BASE COMMON STOCK" SHALL MEAN THE STOCK OF THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION RETAINED BY THE COVERED UTILITY."AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY." THE RATE OF RETURN ON COMMON EQUITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COMMISSION FOR RATEMAKING PURPOSES."COMMISSION." THE PENNSYLVANIA PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION."COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION." A PROCESS OVERSEEN BY THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE THAT PROVIDES A MARKET-BASED DETERMINATION OF THE COST OF EQUITY FOR A COVERED UTILITY."COST OF EQUITY." THE MINIMUM RATE OF RETURN NECESSARY TO ATTRACT EQUITY CAPITAL TO INVEST IN A SPECIFIC REGULATED SERVICE."COVERED UTILITY." AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY, NATURAL GAS DISTRIBUTION COMPANY OR WATER OR WASTEWATER PUBLIC UTILITIES REGULATED BY THE COMMISSION."DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN." THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY DETERMINED UNDER SECTION 2202."RATE PERIOD." THE TIME PERIOD IN WHICH A COVERED UTILITY COLLECTS RATES THAT ARE AUTHORIZED AND APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION."REGULATED SERVICE." A SERVICE PROVIDED BY A COVERED UTILITY FOR WHICH THE COMMISSION DETERMINES AN AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY. IF A COVERED UTILITY PROVIDES MORE THAN ONE CATEGORY OF SERVICE SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE COMMISSION, EACH CATEGORY SHALL BE TREATED AS A SEPARATE REGULATED SERVICE FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE AND CONSISTENT WITH THE PROPERTY SEGREGATION REQUIREMENTS OF 66 PA.C.S. § 1305 (RELATING TO ADVANCE PAYMENT OF RATES; INTEREST ON DEPOSITS), UNLESS THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT CONSOLIDATED TREATMENT IS 20250HB1667PN3745 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 APPROPRIATE."REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION." A CORPORATION ORGANIZED UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY STATE, FORMED OR DESIGNATED BY A COVERED UTILITY UNDER SECTION 2203(L) THAT:(1) IS TREATED AS A CORPORATION FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.(2) CONDUCTS NO ACTIVITIES OTHER THAN HOLDING A MEMBERSHIP INTEREST IN A REGULATED SERVICE LLC AND SERVING AS THE ISSUER OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS FOR THE REGULATED SERVICE ASSOCIATED WITH THAT REGULATED SERVICE LLC."REGULATED SERVICE LLC." A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY THAT IS A WHOLLY OWNED SUBSIDIARY OF A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION, FORMED OR DESIGNATED UNDER SECTION 2203(L), TO HOLD ASSETS, RIGHTS, FRANCHISES AND OBLIGATIONS ASSOCIATED WITH A REGULATED SERVICE. A REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL BE TREATED AS A DISREGARDED ENTITY FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.SECTION 2202. DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY.(A) DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN.--UNLESS AN AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY IS ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 2203, THE COMMISSION SHALL SET THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON A COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY EQUAL TO THE SUM OF THE 10-YEAR TREASURY AND 2%.(B) ANNUAL RESET.--THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN SHALL BE RESET ANNUALLY AS OF JANUARY 1 OF EACH YEAR TO REFLECT THE AVERAGE OF THE 10-YEAR TREASURY RATE ON THE 60 BUSINESS DAYS IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO JANUARY 1 OF THAT YEAR.(C) ALTERNATIVE BENCHMARK.--IF PUBLICATION OF THE 10-YEAR TREASURY IS CEASED OR INTERRUPTED, THE COMMISSION SHALL IDENTIFY AND USE FOR THE CALCULATION THE ALTERNATIVE BENCHMARK THE COMMISSION DETERMINES TO BE THE BEST SUBSTITUTE FOR CARRYING OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.20250HB1667PN3745 - 148 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) BURDEN OF PROOF.--THE BURDEN OF DEMONSTRATING THAT THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY IS INSUFFICIENT TO ATTRACT CAPITAL SHALL BE EXCLUSIVELY WITH THE COVERED UTILITY. THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN SHALL BE PRESUMED JUST AND REASONABLE UNLESS REBUTTED THROUGH THE COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION PROCESS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 2203.(E) INITIAL RATE PERIOD.--FOR A RATE PERIOD COMMENCING BETWEEN THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION AND THE FIRST RESET DATE UNDER SUBSECTION (B), THE 10-YEAR TREASURY COMPONENT SHALL BE DETERMINED USING THE AVERAGING METHODOLOGY PRESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) AND APPLIED TO THE 60 BUSINESS DAYS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.(F) RATE ADJUSTMENT.--(1) IF THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR A REGULATED SERVICE CHANGES UNDER THIS SECTION OR SECTION 2203, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADJUST THE RATES APPLICABLE TO THE REGULATED SERVICE TO REFLECT THE NEW AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY.(2) THE ADJUSTMENT SHALL BE IMPLEMENTED THROUGH THE MECHANISM THE COMMISSION DETERMINES TO BE MOST EXPEDIENT, WHICH MAY INCLUDE A SURCHARGE OR CREDIT APPLIED TO EXISTING TARIFFS, AN AUTOMATIC RATE ADJUSTMENT MECHANISM OR INCORPORATION INTO THE COVERED UTILITY'S NEXT GENERAL RATE PROCEEDING.(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL IMPLEMENT AN ADJUSTMENT NO LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE CHANGE IN AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY TAKES EFFECT.(G) RISK INSURANCE.--NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL PRECLUDE A COVERED UTILITY FROM PROCURING THIRD-PARTY INSURANCE TO HEDGE MATERIAL IDIOSYNCRATIC RISKS, WITH THE COST OF THE INSURANCE RECOVERABLE IN RATES AS AN OPERATING EXPENSE SUBJECT TO THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMMISSION'S DETERMINATION OF PRUDENCE.(H) PERFORMANCE-BASED RATEMAKING.--(1) NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL PRECLUDE THE COMMISSION FROM ESTABLISHING OR MAINTAINING A PERFORMANCE-BASED RATEMAKING PLAN FOR A COVERED UTILITY IF A PLAN IS DESIGNED FOR THE EXPECTED VALUE OF PERFORMANCE-BASED ADJUSTMENTS TO THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY TO BE NEUTRAL. (2) THE PERFORMANCE-BASED RATEMAKING PLAN MAY NOT PERMIT THE AGGREGATE EFFECT OF PERFORMANCE-BASED ADJUSTMENTS TO INCREASE THE COVERED UTILITY'S REALIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR A REGULATED SERVICE BY MORE THAN TWO PERCENTAGE POINTS ABOVE THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR THAT REGULATED SERVICE AS DETERMINED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE TERM "PERFORMANCE-BASED RATEMAKING PLAN" MEANS A PLAN, MECHANISM OR ORDER THAT ADJUSTS THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY OF A COVERED UTILITY BASED ON MEASURED UTILITY PERFORMANCE AGAINST SPECIFIED BENCHMARKS. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE REVENUE DECOUPLING MECHANISMS, FORMULA RATE PLANS OR OTHER MECHANISMS THAT OPERATE ON REVENUE, COST RECOVERY OR RATE DESIGN WITHOUT ADJUSTING THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY.(I) INTERACTION WITH ALTERNATIVE RATEMAKING PLANS.--(1) AN ALTERNATIVE RATEMAKING PLAN APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1330 (RELATING TO ALTERNATIVE RATEMAKING FOR UTILITIES) WHICH IS IN EFFECT AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PLAN'S TERMS, UNLESS A COMPONENT OF THE PLAN THAT DETERMINES, ADJUSTS OR IS CALCULATED BY REFERENCE TO THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY IS RECALCULATED USING THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY UPON THE NEXT SCHEDULED 20250HB1667PN3745 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ADJUSTMENT OR RESET OF THE COMPONENT, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(2) NON-RETURN-ON-EQUITY COMPONENTS OF A PLAN, INCLUDING DECOUPLING MECHANISMS, REVENUE-PER-CUSTOMER CAPS, PRICE CAP MECHANISMS AND ANY DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT CHARGE APPROVED UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1353 (RELATING TO DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT CHARGE) WITHOUT LIMITATION, SHALL NOT BE AFFECTED BY THIS ARTICLE.(3) AN ALTERNATIVE RATEMAKING PLAN FILED WITH THE COMMISSION UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1330 ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL INCORPORATE THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(4) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE A PLAN THAT PERMITS A RETURN ON EQUITY THAT IS GREATER THAN THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.(5) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF THE COMMISSION TO APPROVE OR MAINTAIN A DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT CHARGE UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1353 IF THE RETURN COMPONENT OF THE CHARGE IS CALCULATED USING THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(J) INITIAL IMPLEMENTATION.--(1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE, ACT OR PRIOR ORDER OF THE COMMISSION, THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL APPLY TO EACH REGULATED SERVICE OF A COVERED UTILITY IMMEDIATELY UPON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER A RATE PROCEEDING UNDER 66 PA.C.S § 1308(D) (RELATING TO VOLUNTARY CHANGES IN RATES) IS PENDING AND WHEN A RATE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROCEEDING WAS LAST CONCLUDED.(2) A RATE COMPONENT REFLECTING OR IMPLICITLY PERMITTING AN AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY GREATER THAN THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NO LONGER BE CONSIDERED JUST AND REASONABLE AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH, EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT ESTABLISHED THROUGH A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION CONDUCTED UNDER SECTION 2203. TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL:(I) NO LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, ISSUE AN ORDER FOR EACH COVERED UTILITY SETTING THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR EACH OF ITS REGULATED SERVICES TO THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTION (A), AS ADJUSTED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) FOR THE INITIAL RATE PERIOD.(II) NO LATER THAN 120 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, IMPLEMENT CORRESPONDING ADJUSTMENTS TO CUSTOMER RATES, APPLYING THE MECHANISM THE COMMISSION DETERMINES TO BE MOST EXPEDIENT UNDER SUBSECTION (F), WHICH MAY INCLUDE A SURCHARGE OR CREDIT APPLIED TO EXISTING TARIFFS OR AN AUTOMATIC RATE ADJUSTMENT MECHANISM AND WHICH SHALL NOT REQUIRE THE INITIATION OF A BASE RATE PROCEEDING UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1308(D).(III) IMPLEMENT A TRUE-UP ADJUSTMENT FOR THE PERIOD COMMENCING ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH AND ENDING ON THE DATE ADJUSTED RATES TAKE EFFECT, CALCULATED AS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE REVENUE ACTUALLY COLLECTED BY THE COVERED UTILITY DURING THE PERIOD AND THE REVENUE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN COLLECTED DURING THE PERIOD HAD THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN BEEN REFLECTED IN RATES THROUGHOUT, WITH INTEREST ACCRUING AT THE DEFAULT 20250HB1667PN3745 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AUTHORIZED RETURN CALCULATED FROM THE MIDPOINT OF THE PERIOD.(3) A COVERED UTILITY THAT BELIEVES THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN IS INSUFFICIENT TO ATTRACT CAPITAL MAY, AT ANY TIME FOLLOWING THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH, PETITION THE COMMISSION FOR A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION UNDER SECTION 2203(A). THE PENDENCY OF A PETITION SHALL NOT DELAY OR SUSPEND THE IMPLEMENTATION REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION.(4) NOTHING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO DISTURB A NON-RETURN-ON-EQUITY COMPONENT OF A RATE CURRENTLY IN EFFECT, INCLUDING THE AUTHORIZED CAPITAL STRUCTURE OR THE COST OF DEBT, EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THAT THE COMPONENTS MUST BE ADJUSTED AS A MATHEMATICAL CONSEQUENCE OF THE CHANGE IN AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION.(K) RATE BASE.--(1) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR A REGULATED SERVICE OF A COVERED UTILITY UNDER THIS ARTICLE, WHETHER THE RETURN IS DETERMINED UNDER THIS SECTION OR UNDER A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION UNDER SECTION 2203, THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE A RATE BASE TO REFLECT THE FULL VALUE OF ALL ASSETS PRUDENTLY INVESTED BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE COVERED UTILITY FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE REGULATED SERVICE, INCLUDING CONSTRUCTION WORK IN PROGRESS AND NET OF ACCUMULATED DEPRECIATION.(2) REDUCTIONS TO A RATE BASE SHALL SOLELY BE FOR CAPITAL THAT IS NOT SUPPLIED BY INVESTORS, WHICH SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE FOLLOWING:(I) ACCUMULATED DEFERRED INCOME TAXES, TO THE EXTENT THAT DEFERRED TAX LIABILITIES EXCEED DEFERRED TAX ASSETS. 20250HB1667PN3745 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) CUSTOMER DEPOSITS.(III) CUSTOMER ADVANCES FOR CONSTRUCTION.(3) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT EXCLUDE FROM THE RATE BASE OF A REGULATED SERVICE AN ASSET ON THE BASIS THAT THE ASSET HAS NOT YET BEEN PLACED IN SERVICE IF THE INVESTMENT HAS BEEN DETERMINED TO BE PRUDENT AND IS BEING UNDERTAKEN FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE REGULATED SERVICE.(4) THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE IMPLEMENTED ON THE SAME SCHEDULE AS THE INITIAL IMPLEMENTATION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (J), AND THE COMMISSION'S 60-DAY ORDER AND 120-DAY RATE ADJUSTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (J) SHALL REFLECT BOTH THE CHANGE IN AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY AND THE RATE BASE DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.SECTION 2203. COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION.(A) UTILITY-INITIATED AUCTION.--(1) IF A COVERED UTILITY BELIEVES THAT ITS COST OF EQUITY EXCEEDS THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN, THE COVERED UTILITY MAY PETITION THE COMMISSION TO OVERSEE A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION.(2) IF THE COVERED UTILITY FAILS TO TAKE ALL NECESSARY STEPS TO FACILITATE THE COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION BASED ON THE TIMELINE AND PROCEDURES DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION, THE PETITION SHALL BE DEEMED WITHDRAWN AND THE COVERED UTILITY IS DEEMED TO HAVE ACCEPTED THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN.(3) A PETITION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL BE FILED NO LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH OR THE MOST RECENT RESET OF THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN UNDER SUBSECTION (B), WHICHEVER IS LATER.(4) UPON CERTIFICATION OF THE AUCTION RESULTS BY THE COMMISSION, THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN SHALL BECOME THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR THE REGULATED SERVICE, AND THE COMMISSION SHALL ADJUST CUSTOMER RATES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 2202(F) NO LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE CERTIFICATION.(5) THE COMMISSION SHALL IMPLEMENT A TRUE-UP ADJUSTMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION THAT IS CALCULATED AS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE REVENUE ACTUALLY COLLECTED BY THE COVERED UTILITY DURING THE PERIOD FROM THE FILING OF THE PETITION THROUGH THE DATE ON WHICH ADJUSTED RATES TAKE EFFECT AND THE REVENUE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN COLLECTED DURING THAT PERIOD HAD THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN BEEN REFLECTED IN RATES THROUGHOUT. THE INTEREST ON THE DIFFERENCE SHALL ACCRUE AT THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN AND BE CALCULATED FROM THE MIDPOINT OF THE PERIOD.(6) AN ADJUSTMENT TO CUSTOMER RATES REQUIRED BY THE RESET OF THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN UNDER SECTION 2202(B) SHALL BE IMPLEMENTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 2202(F) INDEPENDENTLY OF AN AUCTION PETITION, AND THE TRUE-UP ADJUSTMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (5) SHALL APPLY ONLY TO THE PERIOD COMMENCING ON THE DATE OF THE PETITION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1).(B) COMMISSION-INITIATED AUCTION.--(1) THE COMMISSION MAY, ON ITS OWN MOTION OR UPON PETITION BY THE OFFICE OF CONSUMER ADVOCATE, ORDER THAT A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION BE CONDUCTED FOR A COVERED UTILITY IF THE COMMISSION FINDS REASONABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN MATERIALLY EXCEEDS THE COVERED UTILITY'S COST OF EQUITY FOR A REGULATED SERVICE.(2) AN AUCTION INITIATED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE ORDERED NO EARLIER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH OR THE MOST RECENT RESET OF 20250HB1667PN3745 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN UNDER SECTION 2202(B), WHICHEVER IS LATER, AND NO LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE RESET.(3) UPON CERTIFICATION OF THE AUCTION RESULTS, THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN SHALL BECOME THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR THE REGULATED SERVICE, AND THE COMMISSION SHALL ADJUST CUSTOMER RATES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 2202(F) NO LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE CERTIFICATION.(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL IMPLEMENT A TRUE-UP ADJUSTMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION THAT IS CALCULATED AS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE REVENUE ACTUALLY COLLECTED BY THE COVERED UTILITY DURING THE PERIOD FROM JANUARY 1 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH THE AUCTION IS CONDUCTED THROUGH THE DATE ON WHICH ADJUSTED RATES TAKE EFFECT AND THE REVENUE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN COLLECTED DURING THAT PERIOD HAD THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN BEEN REFLECTED IN RATES THROUGHOUT. THE INTEREST ON THE DIFFERENCE SHALL ACCRUE AT THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN AND BE CALCULATED FROM THE MIDPOINT OF THE PERIOD.(5) IF A COVERED UTILITY FAILS TO TAKE ALL STEPS REQUIRED TO FACILITATE AN AUCTION ORDERED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ON THE TIMELINE PRESCRIBED BY THE COMMISSION, THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN FOR THAT REGULATED SERVICE SHALL BE REDUCED BY 0.10 PERCENTAGE POINTS BEGINNING ON THE DATE OF THE FAILURE AND CONTINUING UNTIL THE COVERED UTILITY HAS COMPLIED WITH THIS SUBSECTION.(6) IF THE COVERED UTILITY FAILS TO FACILITATE A SUBSEQUENT COMMISSION-INITIATED AUCTION FOR THE SAME REGULATED SERVICE, THE REDUCTION SHALL BE CUMULATIVE.(7) UPON COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION, A REDUCTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL CEASE TO APPLY PROSPECTIVELY AND 20250HB1667PN3745 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NO RETROACTIVE ADJUSTMENT SHALL BE MADE FOR ANY PERIOD DURING WHICH THE REDUCTION WAS IN EFFECT.(C) DURATION AND EFFECT.--(1) HOLDERS OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS ISSUED AT AN AUCTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL RECEIVE THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN FOR THE FULL DURATION OF THE INTERESTS. THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN SHALL BE ADJUSTED FOR DIFFERENCES BETWEEN REALIZED AND ANTICIPATED PROFITS IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION'S ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION.(2) THE RATE OF RETURN UNDER PARAGRAPH (1), WHETHER GREATER OR LESS THAN THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN, SHALL DETERMINE THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR THE REGULATED SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D), UNTIL THE FOLLOWING JANUARY 1, AT WHICH TIME THE COVERED UTILITY MAY ELECT THAT THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN SHALL APPLY TO THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY IN THE REGULATED SERVICE.(3) AN ELECTION MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) SHALL NOT AFFECT THE RETURN APPLICABLE TO OUTSTANDING AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS, WHICH SHALL CONTINUE TO RECEIVE THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN FOR THE FULL DURATION OF THE INTERESTS. FOLLOWING AN ELECTION, THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR THE REGULATED SERVICE SHALL BE DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D).(D) MULTIPLE AUCTIONS.--(1) WHERE DIFFERENT EQUITY INTERESTS IN A REGULATED SERVICE BEAR DIFFERENT AUTHORIZED RATES OF RETURN, EITHER FOR MULTIPLE AUCTIONS BEING CONDUCTED AT DIFFERENT TIMES OR THE COVERED UTILITY HAS ELECTED THAT THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN SHALL APPLY TO THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY UNDER SUBSECTION (C), THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REGULATED SERVICE SHALL BE THE WEIGHTED AVERAGE OF THE RETURN APPLICABLE TO EACH EQUITY INTEREST, WHICH SHALL BE WEIGHTED BY ITS OUTSTANDING EQUITY AMOUNT.(2) FOR THE PURPOSES UNDER PARAGRAPH (2), THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY SHALL BEAR THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN ESTABLISHED IN THE MOST RECENT AUCTION OR THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN FOLLOWING AN ELECTION UNDER SUBSECTION (C). IF NO AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS REMAIN OUTSTANDING, THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN SHALL APPLY TO THE FULL EQUITY COMPONENT OF THE REGULATED SERVICE.(E) AUCTION MECHANISM.--THE COMMISSION SHALL OVERSEE A SEALED-BID COMPETITIVE AUCTION ADMINISTERED INDEPENDENTLY OF THE COVERED UTILITY. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE FOR EACH AUCTION WHETHER BIDS ARE TO BE EXPRESSED AS AN ABSOLUTE NUMBER OR AS A PREMIUM TO THE 10-YEAR TREASURY OR ANOTHER INDEX, WITH THE APPLICABLE INTEREST RATE TO BE RESET PERIODICALLY.(2) QUALIFIED BIDDERS SHALL BID THE MINIMUM TARGET RETURN ON EQUITY THEY REQUIRE.(3) ALL BIDS SHALL BE RANKED IN ASCENDING ORDER AND THE COMMISSION SHALL ACCEPT BIDS IN THAT ORDER UNTIL THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF EQUITY OFFERED IN THE AUCTION HAS BEEN FULLY ALLOCATED.(4) ALL SUCCESSFUL BIDDERS SHALL RECEIVE THE SAME RATE OF RETURN, EQUAL TO THE HIGHEST ACCEPTED BID.(5) IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT BID AT THE CLEARING RATE EXCEEDS THE REMAINING AMOUNT OF EQUITY TO BE ALLOCATED, THE BIDS SHALL BE ACCEPTED ON A PRO RATA BASIS. FOR THE AVOIDANCE OF DOUBT, ALL BIDS SUBMITTED AT RETURNS BELOW THE CLEARING RATE SHALL BE ACCEPTED IN FULL BUT A PRO RATA REDUCTION SHALL 20250HB1667PN3745 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ONLY APPLY TO BIDS SUBMITTED AT THE CLEARING RATE ITSELF.(6) THE AMOUNT OF EQUITY TO BE OFFERED WITHIN EACH AUCTION SHALL BE THE GREATER OF 2.5% OF THE EQUITY COMPONENT OF THE REGULATED SERVICE RATE BASE AND THE LESSER OF $50,000,000 AND 5% OF THE EQUITY COMPONENT OF THE REGULATED SERVICE RATE BASE.(7) THE COMMISSION SHALL CERTIFY THE RESULTS OF AN AUCTION IF AT LEAST FIVE QUALIFIED BIDDERS SUBMITTED BIDS AND THE AGGREGATE EQUITY AMOUNT BID BY ALL QUALIFIED BIDDERS WAS AT LEAST 1.5 TIMES THE TOTAL EQUITY AMOUNT OFFERED IN THE AUCTION.(8) IF EITHER THRESHOLD UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) IS NOT MET IN A UTILITY-INITIATED AUCTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A), THE AUCTION RESULT SHALL BE CERTIFIED IF THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN DOES NOT EXCEED THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN BY MORE THAN TWO PERCENTAGE POINTS BUT, IF NOT EXCEEDED, THE AUCTION RESULT SHALL BE VOID AND THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN SHALL BE APPLIED.(9) IF EITHER THRESHOLD UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) IS NOT MET IN A COMMISSION-INITIATED AUCTION UNDER SUBSECTION (B), THE AUCTION RESULT SHALL BE VOID AND THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN SHALL CONTINUE TO APPLY.(10) IN A COMMISSION-INITIATED AUCTION UNDER SUBSECTION (B), REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PARTICIPATION THRESHOLDS ARE MET, THE AUCTION RESULT SHALL BE BINDING ONLY IF THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN IS LESS THAN THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN.(11) IF THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN EQUALS OR EXCEEDS THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN IN A COMMISSION-INITIATED AUCTION UNDER SUBSECTION (B), THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN SHALL CONTINUE TO APPLY.20250HB1667PN3745 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) IF THE AGGREGATE EQUITY AMOUNT BID IN AN AUCTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) IS LESS THAN THE TOTAL EQUITY AMOUNT OFFERED, THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN SHALL APPLY TO THE EQUITY AMOUNT ACTUALLY SUBSCRIBED AND THE DEFAULT AUTHORIZED RETURN SHALL APPLY TO THE REMAINDER, IN WHICH THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR THE REGULATED SERVICE SHALL BE DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D).(F) COST RECOVERY.--ALL REASONABLE COSTS INCURRED BY A COVERED UTILITY IN CONNECTION WITH A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING COSTS OF ANY REQUIRED SECURITIES REGISTRATION OR OFFERING PREPARATION, REASONABLE REGISTRATION COSTS UNDER SUBSECTION (G), REASONABLE MANAGEMENT TIME ALLOCABLE TO THE AUCTION AND PROFESSIONAL FEES, SHALL BE TREATED AS PRUDENTLY INCURRED COSTS FOR RATEMAKING PURPOSES AND SHALL BE RECOVERABLE IN RATES.(G) COMMISSION AUTHORITY AND REGULATIONS.--THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT AND PROMULGATE RULES AND REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION PROCEDURES UNDER THIS SECTION, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:(1) AN APPLICATION PROCESS, ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA AND OTHER MEASURES NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT BIDDERS ARE QUALIFIED TO PARTICIPATE IN AN AUCTION.(2) ONGOING DISCLOSURE OBLIGATIONS APPLICABLE TO THE COVERED UTILITY AND TO HOLDERS OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS.(3) GUIDELINES FOR AN INDEPENDENT AUCTION ADMINISTRATOR TO CONDUCT AN AUCTION.(4) DETERMINATION OF THE DUTIES AND REQUISITE EXPERTISE OF THE INDEPENDENT AUCTION ADMINISTRATOR.(5) CONSUMER PROTECTION STANDARDS.(6) AUCTION DISCLOSURE DOCUMENTATION WHICH STATES THAT 20250HB1667PN3745 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE DEPRECIATION AND AMORTIZATION SCHEDULE IS SUBJECT TO PROSPECTIVE ADJUSTMENT IN SUBSEQUENT RATE PROCEEDINGS AND MAY AFFECT THE TIMING OF RETURN OF CAPITAL TO HOLDERS OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS.(7) REQUIREMENTS FOR THE INDEPENDENT AUCTION ADMINISTRATOR TO DISCLOSE TO ALL QUALIFIED BIDDERS PRIOR TO EACH AUCTION THE CONDITIONS IN WHICH THE AUCTION RESULT WILL BE BINDING, INCLUDING WHETHER THE AUCTION IS UTILITY-INITIATED OR COMMISSION-INITIATED AND THE CONSEQUENCES THEREOF FOR BID ACCEPTANCE.(8) THE FORM AND CONTENT OF THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (L)(2).(H) SECURITIES LAW COMPLIANCE.--(1) THE ECONOMIC INTERESTS OFFERED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY CONSTITUTE SECURITIES WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933 (48 STAT. 74, 15 U.S.C. § 77A ET SEQ.), AS AMENDED, AND THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 (48 STAT. 881, 15 U.S.C. § 78A ET SEQ.), AS AMENDED, AND SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1901 (RELATING TO REGISTRATION OF SECURITIES TO BE ISSUED OR ASSUMED).(2) EACH AUCTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE STRUCTURED TO QUALIFY FOR AN AVAILABLE EXEMPTION FROM REGISTRATION UNDER FEDERAL SECURITIES LAW. PERMISSIBLE EXEMPTIONS MAY INCLUDE LIMITING THE OFFERING TO ACCREDITED INVESTORS UNDER RULE 506 OF REGULATION D UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933 OR CONDUCTING AN INTRASTATE OFFERING EXEMPT UNDER SECTION 3(A)(11) OF THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933 AND APPLICABLE RULES UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933.(3) THE COMMISSION MAY, IN ITS DISCRETION, DIRECT THAT A 20250HB1667PN3745 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SPECIFIC AUCTION BE CONDUCTED ON A REGISTERED BASIS IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES, BASED ON THE EXPECTED SIZE OF THE OFFERING AND AN ANALYSIS OF ANTICIPATED INVESTOR DEMAND, THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE EXPECTED REDUCTION IN THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN ATTRIBUTABLE TO BROADER INVESTOR PARTICIPATION ENABLED BY REGISTRATION IS REASONABLY EXPECTED TO OUTWEIGH THE COSTS AND DELAYS OF THE REGISTRATION PROCESS.(II) THE AUCTION WILL NOT BE DELAYED BY MORE THAN 30 DAYS BEYOND THE TIMELINE THAT WOULD APPLY TO AN EXEMPT OFFERING.(4) ANY DIRECTION BY THE COMMISSION TO CONDUCT AN AUCTION ON A REGISTERED BASIS SHALL BE ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION SUFFICIENTLY IN ADVANCE OF THE COVERED UTILITY'S AUCTION PETITION TO PERMIT TIMELY REGISTRATION.(5) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO CONFER UPON THE COMMISSION ANY AUTHORITY TO REGULATE SECURITIES EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION.(I) INSTRUMENT DESIGN.--(1) A COVERED UTILITY MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO OFFER ITS COMMON STOCK FOR SALE IN THE AUCTION, BUT THE AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS OFFERED SHALL, AS APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION, PROVIDE PROSPECTIVE INVESTORS WITH THE FOLLOWING:(I) ECONOMICALLY EQUIVALENT POSITION TO THAT OF THE COVERED UTILITY'S EQUITY INTEREST IN THE REGULATED SERVICE WHICH MAY CONSIST OF THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON STOCK WHERE AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS ARE ISSUED DIRECTLY BY THE COVERED UTILITY OR THE COVERED UTILITY'S RETAINED STOCK INTEREST IN THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION WHERE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE INTERESTS ARE ISSUED BY A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION.(II) ADEQUATE PROTECTIONS AGAINST DILUTION OR IMPAIRMENT OF VALUE THROUGH RELATED-PARTY TRANSACTIONS OR OTHER TRANSFERS INVOLVING THE CORPORATION'S PARENT HOLDING COMPANY.(III) IF THE COVERED UTILITY'S REALIZED PROFITS OF THE REGULATED SERVICE IN EACH PERIOD EQUAL THOSE EMBEDDED BY THE COMMISSION IN THE RATES APPROVED TO ACHIEVE THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY, PROSPECTIVE PERIODIC DISTRIBUTIONS CALIBRATED FOR HOLDERS OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS TO REALIZE AN INTERNAL RATE OF RETURN EQUAL TO THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN WHICH ACCOUNTS FOR PERIODIC DISTRIBUTIONS AND ANY RETURN OF EQUITY CAPITAL OVER THE LIFE OF THE INTERESTS.(IV) A STATED INITIAL EQUITY AMOUNT PER AUCTION EQUITY INTEREST EQUAL TO THE PURCHASE PRICE PAID BY THE WINNING BIDDER IN THE AUCTION, WHICH SHALL BE AN EQUITY AMOUNT TO BE RETURNED TO HOLDERS OVER THE LIFE OF THE INTERESTS AT A RATE AND ON A SCHEDULE CONSISTENT WITH THE COMMISSION'S TREATMENT OF RATE BASE DEPRECIATION AND AMORTIZATION FOR THE REGULATED SERVICE FOR RATEMAKING PURPOSES. IF THE EQUITY COMPONENT OF THE REGULATED SERVICE RATE BASE IS REDUCED THROUGH DEPRECIATION AND AMORTIZATION, A COMMENSURATE PORTION OF THE INITIAL EQUITY AMOUNT SHALL BE RETURNED TO HOLDERS.(V) A SPECIFICATION OF THE SHORTFALLS AND EXCESSES IN REALIZED PROFITS, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2).(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH RULES OR PROMULGATE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REGULATIONS SPECIFYING THE METHODS AND CALCULATIONS IN WHICH SHORTFALLS AND EXCESSES IN REALIZED PROFITS OF THE REGULATED SERVICE RELATIVE TO THE EARNINGS EMBEDDED IN APPROVED RATES ARE TO BE ALLOCATED BETWEEN HOLDERS OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS AND THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY, INCLUDING THE ALLOCATION METHODS IN THE EVENT OF MULTIPLE OUTSTANDING SERIES OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS.(3) THE COMMISSION'S REGULATIONS GOVERNING AN AUCTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL SPECIFY THE INITIAL EQUITY AMOUNT PER AUCTION EQUITY INTEREST, THE FORMULA FOR CALCULATING PERIODIC DISTRIBUTIONS BY APPLYING THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN TO THE OUTSTANDING EQUITY BALANCE FOR EACH PERIOD AND THE SCHEDULE FOR RETURN OF EQUITY CAPITAL. THE COMMISSION SHALL ENSURE THAT HOLDERS OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS WILL REALIZE AN INTERNAL RATE OF RETURN EQUAL TO THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN IF THE COVERED UTILITY'S REALIZED PROFITS OF THE REGULATED SERVICE IN EACH PERIOD EQUAL THOSE EMBEDDED IN THE RATES APPROVED TO ACHIEVE THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY.(4) EACH SERIES OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE REDEEMED AT ITS BOOK VALUE CURRENTLY IN EFFECT UNTIL THE EARLIER OF 40 YEARS FROM THE DATE OF ISSUANCE OR THE END OF THE FIRST FISCAL QUARTER IN WHICH THE OUTSTANDING EQUITY AMOUNT OF SUCH SERIES IS LESS THAN 5% OF THE INITIAL EQUITY AMOUNT AT ISSUANCE.(5) THE COVERED UTILITY OR REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION, AS APPLICABLE, SHALL FUND A REDEMPTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (4), WHETHER THROUGH RETAINED EARNINGS, A CAPITAL CONTRIBUTION FROM THE COVERED UTILITY'S PARENT COMPANY OR ANY OTHER SOURCE OF EQUITY CAPITAL. UPON THE REDEMPTION, THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EQUITY REPRESENTED BY THE REDEEMED SERIES SHALL REVERT TO THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY IN THE REGULATED SERVICE. THE COMMISSION MAY DEFER THE MANDATORY REDEMPTION DATE BY NOT MORE THAN TWO YEARS UPON A DEMONSTRATION BY THE COVERED UTILITY THAT IMMEDIATE REDEMPTION WOULD MATERIALLY IMPAIR ITS FINANCIAL CONDITION.(6) IN THE EVENT OF A MERGER, ACQUISITION OR CHANGE OF CONTROL OF THE COVERED UTILITY OR, WHERE APPLICABLE, THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION, THE SUCCESSOR ENTITY SHALL ASSUME ALL OBLIGATIONS TO HOLDERS OF OUTSTANDING AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS ON TERMS NO LESS FAVORABLE THAN THE TERMS IN EFFECT IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO THE TRANSACTION.(7) A TRANSACTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (6) SHALL NOT BE CONSUMMATED WITHOUT DETERMINATION BY THE COMMISSION THAT THE RIGHTS OF HOLDERS OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS WILL BE ADEQUATELY PRESERVED. THE COMMISSION MAY REQUIRE THE TERMS OF EACH SERIES OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS TO INCLUDE A PROVISION ENTITLING HOLDERS TO REDEMPTION AT THE BOOK VALUE THEN CURRENTLY IN EFFECT UPON ANY CHANGE OF CONTROL, AT THE OPTION OF THE HOLDER.(8) IN THE EVENT OF THE INSOLVENCY OR DISSOLUTION OF A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION OR REGULATED SERVICE LLC OR THE PERMANENT DISCONTINUATION OF THE REGULATED SERVICE TO WHICH AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS RELATE, OUTSTANDING AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS SHALL PARTICIPATE IN ANY DISTRIBUTION OF REMAINING ASSETS ON A PARI PASSU BASIS WITH THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY IN THE REGULATED SERVICE, IN PROPORTION TO THEIR RESPECTIVE OUTSTANDING EQUITY AMOUNTS, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE COMMISSION'S SPECIFICATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (2).(9) NOTHING UNDER PARAGRAPH (8) SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO 20250HB1667PN3745 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CREATE A PRIORITY OR PREFERENCE IN FAVOR OF, OR AGAINST, HOLDERS OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS RELATIVE TO THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY.(J) PARTICIPANTS.--(1) AN AUCTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE OPEN, AT MINIMUM, TO ALL ACCREDITED INVESTORS AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED UNDER APPLICABLE FEDERAL SECURITIES LAW.(2) EACH QUALIFIED BIDDER SHALL, AS A CONDITION OF PARTICIPATION, CERTIFY IN WRITING TO THE INDEPENDENT AUCTION ADMINISTRATOR THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE BIDDER IS SUBMITTING ITS BID BASED SOLELY ON THE BIDDER'S OWN ASSESSMENT OF THE RISK-ADJUSTED FINANCIAL RETURN OF THE AUCTION EQUITY INTEREST AND NOT FOR THE PURPOSE OR WITH THE EFFECT OF ARTIFICIALLY SUPPRESSING OR INFLATING THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN.(II) THE BIDDER IS NOT ACTING IN CONCERT WITH ANY OTHER BIDDER OR WITH THE COVERED UTILITY OR ANY OF ITS AFFILIATES WITH RESPECT TO THE FORMULATION OF ITS BID.(3) A BIDDER THAT IS A COVERED UTILITY SUBJECT TO COST-OF-SERVICE REGULATION BY A FEDERAL OR STATE REGULATORY AUTHORITY, OR A HOLDING COMPANY THAT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY CONTROLS THE COVERED UTILITY, SHALL NOT BE ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE AS A BIDDER, EXCEPT THAT THE COVERED UTILITY, ITS PARENT COMPANY AND ANY AFFILIATES MAY PARTICIPATE AS BIDDERS AND SHALL BE SUBJECT TO ANY EXISTING CODE OF CONDUCT POLICIES FOR AFFILIATE TRANSACTIONS AND ANY FURTHER ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION TO PROHIBIT INAPPROPRIATE PREFERENTIAL TREATMENT IN THE BIDDING PROCESS.(4) THE EXCLUSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) SHALL NOT APPLY TO A REGISTERED INVESTMENT COMPANY, INVESTMENT ADVISER OR OTHER 20250HB1667PN3745 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INSTITUTIONAL INVESTOR WHOSE OWNERSHIP OF A COVERED UTILITY IS SOLELY AS A PASSIVE INVESTOR IN DIVERSIFIED PORTFOLIOS. HOLDINGS BY THE INSTITUTIONAL INVESTORS IN AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS ISSUED UNDER THIS ARTICLE SHALL NOT BE COUNTED TOWARD AN INVESTMENT LIMITATION APPLICABLE TO OWNERSHIP OF THE COVERED UTILITY OR THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY UNDER APPLICABLE STATE LAW.(5) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH RULES OR PROMULGATE REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE EXCLUSION AND CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING PROCEDURES FOR INVESTIGATION AND DISQUALIFICATION OF BIDDERS THAT SUBMIT FALSE CERTIFICATIONS OR ARE FOUND TO HAVE VIOLATED THE PROHIBITION ON COORDINATED BIDDING.(K) MISCONDUCT AND RISK ATTRIBUTION.--(1) IF THE COMMISSION OR A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION HAS MADE A FORMAL FINDING THAT A COVERED UTILITY HAS ENGAGED IN UNLAWFUL OR IMPRUDENT CONDUCT WHICH HAS MATERIALLY INCREASED THE COVERED UTILITY'S COST OF EQUITY FOR A REGULATED SERVICE, THE COMMISSION MAY EXCLUDE THE PORTION OF AN INCREASE IN THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY FOR THE REGULATED SERVICE THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE CONDUCT FROM THE RETURN APPLICABLE TO THE COVERED UTILITY'S COMMON EQUITY. (2) AN AUCTION EQUITY INTEREST, WHETHER ISSUED BEFORE OR AFTER A FINDING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1), SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO THE EXCLUSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) AND ALL AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS SHALL CONTINUE TO BEAR THE AUCTION-CLEARING RETURN ESTABLISHED IN THE AUCTION IN WHICH THE INTERESTS WERE ISSUED WITHOUT REDUCTION ON ACCOUNT OF ANY EXCLUSION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL LIMIT THE AUTHORITY 20250HB1667PN3745 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF THE COMMISSION TO IMPOSE PENALTIES, DISALLOWANCES OR OTHER REMEDIES AVAILABLE UNDER APPLICABLE LAW.(L) REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND REGULATED SERVICE LLC.--(1) A COVERED UTILITY MAY, AT ANY TIME BEFORE OR AFTER CONDUCTING A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION, FORM A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND A REGULATED SERVICE LLC FOR A REGULATED SERVICE. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(I) THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION FORMED SHALL BE A WHOLLY OWNED SUBSIDIARY OF THE COVERED UTILITY, ORGANIZED AS A CORPORATION UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY STATE AND TREATED AS A CORPORATION FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.(II) THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL BE A WHOLLY OWNED SUBSIDIARY OF THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION, ORGANIZED AS A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AND TREATED AS A DISREGARDED ENTITY FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.(III) THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL HOLD ALL MATERIAL ASSETS, RIGHTS, FRANCHISES AND OBLIGATIONS ASSOCIATED WITH THE REGULATED SERVICE.(IV) THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION SHALL SERVE AS THE ISSUER OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS FOR THAT REGULATED SERVICE.(V) THE FORMATION OF A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL NOT BE A PREREQUISITE TO CONDUCT AN AUCTION UNDER THIS SECTION.(VI) THE ABSENCE OF THE ENTITIES SHALL NOT IMPAIR THE VALIDITY OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS ISSUED BY THE COVERED UTILITY.(2) IN A COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION CONDUCTED PRIOR TO A 20250HB1667PN3745 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND REGULATED SERVICE LLC BEING ESTABLISHED, THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE THE COVERED UTILITY TO DISCLOSE TO ALL QUALIFIED BIDDERS THAT AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS ARE BEING ISSUED AS DIRECT OBLIGATIONS OF THE COVERED UTILITY AND ARE SUBJECT TO THE RISKS OF ANY INSOLVENCY, BANKRUPTCY OR RESTRUCTURING PROCEEDINGS AFFECTING THE COVERED UTILITY OR THE COVERED UTILITY'S AFFILIATES.(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE EACH COVERED UTILITY TO ENSURE THAT ALL LONG-TERM INDEBTEDNESS WITH A STATED MATURITY GREATER THAN ONE YEAR ISSUED OR INCURRED ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH, WHETHER IN THE FORM OF BONDS, NOTES, DEBENTURES OR OTHERWISE, INCLUDES A COVENANT EXPRESSLY PERMITTING THE COVERED UTILITY TO TRANSFER THE ASSETS, FRANCHISES, RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS ASSOCIATED WITH EACH REGULATED SERVICE TO A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION OR REGULATED SERVICE LLC WITHOUT THE TRANSFER CONSTITUTING A DEFAULT, EVENT OF DEFAULT OR BREACH UNDER THE INDEBTEDNESS.(4) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE ANY LONG-TERM DEBT FINANCING BY A COVERED UTILITY THAT DOES NOT INCLUDE A COVENANT UNDER PARAGRAPH (3).(5) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A COVERED UTILITY TO RESTRUCTURE, REFINANCE OR ASSIGN ANY INDEBTEDNESS OUTSTANDING AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH IN ADVANCE OF THE FORMATION OF A REGULATED SERVICE LLC UNDER PARAGRAPH (1).(6) EACH COVERED UTILITY THAT HAS NOT YET ESTABLISHED A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL USE COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE EFFORTS TO DO SO BY NO LATER THAN FIVE YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH OR FIVE YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE COVERED UTILITY'S FIRST 20250HB1667PN3745 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTION, WHICHEVER IS LATER. THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE PERIOD UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH UPON A SHOWING BY THE COVERED UTILITY OF GOOD CAUSE, WHICH MAY INCLUDE THE INABILITY TO OBTAIN REQUIRED BONDHOLDER OR CREDITOR CONSENTS DESPITE COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE EFFORTS.(7) WHENEVER A COVERED UTILITY HAS ESTABLISHED A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND REGULATED SERVICE LLC, EACH ENTITY SHALL BE STRUCTURED AND OPERATED AS A BANKRUPTCY-REMOTE SPECIAL-PURPOSE ENTITY. THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT OR PROMULGATE RULES OR REGULATIONS TO ENSURE THE COMPLIANCE OF A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND REGULATED SERVICE LLC, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:(I) MAINTENANCE OF BOOKS OF ACCOUNT, BANK ACCOUNTS AND FINANCIAL RECORDS SEPARATE FROM THOSE OF THE COVERED UTILITY AND ANY AFFILIATE.(II) PROHIBITION ON COMMINGLING OF ASSETS.(III) REQUIREMENTS FOR THE ORGANIZATIONAL DOCUMENTS OF THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC TO INCLUDE AT LEAST ONE INDEPENDENT MANAGER WHOSE AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT IS REQUIRED FOR A VOLUNTARY BANKRUPTCY FILING BY THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC OR THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION.(IV) A COVENANT BY THE COVERED UTILITY NOT TO CAUSE OR ENCOURAGE ANY INVOLUNTARY BANKRUPTCY FILING AGAINST THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION OR THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC.(V) RESTRICTIONS ON INDEBTEDNESS OF THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC UNLESS APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION.(8) THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION MAY NOT CONDUCT ACTIVITIES OTHER THAN HOLDING A MEMBERSHIP INTEREST IN THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REGULATED SERVICE LLC AND SERVING AS THE ISSUER OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS. THE CORPORATION MAY NOT HOLD ANY ASSETS OTHER THAN THE CORPORATION'S MEMBERSHIP INTEREST IN THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC AND ANY CASH OR OTHER ASSETS INCIDENTAL THERETO.(9) FORMATION OF BOTH THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL REQUIRE ANY APPROVALS THAT MAY BE REQUIRED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING ANY CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE REQUIRED UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1102 (RELATING TO ENUMERATION OF ACTS REQUIRING CERTIFICATE) FOR THE TRANSFER OF UTILITY ASSETS OR FRANCHISES, AND ANY APPROVAL REQUIRED UNDER 66 PA.C.S. CH. 21 (RELATING TO RELATIONS WITH AFFILIATED INTERESTS) FOR TRANSACTIONS BETWEEN THE COVERED UTILITY AND THE ENTITIES.(10) IF ANY ASSETS ARE ASSOCIATED WITH MORE THAN ONE REGULATED SERVICE, THE ASSETS MAY BE HELD BY THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC AS CO-OWNER WITH ONE OR MORE OTHER REGULATED SERVICE LLCS, WITH EACH LLC'S INTEREST PROPORTIONALLY ALLOCATED IN A MANNER APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION FOR RATEMAKING PURPOSES.(11) FOR THE CAPITAL STRUCTURE AND INDEBTEDNESS OF THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC, THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(I) EACH REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL MAINTAIN A CAPITAL STRUCTURE FOR THE REGULATED SERVICE CONSISTENT WITH THE CAPITAL STRUCTURE AUTHORIZED BY THE COMMISSION FOR RATEMAKING PURPOSES, INCLUDING DEBT AND EQUITY COMPONENTS.(II) THE EQUITY COMPONENT OF THE REGULATED SERVICE FOR THE APPLICABLE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY SHALL CONSIST OF THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION'S EQUITY 20250HB1667PN3745 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INTEREST IN THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC WHICH IS FUNDED BY THE PROCEEDS OF AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS AND THE COVERED UTILITY'S RETAINED INTEREST.(III) FOR RATEMAKING PURPOSES, THE INTEREST ON INDEBTEDNESS OF THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL BE TREATED AS A COST OF THE REGULATED SERVICE.(IV) UPON FORMATION OF A REGULATED SERVICE LLC, THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE THE PORTION OF THE COVERED UTILITY'S OUTSTANDING INDEBTEDNESS THAT SHALL BE ALLOCATED TO THE REGULATED SERVICE BY APPLYING THE METHODOLOGY USED OR TO BE USED TO ALLOCATE THE COVERED UTILITY'S CAPITAL STRUCTURE AMONG REGULATED SERVICES FOR RATEMAKING PURPOSES.(V) THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL ASSUME ALLOCATED INDEBTEDNESS AS PRIMARY OBLIGOR IN WHICH THE COVERED UTILITY SHALL PROVIDE AN UNCONDITIONAL AND IRREVOCABLE GUARANTY OF ALL ASSUMED INDEBTEDNESS FOR THE REMAINING TERM OF EACH OBLIGATION.(VI) AN ASSUMPTION OF ALLOCATED INDEBTEDNESS SHALL NOT CONSTITUTE A DEFAULT, ACCELERATION EVENT, ASSIGNMENT OR BREACH UNDER THE INDEBTEDNESS, NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THE APPLICABLE INSTRUMENT TO THE CONTRARY.(VII) UPON FORMATION, THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL ISSUE ITS OWN DEBT TO FINANCE THE DEBT COMPONENT OF THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC'S CAPITAL STRUCTURE WHICH SHALL BE SECURED BY THE REGULATED SERVICE ASSETS HELD BY THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC.(VIII) UNLESS THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A GUARANTY IS NECESSARY TO OBTAIN FINANCING ON TERMS CONSISTENT WITH PUBLIC INTEREST, THE REGULATED SERVICE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LLC'S DEBT MAY NOT REQUIRE A GUARANTY BY THE COVERED UTILITY. IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A GUARANTY IS NECESSARY, IT SHALL BE LIMITED IN SCOPE AND FOR A MINIMUM DURATION TO FULFILL ITS OBLIGATIONS.(IX) FOR ANY PERIOD DURING WHICH THE COVERED UTILITY GUARANTEES INDEBTEDNESS OF A REGULATED SERVICE LLC, THE COVERED UTILITY SHALL BE ENTITLED TO A GUARANTY FEE IN AN AMOUNT AND UNDER THE TERMS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.(X) THE RATE BASE OF THE REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL BE DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE SECTION 2202(K).(12) UPON ESTABLISHMENT OF A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION AND REGULATED SERVICE LLC, THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION SHALL BECOME THE ISSUER OF ALL SUBSEQUENT AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS FOR THE APPLICABLE REGULATED SERVICE.(13) IF IT IS DETERMINED TO BE IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST, THE COMMISSION MAY AUTHORIZE THE COVERED UTILITY TO OFFER HOLDERS OF OUTSTANDING AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS THE OPTION TO CONVERT THEIR INTERESTS TO EQUIVALENT INTERESTS ISSUED BY THE REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION.(14) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, A COVERED UTILITY SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO FORM A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION OR REGULATED SERVICE LLC IF THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(I) THE COVERED UTILITY PROVIDES ONLY ONE REGULATED SERVICE SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE COMMISSION OR IF MULTIPLE CATEGORIES OF SERVICE HAVE BEEN DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION TO WARRANT CONSOLIDATED TREATMENT AS A SINGLE REGULATED SERVICE.(II) THE COVERED UTILITY DOES NOT ENGAGE IN ANY MATERIAL BUSINESS ACTIVITY OTHER THAN THE PROVISION OF 20250HB1667PN3745 - 173 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THAT REGULATED SERVICE.(15) A COVERED UTILITY THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (14) MAY ISSUE AUCTION EQUITY INTERESTS DIRECTLY, IN WHICH CASE ALL REFERENCES UNDER THIS ARTICLE TO A REGULATED SERVICE CORPORATION OR REGULATED SERVICE LLC SHALL BE CONSTRUED AS REFERENCES TO THE COVERED UTILITY WHEN APPLICABLE.SECTION 2204. ANNUAL REPORTING AND TRANSPARENCY.(A) REPORTS.--NOT LATER THAN JANUARY 15 OF EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR, THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE CONSUMER PROTECTION AND PROFESSIONAL LICENSURE COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE CONSUMER PROTECTION, TECHNOLOGY AND UTILITIES COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS ARTICLE. THE ANNUAL REPORT SHALL INCLUDE ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) EACH COVERED UTILITY'S REQUESTED RETURN ON EQUITY, RATE OF RETURN AND CAPITALIZATION MIX PROPOSED AS PART OF THE COVERED UTILITY'S MOST RECENT BASE RATE FILING UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1308(D) (RELATING TO VOLUNTARY CHANGES IN RATES), INCLUDING THE CORRESPONDING DATA FOR THE PRECEDING THREE BASE RATE FILINGS.(2) THE ACTUAL RETURN ON EQUITY, RATE OF RETURN AND CAPITALIZATION MIXES AUTHORIZED BY THE COMMISSION FOR EACH COVERED UTILITY IN THE MOST RECENT THREE BASE RATE PROCEEDINGS.(3) THE RESULTS OF ANY COMPETITIVE EQUITY AUCTIONS CONDUCTED UNDER THIS ARTICLE FOR THE PREVIOUS FIVE CALENDAR YEARS.(4) AN ANALYSIS OF THE IMPACT ON AVERAGE CUSTOMER RATES 20250HB1667PN3745 - 174 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RESULTING FROM IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS ARTICLE.(5) IN CLEAR AND ACCESSIBLE LANGUAGE, A DESCRIPTION OF HOW AUTHORIZED RETURNS ON EQUITY HAVE CHANGED, REFLECT NEW CIRCUMSTANCES OR REMAINED THE SAME DURING THE PREVIOUS YEAR.(6) ALL DATA USED FOR CALCULATIONS UNDER THIS ARTICLE WHICH IS NOT PUBLICLY AVAILABLE, INCLUDING AN EXPLANATION ON THE NECESSITY FOR USING NONPUBLIC DATA.(7) A SUMMARY OF ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS TAKEN UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(B) PUBLIC INFORMATION.--THE ANNUAL REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE MADE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE COMMISSION'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.SECTION 2205. APPLICABILITY TO STATE-JURISDICTIONAL RATE BASE.THIS ARTICLE SHALL APPLY ONLY TO THE PORTION OF A COVERED UTILITY'S RATE BASE THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE RATEMAKING JURISDICTION OF THE COMMISSION. NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO APPLY TO, MODIFY OR OTHERWISE AFFECT THE RETURN ON EQUITY APPLICABLE TO ANY FACILITIES, ASSETS OR SERVICES FOR WHICH THE RATE OF RETURN IS DETERMINED BY THE FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION OR ANY OTHER FEDERAL REGULATORY AUTHORITY. TO THE EXTENT THAT A COVERED UTILITY'S RATE BASE INCLUDES BOTH STATE-JURISDICTIONAL AND FEDERALLY JURISDICTIONAL COMPONENTS, THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH PROCEDURES TO ALLOCATE THE RATE BASE BETWEEN THOSE COMPONENTS. THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY DETERMINED UNDER THIS ARTICLE SHALL BE APPLIED SOLELY TO THE COMPONENTS SUBJECT TO THE COMMISSION'S JURISDICTION.SECTION 2206. APPLICABILITY TO RATEMAKING.(A) APPLICATION.--THIS ARTICLE SHALL APPLY TO EACH COVERED UTILITY AND EACH REGULATED SERVICE OF A COVERED UTILITY AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION REGARDLESS OF WHETHER A 20250HB1667PN3745 - 175 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RATE PROCEEDING UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1308(D) (RELATING TO VOLUNTARY CHANGES IN RATES) IS PENDING AND WITHOUT REGARD TO WHEN THE PROCEEDING WAS LAST CONCLUDED.(B) IMPLEMENTATION.--THE IMPLEMENTATION TIMELINE ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 2202(J) SHALL GOVERN THE COMMISSION'S ADJUSTMENT OF CUSTOMER RATES TO REFLECT THE AUTHORIZED RETURN ON EQUITY REQUIRED BY THIS ARTICLE.(C) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE THE INITIATION OF A RATE PROCEEDING UNDER 66 PA.C.S. § 1308(D) AS A PRECONDITION TO THE APPLICATION OF THIS ARTICLE TO A COVERED UTILITY.(D) DUTY TO SERVE.--NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE RELIEVES A COVERED UTILITY OF ITS OBLIGATION AND DUTY TO SERVE CUSTOMERS THROUGH CONTINUED INVESTMENT IN MAINTAINING A RELIABLE INFRASTRUCTURE THROUGH CONTINUED INVESTMENT AND UTILIZING A QUALIFIED WORKFORCE TO DO SO.ARTICLE XXII-ASERVICE AND FACILITIESSECTION 2201-A. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"COMMISSION." THE PENNSYLVANIA PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION."PUBLIC UTILITY." AS DEFINED IN 66 PA.C.S. § 102 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS).SECTION 2202-A. PREVIOUSLY UNBILLED SERVICE. (A) UNBILLED SERVICE.--NOTWITHSTANDING 66 PA.C.S. § 1509 (RELATING TO BILLING PROCEDURES) AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B), A PUBLIC UTILITY MAY NOT RENDER A BILL FOR PREVIOUSLY UNBILLED SERVICE THAT HAS ACCRUED OUTSIDE OF THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 176 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PREVIOUS 12-MONTH PERIOD.(B) APPLICABILITY.--SUBSECTION (A) DOES NOT APPLY TO A BILL THAT IS DELAYED AS A RESULT OF:(1) PROCEEDINGS OF THE COMMISSION OR A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION; OR(2) FRAUD, THEFT OR METER TAMPERING.SECTION 15. ARTICLE XXIX-D OF THE ACT IS REPEALED:[ARTICLE XXIX-DCOMPUTER DATA CENTEREQUIPMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAMSUBARTICLE APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSECTION 2901-D. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"BLOCKCHAIN." A DISTRIBUTED LEDGER TECHNOLOGY IN WHICH THE DATA IS:(1) SHARED ACROSS A NETWORK THAT CREATES A DIGITAL LEDGER OF VERIFIED TRANSACTIONS OR INFORMATION AMONG NETWORK PARTICIPANTS; AND(2) TYPICALLY LINKED USING CRYPTOGRAPHY TO MAINTAIN THE INTEGRITY OF THE DIGITAL LEDGER AND EXECUTE OTHER FUNCTIONS, INCLUDING THE TRANSFER OF OWNERSHIP OR VALUE."COMPUTER DATA CENTER." ALL OR PART OF A FACILITY THAT MAY BE COMPOSED OF ONE OR MORE BUSINESSES, OWNERS OR TENANTS, THAT IS OR WILL BE PREDOMINANTLY USED TO HOUSE WORKING SERVERS OR SIMILAR DATA STORAGE SYSTEMS AND THAT MAY HAVE UNINTERRUPTIBLE ENERGY SUPPLY OR GENERATOR BACKUP POWER, OR BOTH, COOLING SYSTEMS, TOWERS AND OTHER TEMPERATURE CONTROL INFRASTRUCTURE.20250HB1667PN3745 - 177 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT." EQUIPMENT THAT IS USED TO OUTFIT, OPERATE OR BENEFIT A COMPUTER DATA CENTER AND COMPONENT PARTS, INSTALLATIONS, REFRESHMENTS, REPLACEMENTS AND UPGRADES TO THE EQUIPMENT, WHETHER ANY OF THE EQUIPMENT IS AFFIXED TO OR INCORPORATED INTO REAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING:(1) ALL EQUIPMENT NECESSARY FOR THE TRANSFORMATION, GENERATION, DISTRIBUTION OR MANAGEMENT OF ELECTRICITY THAT IS REQUIRED TO OPERATE COMPUTER SERVERS OR SIMILAR DATA STORAGE EQUIPMENT, INCLUDING GENERATORS, UNINTERRUPTIBLE ENERGY SUPPLIES, CONDUIT, GASEOUS FUEL PIPING, CABLING, DUCT BANKS, SWITCHES, SWITCHBOARDS, BATTERIES AND TESTING EQUIPMENT.(2) ALL EQUIPMENT NECESSARY TO COOL AND MAINTAIN A CONTROLLED ENVIRONMENT FOR THE OPERATION OF THE COMPUTER SERVERS OR DATA STORAGE SYSTEMS AND OTHER COMPONENTS OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER, INCLUDING MECHANICAL EQUIPMENT, REFRIGERANT PIPING, GASEOUS FUEL PIPING, ADIABATIC AND FREE COOLING SYSTEMS, COOLING TOWERS, WATER SOFTENERS, AIR HANDLING UNITS, INDOOR DIRECT EXCHANGE UNITS, FANS, DUCTING AND FILTERS.(3) ALL WATER CONSERVATION SYSTEMS, INCLUDING FACILITIES OR MECHANISMS THAT ARE DESIGNED TO COLLECT, CONSERVE AND REUSE WATER.(4) ALL SOFTWARE, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ENABLING SOFTWARE AND LICENSING AGREEMENTS, COMPUTER SERVERS OR SIMILAR DATA STORAGE EQUIPMENT, CHASSIS, NETWORKING EQUIPMENT, SWITCHES, RACKS, CABLING, TRAYS AND CONDUITS.(5) ALL MONITORING EQUIPMENT AND SECURITY SYSTEMS.(6) MODULAR DATA CENTERS AND PREASSEMBLED COMPONENTS OF ANY ITEM DESCRIBED IN THIS DEFINITION, INCLUDING COMPONENTS USED IN THE MANUFACTURING OF MODULAR DATA CENTERS.20250HB1667PN3745 - 178 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) OTHER TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY THAT IS ESSENTIAL TO THE OPERATIONS OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER."DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE OF THE COMMONWEALTH."FACILITY." ONE OR MORE PARCELS OF LAND IN THIS COMMONWEALTH AND ANY STRUCTURES AND PERSONAL PROPERTY CONTAINED ON THE LAND."NEW INVESTMENT." CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION OR BUILD OUT OF DATA CENTER SPACE AT EITHER A NEW OR AN EXISTING COMPUTER DATA CENTER ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2014, AND THE PURCHASE AND INSTALLATION OF COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT, EXCEPT FOR ITEMS DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THE DEFINITION OF "COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT.""OWNER OR OPERATOR." INCLUDES A SINGLE ENTITY, MULTIPLE ENTITIES OR AFFILIATED ENTITIES."PROOF OF WORK CRYPTO-ASSET MINING." THE PROCESS OF PERFORMING COMPUTATIONS TO ADD A VALID BLOCK OF DATA TO A BLOCKCHAIN, EXCLUDING COMPUTATIONS REQUIRED TO VALIDATE INDIVIDUAL TRANSACTIONS, TYPICALLY IN EXCHANGE FOR A REWARD OR FEE."QUALIFICATION PERIOD." EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTIONS 2931-D(D), 2935-D(B) AND 2937-D(C), AS FOLLOWS:(1) WITH RESPECT TO THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE, A PERIOD OF TIME BEGINNING ON THE DATE OF CERTIFICATION OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER AND EXPIRING AT THE END OF THE FIFTEENTH FULL CALENDAR YEAR FOLLOWING THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE OWNER OR OPERATOR FILED AN APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION.(2) WITH RESPECT TO A QUALIFIED TENANT OF THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE, A PERIOD OF TIME BEGINNING ON THE DATE THAT THE QUALIFIED TENANT ENTERS INTO AN AGREEMENT CONCERNING THE USE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 179 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OR OCCUPANCY OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER AND EXPIRING AT THE EARLIER OF THE EXPIRATION OF THE TERM OF THE AGREEMENT OR THE END OF THE 10TH FULL CALENDAR YEAR FOLLOWING THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE QUALIFIED TENANT ENTERS INTO THE AGREEMENT."QUALIFIED TENANT." AN ENTITY THAT CONTRACTS WITH THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER THAT IS CERTIFIED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE TO USE OR OCCUPY PART OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR AT LEAST 100 KILOWATTS PER MONTH FOR TWO OR MORE YEARS."TAX EXEMPTION." THE TAX EXEMPTION PROVIDED UNDER SUBARTICLE C."TAX REFUND." THE TAX REFUND PROVIDED FOR UNDER SUBARTICLE B."TELECOMMUNICATIONS PROVIDER." A PROVIDER OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES AS DEFINED IN 61 PA. CODE § 60.20 (RELATING TO TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE)."TENANT." AN ENTITY THAT CONTRACTS WITH THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER TO USE OR OCCUPY PART OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER.SUBARTICLE BSALES AND USE TAX REFUND PROGRAMSECTION 2911-D. SALES AND USE TAX REFUND.(A) APPLICATION.--BEGINNING JULY 1, 2017, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE MAY APPLY FOR A TAX REFUND OF TAXES PAID UNDER ARTICLE II UPON THE SALE AT RETAIL OR USE OF COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT FOR INSTALLATION IN A COMPUTER DATA CENTER, PURCHASED BY:(1) AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.20250HB1667PN3745 - 180 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A QUALIFIED TENANT CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(B) APPLICABILITY.--TAXES PAID UNDER ARTICLE II DURING THE QUALIFICATION PERIOD SHALL BE ELIGIBLE FOR A REFUND UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(C) EXCLUSIONS.--THE FOLLOWING DO NOT QUALIFY FOR A TAX REFUND:(1) COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT USED BY THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER TO:(I) GENERATE ELECTRICITY FOR RESALE PURPOSES TO A POWER UTILITY, EXCEPT FOR SALES INCIDENTAL TO THE PRIMARY SALE TO COMPUTER DATA CENTERS AND WHICH QUALIFY UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II); OR(II) GENERATE, PROVIDE OR SELL MORE THAN 5% OF ITS ELECTRICITY OUTSIDE OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER.(2) (RESERVED).SECTION 2912-D. APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION.TO BE CONSIDERED FOR A CERTIFICATION, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT AN APPLICATION ON A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING:(1) THE OWNER'S OR OPERATOR'S NAME, ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE NUMBER.(2) THE ADDRESS OF THE SITE WHERE THE FACILITY IS OR WILL BE LOCATED, INCLUDING, IF APPLICABLE, INFORMATION SUFFICIENT TO IDENTIFY THE SPECIFIC PORTION OR PORTIONS OF THE FACILITY COMPRISING THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER.(3) IF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS TO QUALIFY UNDER SECTION 2915-D(1), THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:(I) THE ANTICIPATED INVESTMENT ASSOCIATED WITH THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR WHICH THE CERTIFICATION IS BEING 20250HB1667PN3745 - 181 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SOUGHT.(II) AN AFFIRMATION, SIGNED BY AN AUTHORIZED EXECUTIVE REPRESENTING THE OWNER OR OPERATOR, THAT THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS EXPECTED TO SATISFY THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 2915-D(1).(4) IF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS TO QUALIFY UNDER SECTION 2915-D(2), AN AFFIRMATION, SIGNED BY AN AUTHORIZED EXECUTIVE REPRESENTING THE OWNER OR OPERATOR, THAT THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER HAS SATISFIED, OR WILL SATISFY, THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 2915-D(2).(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL BEGIN ACCEPTING APPLICATIONS NO LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.SECTION 2913-D. REVIEW OF APPLICATION.(A) GENERAL RULE.--WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A COMPLETE AND CORRECT APPLICATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATION AND EITHER ISSUE A WRITTEN CERTIFICATION THAT THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER QUALIFIES FOR THE CERTIFICATION OR PROVIDE WRITTEN REASONS FOR ITS DENIAL.(B) DEEMED APPROVAL.--FAILURE OF THE DEPARTMENT TO APPROVE OR DENY AN APPLICATION WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SUBMITS THE APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT CONSTITUTES CERTIFICATION OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER, AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE WRITTEN CERTIFICATION TO THE OWNER OR OPERATOR WITHIN 14 DAYS. THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT CERTIFY ANY COMPUTER DATA CENTER AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2021.SECTION 2914-D. SEPARATION OF FACILITIES.(A) SEPARATE CERTIFICATION.--AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER MAY SEPARATE A FACILITY INTO ONE OR MORE COMPUTER DATA CENTERS, WHICH MAY EACH RECEIVE A SEPARATE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 182 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CERTIFICATION, IF EACH COMPUTER DATA CENTER INDIVIDUALLY MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 2915-D.(B) LIMITATION.--A PORTION OF A FACILITY OR AN ARTICLE OF COMPUTER DATA EQUIPMENT SHALL NOT BE DEEMED TO BE A PART OF MORE THAN ONE COMPUTER DATA CENTER.(C) AGGREGATION.--AN OWNER OR OPERATOR MAY AGGREGATE ONE OR MORE PARCELS, BUILDINGS OR CONDOMINIUMS IN A FACILITY INTO A SINGLE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IF, IN THE AGGREGATE, THE PARCELS, BUILDINGS AND CONDOMINIUMS MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ARTICLE.SECTION 2915-D. ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS.A COMPUTER DATA CENTER MUST MEET ONE OF THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS, AFTER TAKING INTO ACCOUNT THE COMBINED INVESTMENTS MADE AND ANNUAL COMPENSATION PAID BY THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER OR THE QUALIFIED TENANT:(1) ON OR BEFORE THE FOURTH ANNIVERSARY OF CERTIFICATION, THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER CREATES A MINIMUM INVESTMENT OF:(I) AT LEAST $25,000,000 OF NEW INVESTMENT IF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS LOCATED IN A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF 250,000 OR FEWER INDIVIDUALS; OR(II) AT LEAST $50,000,000 OF NEW INVESTMENT IF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS LOCATED IN A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF MORE THAN 250,000 INDIVIDUALS.(2) ONE OR MORE TAXPAYERS OPERATING OR OCCUPYING A COMPUTER DATA CENTER, IN THE AGGREGATE, PAY ANNUAL COMPENSATION OF AT LEAST $1,000,000 TO EMPLOYEES AT THE CERTIFIED COMPUTER DATA CENTER SITE FOR EACH YEAR OF THE CERTIFICATION AFTER THE FOURTH ANNIVERSARY OF CERTIFICATION.SECTION 2916-D. NOTIFICATION.20250HB1667PN3745 - 183 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) REQUIREMENTS SATISFIED.--ON OR BEFORE THE FOURTH ANNIVERSARY OF THE CERTIFICATION OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN WRITING WHETHER THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR WHICH THE CERTIFICATION IS REQUESTED HAS SATISFIED THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 2915-D.(B) RECORDS.--UNTIL A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 2915-D, THE OWNER, OPERATOR AND QUALIFIED TENANTS SHALL MAINTAIN DETAILED RECORDS OF ALL INVESTMENTS CREATED BY THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER, INCLUDING COSTS OF BUILDINGS AND COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT, AND ALL TAX REFUNDS DIRECTLY RECEIVED BY THE OWNER, OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT.SECTION 2917-D. REVOCATION OF CERTIFICATION.(A) REVOCATION.--IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 2915-D HAVE NOT BEEN SATISFIED, THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVOKE THE CERTIFICATION OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER.(B) APPEAL.--THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER MAY APPEAL THE REVOCATION. APPEALS FILED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE GOVERNED BY ARTICLE II.(C) RECAPTURE.--IF CERTIFICATION IS REVOKED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE QUALIFICATION PERIOD OF ANY OWNER, OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER EXPIRES, AND THE DEPARTMENT MAY RECAPTURE FROM THE OWNER, OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT ALL OR PART OF THE TAX REFUND PROVIDED DIRECTLY TO THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT. THE DEPARTMENT MAY GIVE SPECIAL CONSIDERATION OR ALLOW A TEMPORARY EXEMPTION FROM RECAPTURE OF THE TAX REFUND IF THERE IS EXTRAORDINARY HARDSHIP DUE TO FACTORS BEYOND THE CONTROL OF THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR 20250HB1667PN3745 - 184 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 QUALIFIED TENANT.SECTION 2918-D. GUIDELINES.THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH GUIDELINES AND PRESCRIBE FORMS AND PROCEDURES AS NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE.SECTION 2919-D. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION.PROPRIETARY BUSINESS INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE APPLICATION FORM DESCRIBED IN SECTION 2912-D AND THE WRITTEN NOTICE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 2916-D, AS WELL AS INFORMATION CONCERNING THE IDENTITY OF A QUALIFIED TENANT, ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND MAY NOT BE DISCLOSED TO THE PUBLIC. THE DEPARTMENT MAY DISCLOSE THE NAME OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER THAT HAS BEEN CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.SECTION 2920-D. LIST OF TENANTS.AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL PROVIDE, TO THE EXTENT PERMISSIBLE UNDER FEDERAL LAW, THE DEPARTMENT WITH A LIST OF QUALIFIED TENANTS, INCLUDING THE COMMENCEMENT AND EXPIRATION DATES OF EACH QUALIFIED TENANT'S AGREEMENT TO USE OR OCCUPY PART OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER. THE LIST SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE DEPARTMENT ANNUALLY, UPON REQUEST BY THE DEPARTMENT.SECTION 2921-D. SALE OR TRANSFER.EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 2917-D, A COMPUTER DATA CENTER RETAINS ITS CERTIFICATION REGARDLESS OF A TRANSFER, SALE OR OTHER DISPOSITION, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER.SECTION 2922-D. APPLICATION.(A) GENERAL RULE.--AN OWNER, OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT MAY APPLY FOR A TAX REFUND UNDER THIS ARTICLE ON OR BEFORE JULY 30, 2017, AND EACH JULY 30 THEREAFTER.(B) NOTIFICATION.--NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 30, 2017, AND 20250HB1667PN3745 - 185 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EACH SEPTEMBER 30 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY EACH APPLICANT OF THE AMOUNT OF TAX REFUND APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.SECTION 2923-D. LIMITATIONS.(A) TOTAL.--THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF STATE TAX REFUNDS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS ARTICLE SHALL NOT EXCEED $7,000,000 IN ANY FISCAL YEAR.(B) ALLOCATION.--IF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX REFUNDS APPROVED FOR ALL APPLICANTS EXCEEDS THE LIMITATION ON THE AMOUNT OF TAX REFUNDS IN SUBSECTION (A) IN A FISCAL YEAR, THE TAX REFUND TO BE RECEIVED BY EACH APPLICANT SHALL BE DETERMINED AS FOLLOWS:(1) DIVIDE:(I) THE TAX REFUND APPROVED FOR THE APPLICANT; BY(II) THE TOTAL OF ALL TAX REFUNDS APPROVED FOR ALL APPLICANTS.(2) MULTIPLY:(I) THE AMOUNT UNDER SUBSECTION (A); BY(II) THE QUOTIENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1).(3) THE ALGEBRAIC FORM OF THE CALCULATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS:TAXPAYER'S TAX REFUND = AMOUNT ALLOCATED FOR THOSE TAX REFUNDS X (TAX REFUND APPROVED FOR THE APPLICANT/TOTAL OF ALL TAX REFUNDS APPROVED FOR ALL APPLICANTS).SECTION 2924-D. APPLICABILITY.NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ISSUE A TAX REFUND UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE FOR THE TAX IMPOSED UPON THE SALE AT RETAIL OR USE OF COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT PURCHASED AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2021.SUBARTICLE C20250HB1667PN3745 - 186 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION PROGRAMSECTION 2931-D. SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION.(A) SALES AND USE TAX.--BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2022, THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER ARTICLE II SHALL NOT BE IMPOSED UPON THE SALE AT RETAIL OR USE OF COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT PURCHASED FOR INSTALLATION IN A CERTIFIED COMPUTER DATA CENTER, IF PURCHASED BY ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE.(2) A QUALIFIED TENANT OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE.(B) APPLICABILITY.--A TAX EXEMPTION APPROVED UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE SHALL APPLY DURING THE QUALIFICATION PERIOD AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 2942-D.(C) EXCLUSIONS.--THE FOLLOWING SHALL NOT QUALIFY FOR A TAX EXEMPTION:(1) A TELECOMMUNICATIONS PROVIDER'S COMPUTER DATA CENTER THAT DOES NOT HAVE RETAIL OR WHOLESALE CUSTOMERS BEING BILLED OR PAYING FOR SERVICES AND DOES PROVIDE A MAJORITY OF SERVICES FOR INTERNAL USE OR USE BY THE TELECOMMUNICATIONS PROVIDER'S SUBSIDIARIES.(2) COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT USED BY THE CERTIFIED COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:(I) GENERATING ELECTRICITY FOR RESALE PURPOSES TO A POWER UTILITY.(II) GENERATING, PROVIDING OR SELLING MORE THAN 5% OF ITS ELECTRICITY OUTSIDE OF THE CERTIFIED COMPUTER DATA CENTER.(III) PROOF OF WORK CRYPTO-ASSET MINING.(3) LAPTOP COMPUTERS, HANDHELD DEVICES AND MOTOR 20250HB1667PN3745 - 187 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 VEHICLES FOR USE BOTH INSIDE AND OUTSIDE THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER.(D) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "QUALIFICATION PERIOD" SHALL MEAN THE FOLLOWING:(1) WITH RESPECT TO THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE, A PERIOD OF TIME BEGINNING ON THE DATE OF CERTIFICATION OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER AND EXPIRING AT THE END OF THE 25TH FULL CALENDAR YEAR FOLLOWING THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE OWNER OR OPERATOR FILED AN APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION.(2) WITH RESPECT TO A QUALIFIED TENANT OF THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE, A PERIOD OF TIME BEGINNING ON THE DATE THAT THE QUALIFIED TENANT ENTERS INTO AN AGREEMENT CONCERNING THE USE OR OCCUPANCY OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER AND EXPIRING AT THE EARLIER OF THE EXPIRATION OF THE TERM OF THE AGREEMENT OR THE END OF THE 10TH FULL CALENDAR YEAR FOLLOWING THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE QUALIFIED TENANT ENTERS INTO THE AGREEMENT.SECTION 2932-D. APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION.(A) APPLICATION.--TO BE CONSIDERED FOR A CERTIFICATION, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT AN APPLICATION ON A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT INCLUDES ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) THE OWNER'S OR OPERATOR'S NAME, ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE NUMBER.(2) THE ADDRESS OF THE SITE WHERE THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS OR WILL BE LOCATED, INCLUDING, IF APPLICABLE, INFORMATION SUFFICIENT TO IDENTIFY THE SPECIFIC PORTION OF A FACILITY COMPRISING THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER.(3) AN AFFIRMATION, SIGNED BY AN AUTHORIZED EXECUTIVE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 188 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REPRESENTING THE OWNER OR OPERATOR, THAT THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS EXPECTED TO SATISFY THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED UNDER SECTION 2935-D.(B) ACCEPTANCE.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL BEGIN ACCEPTING APPLICATIONS NO LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.(C) COMPLIANCE IN REPORTING.--AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT ELIGIBLE FOR A CERTIFICATION SHALL COMPLY WITH ALL REPORTING, FILING AND COMPLIANCE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS ACT.(D) COMPLIANCE IN TAX LAWS.--NO OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT MAY RECEIVE A CERTIFICATION UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE UNLESS THAT OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT IS IN FULL COMPLIANCE WITH ALL STATE TAX LAWS.SECTION 2933-D. REVIEW OF APPLICATION.(A) GENERAL RULE.--WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A COMPLETE AND CORRECT APPLICATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATION AND EITHER ISSUE A WRITTEN CERTIFICATION THAT THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER QUALIFIES FOR THE CERTIFICATION OR PROVIDE WRITTEN REASONS FOR ITS DENIAL.(B) DEEMED APPROVAL.--FAILURE OF THE DEPARTMENT TO APPROVE OR DENY AN APPLICATION THAT HAS BEEN ACKNOWLEDGED AS RECEIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SUBMITS THE APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSTITUTE CERTIFICATION OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER, AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE WRITTEN CERTIFICATION TO THE OWNER OR OPERATOR WITHIN 14 DAYS.SECTION 2934-D. SEPARATION OF FACILITIES.(A) SEPARATE CERTIFICATION.--AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER MAY SEPARATE A FACILITY INTO ONE OR MORE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 189 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMPUTER DATA CENTERS, WHICH MAY EACH RECEIVE A SEPARATE CERTIFICATION, IF EACH COMPUTER DATA CENTER INDIVIDUALLY MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 2935-D.(B) LIMITATION.--A PORTION OF A FACILITY OR AN ARTICLE OF COMPUTER DATA EQUIPMENT SHALL NOT BE DEEMED TO BE A PART OF MORE THAN ONE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR CERTIFICATION UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE.(C) AGGREGATION.--AN OWNER OR OPERATOR MAY AGGREGATE ONE OR MORE PARCELS, BUILDINGS OR CONDOMINIUMS IN A FACILITY INTO A SINGLE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR CERTIFICATION UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE IF, IN THE AGGREGATE, THE PARCELS, BUILDINGS AND CONDOMINIUMS MEET THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 2935-D.SECTION 2935-D. ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS.(A) GENERAL RULE.--IN ORDER TO BE CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER MUST MEET ALL OF THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:(1) ON OR BEFORE THE FOURTH ANNIVERSARY OF CERTIFICATION, THE COMBINED INVESTMENT, IN THE AGGREGATE, OF THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER MUST TOTAL A MINIMUM OF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) AT LEAST $75,000,000 OF NEW INVESTMENT IF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS LOCATED IN A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF 250,000 OR FEWER INDIVIDUALS AND CREATES 25 NEW JOBS.(II) AT LEAST $100,000,000 OF NEW INVESTMENT IF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS LOCATED IN A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF MORE THAN 250,000 INDIVIDUALS AND CREATES 45 NEW JOBS.(2) ON OR BEFORE THE FOURTH ANNIVERSARY OF CERTIFICATION, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT OF A 20250HB1667PN3745 - 190 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMPUTER DATA CENTER, IN THE AGGREGATE, MUST PAY ANNUAL COMPENSATION OF AT LEAST $1,000,000 TO EMPLOYEES AT THE CERTIFIED COMPUTER DATA CENTER SITE FOR EACH YEAR OF THE CERTIFICATION AFTER THE FOURTH ANNIVERSARY OF CERTIFICATION.(B) PRIOR APPLICATIONS.--A COMPUTER DATA CENTER THAT HAS MET THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS AS PRESCRIBED UNDER SECTION 2915-D AND HAS, PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2021, BEEN CERTIFIED UNDER SECTION 2913-D SHALL BE DEEMED TO MEET THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION. THE CERTIFICATION SHALL NOT BE REVOKED, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 2917-D, AND SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT FOR THE REMAINDER OF THE QUALIFICATION PERIOD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2931-D(D).(C) LIMITATION.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT CERTIFY ANY COMPUTER DATA CENTER UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2032.(D) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "NEW INVESTMENT" MEANS CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION OR BUILD OUT OF DATA CENTER SPACE AT EITHER A NEW OR AN EXISTING COMPUTER DATA CENTER ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2022, AND THE PURCHASE AND INSTALLATION OF COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT, EXCEPT FOR ITEMS DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THE DEFINITION OF "COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT" IN SECTION 2901-D.SECTION 2936-D. NOTIFICATION AND RECORDS.(A) REQUIREMENTS SATISFIED.--ON OR BEFORE THE FOURTH ANNIVERSARY OF THE CERTIFICATION OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN WRITING WHETHER THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR WHICH THE CERTIFICATION IS REQUESTED HAS SATISFIED THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED UNDER SECTION 2935-D.(B) RECORDS.--THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT SHALL:20250HB1667PN3745 - 191 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) MAINTAIN DETAILED RECORDS OF ALL INVESTMENTS CREATED BY THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER, INCLUDING COSTS OF BUILDINGS AND COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT AND ALL TAX EXEMPTIONS RECEIVED BY THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT.(2) MAINTAIN PURCHASE JOURNALS FOR EXAMINATION BY THE DEPARTMENT.SECTION 2937-D. REVOCATION OF CERTIFICATION.(A) REVOCATION.--IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 2935-D HAVE NOT BEEN SATISFIED, THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVOKE THE CERTIFICATION OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER.(B) APPEAL.--THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER MAY APPEAL THE REVOCATION. APPEALS FILED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE GOVERNED BY ARTICLE II.(C) RECAPTURE.--IF CERTIFICATION IS REVOKED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE QUALIFICATION PERIOD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2931-D(D), OF ANY OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL EXPIRE AND THE DEPARTMENT MAY RECAPTURE FROM THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT ALL OR PART OF THE TAX EXEMPTION RECEIVED BY THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT UNDER SECTION 2942-D. THE DEPARTMENT MAY GIVE SPECIAL CONSIDERATION OR ALLOW A TEMPORARY EXEMPTION FROM RECAPTURE OF THE TAX EXEMPTION IF THERE IS EXTRAORDINARY HARDSHIP DUE TO FACTORS BEYOND THE CONTROL OF THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT. THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT TO FILE APPROPRIATE AMENDED TAX RETURNS IN ORDER TO REFLECT ANY RECAPTURE OF THE TAX EXEMPTION.(D) LIMITATION ON ASSESSMENT.--NOTWITHSTANDING THE LIMITATION ON ASSESSMENT AND COLLECTION IN SECTION 258, THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 192 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSESS ANY TAX DETERMINED NOT TO BE PROPERLY EXEMPTED UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE WITHIN FIVE YEARS FROM THE DATE AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER PURCHASES PROPERTY EXEMPT FROM A TAX. A TAXPAYER MAY CONSENT TO AN EXTENSION OF THE PERIOD AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 261.SECTION 2938-D. GUIDELINES.THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH GUIDELINES AND PRESCRIBE FORMS AND PROCEDURES AS NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE.SECTION 2939-D. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION.PROPRIETARY BUSINESS INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE APPLICATION FORM DESCRIBED UNDER SECTION 2932-D AND THE WRITTEN NOTICE DESCRIBED UNDER SECTION 2936-D, AS WELL AS INFORMATION CONCERNING THE IDENTITY OF A QUALIFIED TENANT, SHALL BE CONFIDENTIAL AND MAY NOT BE DISCLOSED TO THE PUBLIC. THE DEPARTMENT MAY DISCLOSE THE NAME OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER THAT HAS BEEN CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE.SECTION 2940-D. LIST OF TENANTS.AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A CERTIFIED COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL PROVIDE, TO THE EXTENT PERMISSIBLE UNDER FEDERAL LAW, THE DEPARTMENT WITH A LIST OF QUALIFIED TENANTS, INCLUDING THE COMMENCEMENT AND EXPIRATION DATES OF EACH QUALIFIED TENANT'S AGREEMENT TO USE OR OCCUPY PART OF THE CERTIFIED COMPUTER DATA CENTER. THE LIST SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE DEPARTMENT ANNUALLY, UPON REQUEST BY THE DEPARTMENT.SECTION 2941-D. SALE OR TRANSFER.EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 2937-D, A COMPUTER DATA CENTER RETAINS ITS CERTIFICATION REGARDLESS OF A TRANSFER, SALE OR OTHER DISPOSITION, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER.20250HB1667PN3745 - 193 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 2942-D. CERTIFICATE OF EXEMPTION.(A) GENERAL RULE.--A QUALIFIED OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE MAY SUBMIT FOR A SALES AND USE TAX CERTIFICATE OF EXEMPTION IN A MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2021, AND RENEW EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT OF A CERTIFIED COMPUTER DATA CENTER ELIGIBLE FOR A SALES AND USE TAX CERTIFICATE OF EXEMPTION SHALL COMPLY WITH ALL REPORTING, FILING AND COMPLIANCE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS ACT.(2) NO OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT MAY RECEIVE A SALES AND USE TAX CERTIFICATE OF EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE UNLESS THAT OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT IS IN FULL COMPLIANCE WITH ALL STATE TAX LAWS.(B) NOTIFICATION.--NO LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE SUBMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) FOR A SALES AND USE TAX CERTIFICATE OF EXEMPTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A SALES AND USE TAX CERTIFICATE OF EXEMPTION TO EACH APPLICANT APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(C) EXEMPT PURCHASES.--THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT OF A CERTIFIED COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL PREPARE AND DELIVER A PROPERLY EXECUTED SALES AND USE TAX CERTIFICATE OF EXEMPTION TO A VENDOR FROM WHICH THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT PURCHASES EXEMPT COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT.]SECTION 16. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING AN ARTICLE TO READ:ARTICLE XXIX-JADDITIONAL PROPERTY TAX REBATESECTION 2901-J. DEFINITIONS.20250HB1667PN3745 - 194 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "ACCOUNT." THE RESTRICTED ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 2902-J."CLAIMANT." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO FILES AN APPLICATION FOR THE REBATE AUTHORIZED UNDER SECTION 2903-J WHO HAS FILED A CLAIM FOR PROPERTY TAX AND:(1) IS AN ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL; OR(2) LIVES IN THE SAME HOUSEHOLD AS AN ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL."DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE OF THE COMMONWEALTH."ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RESIDES IN A HOMESTEAD AND IS AT LEAST 65 YEARS OF AGE."HOMESTEAD." A DWELLING AND SO MUCH OF THE LAND SURROUNDING IT, AS IS REASONABLY NECESSARY FOR THE USE OF THE DWELLING AS A HOME, OCCUPIED BY A CLAIMANT. THE TERM INCLUDES:(1) PREMISES OCCUPIED BY REASON OF OWNERSHIP OR LEASE IN A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.(2) MOBILE HOMES WHICH ARE ASSESSED AS REALTY FOR LOCAL PROPERTY TAX PURPOSES AND THE LAND, IF OWNED OR RENTED BY THE CLAIMANT, UPON WHICH THE MOBILE HOME IS SITUATED, AND OTHER SIMILAR LIVING ACCOMMODATIONS.(3) A PART OF A MULTIDWELLING OR MULTIPURPOSE BUILDING AND A PART OF THE LAND UPON WHICH THE DWELLING OR BUILDING IS BUILT.(4) PREMISES OCCUPIED BY REASON OF THE CLAIMANT'S OWNERSHIP OF A DWELLING LOCATED ON LAND OWNED BY A NONPROFIT INCORPORATED ASSOCIATION, OF WHICH THE CLAIMANT IS A MEMBER, IF THE CLAIMANT IS REQUIRED TO PAY A PRO RATA SHARE OF THE PROPERTY TAXES LEVIED AGAINST THE ASSOCIATION'S LAND.(5) PREMISES OCCUPIED BY A CLAIMANT IF THE CLAIMANT IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO PAY A PROPERTY TAX BY REASON OF THE 20250HB1667PN3745 - 195 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CLAIMANT'S OWNERSHIP, INCLUDING A POSSESSORY INTEREST, IN THE DWELLING, THE LAND OR BOTH. AN OWNER INCLUDES A PERSON IN POSSESSION UNDER A CONTRACT OF SALE, DEED OF TRUST, LIFE ESTATE, JOINT TENANCY OR TENANCY IN COMMON OR BY REASON OF STATUTES OF DESCENT AND DISTRIBUTION."PROPERTY TAX RELIEF FUND." THE PROPERTY TAX RELIEF FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER 4 PA.C.S. § 1409 (RELATING TO PROPERTY TAX RELIEF FUND)."REAL PROPERTY TAXES." ALL TAXES ON A HOMESTEAD, EXCLUSIVE OF MUNICIPAL ASSESSMENTS, DELINQUENT CHARGES AND INTEREST, DUE AND PAYABLE DURING A CALENDAR YEAR."REBATE." THE REBATE AUTHORIZED UNDER SECTION 2903-J.SECTION 2902-J. ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED.THERE SHALL BE ESTABLISHED WITHIN THE PROPERTY TAX RELIEF FUND A RESTRICTED ACCOUNT FOR THE PURPOSE OF PAYING THE REBATES UNDER SECTION 2903-J. ALL OF THE MONEY COLLECTED UNDER SECTION 1101(A)(4) SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE ACCOUNT.SECTION 2903-J. ADDITIONAL PROPERTY TAX REBATE.(A) ELIGIBILITY.--IN ADDITION TO THE REBATE AUTHORIZED UNDER CHAPTER 13 OF THE ACT OF JUNE 27, 2006 (1ST SP.SESS., P.L.1873, NO.1), KNOWN AS THE TAXPAYER RELIEF ACT, A CLAIMANT SHALL BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A REBATE UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(B) AMOUNT OF REBATE.--EACH APPROVED CLAIMANT SHALL RECEIVE A REBATE IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF LOCAL SCHOOL REAL ESTATE TAXES PAID BY THE APPROVED CLAIMANT IN THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR LESS THE AMOUNT PAID IN THE YEAR THE CLAIMANT TURNED 64 YEARS OF AGE, OR IF THE CLAIMANT IS NOT AT LEAST 65 YEARS OF AGE, THE AMOUNT PAID IN THE YEAR THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL RESIDING IN THE CLAIMANT'S HOMESTEAD TURNED 64 YEARS OF AGE.SECTION 2904-J. FILING AND PAYMENT OF CLAIM.20250HB1667PN3745 - 196 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) FILING.--EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B), A CLAIM FOR A REBATE UNDER THIS ARTICLE SHALL BE FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT ON OR BEFORE THE 30TH DAY OF JUNE OF THE YEAR NEXT SUCCEEDING THE END OF THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH REAL PROPERTY TAXES WAS DUE AND PAYABLE.(B) PAYMENTS FROM ACCOUNT.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3), NO REIMBURSEMENT ON A CLAIM SHALL BE MADE FROM THE ACCOUNT EARLIER THAN THE DAY FOLLOWING THE 30TH DAY OF JUNE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION ON WHICH THAT CLAIM MAY BE FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT.(C) ELIGIBILITY OF CLAIMANTS.--(1) ONLY ONE CLAIMANT FROM A HOMESTEAD EACH YEAR SHALL BE ENTITLED TO THE REBATE.(2) IF TWO OR MORE PEOPLE ARE ABLE TO MEET THE QUALIFICATIONS FOR A CLAIMANT, THE INDIVIDUALS MAY DETERMINE WHO THE CLAIMANT SHALL BE.(3) IF THE INDIVIDUALS ARE UNABLE TO AGREE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE TO WHOM THE REBATE IS TO BE PAID.SECTION 2905-J. PROOF OF CLAIM.(A) CONTENTS.--EACH CLAIM SHALL BE SUBMITTED ON A FORM AND IN A MANNER ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND SHALL INCLUDE:(1) THE SIZE AND NATURE OF THE PROPERTY CLAIMED AS A HOMESTEAD.(2) THE TAX RECEIPT OR OTHER PROOF THAT THE REAL PROPERTY TAXES ON THE HOMESTEAD HAVE BEEN PAID.(3) CERTIFICATION THAT THE CLAIMANT OR AN INDIVIDUAL IN THE CLAIMANT'S HOUSEHOLD IS 65 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER.(B) DIRECT PAYMENT OF TAXES NOT REQUIRED.--IT SHALL NOT BE NECESSARY THAT TAXES WERE PAID DIRECTLY BY THE CLAIMANT IF THE TAXES HAVE BEEN PAID WHEN THE CLAIM IS FILED.20250HB1667PN3745 - 197 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 2906-J. INCORRECT CLAIM.WHENEVER ON AUDIT OF A CLAIM THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THE CLAIM TO HAVE BEEN INCORRECTLY DETERMINED, IT SHALL REDETERMINE THE CORRECT AMOUNT OF THE CLAIM AND NOTIFY THE CLAIMANT OF THE REASON FOR THE REDETERMINATION AND THE AMOUNT OF THE CORRECTED CLAIM.SECTION 2907-J. FUNDS FOR PAYMENT OF CLAIMS.APPROVED CLAIMS SHALL BE PAID FROM THE ACCOUNT.SECTION 17. SECTION 3003.2(B)(2) AND (4.3) AND (C)(1) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (A) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 3003.2. ESTIMATED TAX.--(A) THE FOLLOWING TAXPAYERS ARE REQUIRED TO PAY ESTIMATED TAX:* * *(1.1) EVERY UNITARY BUSINESS SUBJECT TO THE CORPORATE NET INCOME TAX IMPOSED BY ARTICLE IV, COMMENCING WITH THE CALENDAR YEAR 2027 AND FISCAL YEARS BEGINNING DURING THE CALENDAR YEAR 2027 AND EACH TAXABLE YEAR THEREAFTER, SHALL MAKE PAYMENTS OF ESTIMATED CORPORATE NET INCOME TAX.* * *(B) THE FOLLOWING WORDS, TERMS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS SECTION AND SECTION 3003.3 SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING MEANINGS ASCRIBED TO THEM:* * *(2) "ESTIMATED CORPORATE NET INCOME TAX." THE AMOUNT WHICH THE CORPORATION OR THE UNITARY BUSINESS ESTIMATES AS THE AMOUNT OF TAX IMPOSED BY SECTION 402 OF ARTICLE IV FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR.* * *(4.3) "PERSON." ANY NATURAL PERSON, ASSOCIATION, FIDUCIARY, 20250HB1667PN3745 - 198 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARTNERSHIP, CORPORATION, UNITARY BUSINESS OR OTHER ENTITY, INCLUDING THE COMMONWEALTH, ITS POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS AND INSTRUMENTALITIES AND PUBLIC AUTHORITIES. WHENEVER USED IN ANY CLAUSE PRESCRIBING AND IMPOSING A PENALTY OR IMPOSING A FINE OR IMPRISONMENT, OR BOTH, THE TERM "PERSON," AS APPLIED TO AN ASSOCIATION, SHALL INCLUDE THE MEMBERS THEREOF [AND], AS APPLIED TO A CORPORATION, THE OFFICERS THEREOF AND AS APPLIED TO A UNITARY BUSINESS, THE OFFICERS OF THE DESIGNATED MEMBER.* * *(C) ESTIMATED TAX SHALL BE PAID AS FOLLOWS:(1) PAYMENTS OF ESTIMATED CORPORATE NET INCOME TAX SHALL BE MADE IN EQUAL INSTALLMENTS ON OR BEFORE THE FIFTEENTH DAY OF THE THIRD, SIXTH, NINTH AND TWELFTH MONTHS OF THE TAXABLE YEAR. THE REMAINING PORTION OF THE CORPORATE NET INCOME TAX DUE, IF ANY, SHALL BE PAID UPON THE DATE THE CORPORATION'S ANNUAL REPORT OR THE UNITARY BUSINESS'S COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT IS REQUIRED TO BE FILED WITHOUT REFERENCE TO ANY EXTENSION OF TIME FOR FILING SUCH REPORT.* * *SECTION 18. SECTION 3003.3(D) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 3003.3. UNDERPAYMENT OF ESTIMATED TAX.--* * *(D) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF [THE PRECEDING SUBSECTIONS,] THIS SECTION, OTHER THAN AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (D.1), INTEREST WITH RESPECT TO ANY UNDERPAYMENT OF ANY INSTALLMENT OF ESTIMATED TAX SHALL NOT BE IMPOSED IF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ALL PAYMENTS OF ESTIMATED TAX MADE ON OR BEFORE THE LAST DATE PRESCRIBED FOR THE PAYMENT OF SUCH INSTALLMENT EQUALS OR EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT WHICH WOULD HAVE BEEN REQUIRED TO BE PAID ON OR BEFORE SUCH DATE IF THE ESTIMATED TAX WERE AN 20250HB1667PN3745 - 199 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE TAX COMPUTED AT THE RATES APPLICABLE TO THE TAXABLE YEAR, INCLUDING ANY MINIMUM TAX IMPOSED, BUT OTHERWISE ON THE BASIS OF THE FACTS SHOWN ON THE REPORT OF THE TAXPAYER FOR, AND THE LAW APPLICABLE TO, THE SAFE HARBOR BASE YEAR, ADJUSTED FOR ANY CHANGES TO SECTIONS 401, 601, 602 AND 1101 ENACTED FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR, IF A REPORT SHOWING A LIABILITY FOR TAX WAS FILED BY THE TAXPAYER FOR THE SAFE HARBOR BASE YEAR. IF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ALL PAYMENTS OF ESTIMATED TAX MADE ON OR BEFORE THE LAST DATE PRESCRIBED FOR THE PAYMENT OF SUCH INSTALLMENT DOES NOT EQUAL OR EXCEED THE AMOUNT REQUIRED TO BE PAID PER THE PRECEDING SENTENCE, BUT SUCH AMOUNT IS PAID AFTER THE DATE THE INSTALLMENT WAS REQUIRED TO BE PAID, THEN THE PERIOD OF UNDERPAYMENT SHALL RUN FROM THE DATE THE INSTALLMENT WAS REQUIRED TO BE PAID TO THE DATE THE AMOUNT REQUIRED TO BE PAID PER THE PRECEDING SENTENCE IS PAID. PROVIDED, THAT IF THE TOTAL TAX FOR THE SAFE HARBOR BASE YEAR EXCEEDS THE TAX SHOWN ON SUCH REPORT BY TEN PER CENT OR MORE, THE TOTAL TAX ADJUSTED TO REFLECT THE CURRENT TAX RATE SHALL BE USED FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION. IN THE EVENT THAT THE TOTAL TAX FOR THE SAFE HARBOR BASE YEAR EXCEEDS THE TAX SHOWN ON THE REPORT BY TEN PER CENT OR MORE, INTEREST RESULTING FROM THE UTILIZATION OF SUCH TOTAL TAX IN THE APPLICATION OF THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT BE IMPOSED IF, WITHIN FORTY-FIVE DAYS OF THE MAILING DATE OF EACH ASSESSMENT, PAYMENTS ARE MADE SUCH THAT THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ALL PAYMENTS OF ESTIMATED TAX EQUALS OR EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT WHICH WOULD HAVE BEEN REQUIRED TO BE PAID ON OR BEFORE SUCH DATE IF THE ESTIMATED TAX WERE AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE TOTAL TAX ADJUSTED TO REFLECT THE CURRENT TAX RATE. IN ANY CASE IN WHICH THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH AN UNDERPAYMENT OF ESTIMATED TAX MAY EXIST IS A SHORT TAXABLE YEAR, IN DETERMINING THE TAX SHOWN ON 20250HB1667PN3745 - 200 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE REPORT OR THE TOTAL TAX FOR THE SAFE HARBOR BASE YEAR, THE TAX WILL BE REDUCED BY MULTIPLYING IT BY THE RATIO OF THE NUMBER OF INSTALLMENT PAYMENTS MADE IN THE SHORT TAXABLE YEAR TO THE NUMBER OF INSTALLMENT PAYMENTS REQUIRED TO BE MADE FOR THE FULL TAXABLE YEAR.(D.1) WITH RESPECT TO ANY UNDERPAYMENT OF AN INSTALLMENT OF ESTIMATED CORPORATE NET INCOME TAX FOR ANY TAX YEAR THAT BEGINS IN TAXABLE YEAR 2027 OR 2028 BY A CORPORATION REQUIRED TO FILE A COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 403(A.1)(1), INTEREST SHALL NOT BE IMPOSED IF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ALL PAYMENTS OF ESTIMATED CORPORATE NET INCOME TAX MADE ON OR BEFORE THE LAST DATE PRESCRIBED FOR THE PAYMENT OF SUCH INSTALLMENT EQUALS OR EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT WHICH WOULD HAVE BEEN REQUIRED TO BE PAID ON OR BEFORE SUCH DATE IF THE ESTIMATED TAX WERE AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE COMBINED TAX SHOWN ON THE REPORTS OF ALL THE MEMBERS OF THE UNITARY BUSINESS FOR THE SAFE HARBOR BASE YEAR COMPUTED AT THE RATE APPLICABLE TO THE TAXABLE YEAR.SECTION 19. SECTION 3003.11 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 3003.11. RESTATEMENT OF TAX LIABILITY UNDER TREATIES.--IN THE ABSENCE OF AN EXPRESS EXEMPTION FROM STATE INCOME TAXES, NO TREATY OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO EXEMPT A CORPORATION OR A MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS FROM THE TAXES IMPOSED UNDER ARTICLES IV AND VI. FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING "TAXABLE INCOME" UNDER ARTICLE IV, ANY CORPORATION OR MEMBER OF A UNITARY BUSINESS NOT SUBJECT TO FEDERAL INCOME TAXATION OR FEDERAL REPORTING REQUIREMENTS PURSUANT TO SUCH A TREATY SHALL BE REQUIRED TO FILE A REPORT OR FILE AS PART OF A COMBINED ANNUAL REPORT WITH THE DEPARTMENT SHOWING THE TAXABLE INCOME WHICH WOULD HAVE BEEN REPORTED TO AND ASCERTAINED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT HAD IT NOT BEEN EXEMPTED 20250HB1667PN3745 - 201 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BY THE TREATY.SECTION 20. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 3003.26. DATA CENTERS.--(A) UNLESS CERTIFIED UNDER ARTICLE XXIX-D PRIOR TO FEBRUARY 3, 2026, A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL NOT BE ELIGIBLE FOR TAX BENEFITS UNDER ARTICLE XVIII-C OR XIX-B OR THE ACT OF OCTOBER 6, 1998 (P.L.705, NO.92), KNOWN AS THE KEYSTONE OPPORTUNITY ZONE, KEYSTONE OPPORTUNITY EXPANSION ZONE AND KEYSTONE OPPORTUNITY IMPROVEMENT ZONE ACT.(B) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"COMPUTER DATA CENTER." ALL OR PART OF A FACILITY THAT MAY BE COMPOSED OF ONE OR MORE BUSINESSES, OWNERS OR TENANTS, THAT IS OR WILL BE PREDOMINANTLY USED TO HOUSE WORKING SERVERS OR SIMILAR DATA STORAGE SYSTEMS AND THAT MAY HAVE UNINTERRUPTIBLE ENERGY SUPPLY OR GENERATOR BACKUP POWER, OR BOTH, COOLING SYSTEMS, TOWERS AND OTHER TEMPERATURE CONTROL INFRASTRUCTURE.SECTION 21. THE TRANSITION FROM ARTICLE XX-B OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, TO ARTICLE XVII-E.1 OF THE ACT SHALL BE AS FOLLOWS:(1) ARTICLE XX-B OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949 SHALL CONTINUE TO APPLY TO A TAX CREDIT APPROVED FOR A FISCAL YEAR PRIOR TO THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR, A CONTRIBUTION MADE UNDER AN APPROVAL ISSUED FOR A FISCAL YEAR PRIOR TO THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR, A REPORT REQUIRED FOR A FISCAL YEAR PRIOR TO THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR AND AN ADMINISTRATIVE, ENFORCEMENT, TAX OR REPORTING MATTER ARISING FROM A TAX CREDIT OR CONTRIBUTION UNDER ARTICLE XX-B OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949.(2) THE ADDITION OF ARTICLE XVII-E.1 OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO TAX CREDITS APPROVED FOR THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR 20250HB1667PN3745 - 202 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER.SECTION 22. THIS ACT SHALL APPLY AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO TAX YEARS BEGINNING ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026:THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 1101(A).THE ADDITION OF SECTION 1710-A.1.(2) THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026:THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTION 401(3)1(A) AND (B), (P.1) AND (T)(5), 2(A)(1)(E.1), 2(A)(9)(A)(VI) AND 2(A)(17)(E) AND 4(H) AND (I), (5), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18) AND (19).THE ADDITION OF SECTION 401.1(F).THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTIONS 402(A) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND (5)(III) AND (D) AND 403(A.1), (A.2), (B.1), (C), (D), (E.1) AND (F).THE AMENDMENT OF SECTIONS 403.1 AND 403.2(B) AND (E).THE REPEAL OF SECTION 404.THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 405.THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTION 406(E) AND (F).THE AMENDMENT OF SECTIONS 407.3(F), 407.6(A)(5), (6) AND (8) AND 407.7(D)(3).THE ADDITION OF SECTION 408(E).THE AMENDMENT OF SECTIONS 409 AND 410(C).THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTION 3003.2(A)(1.1), (B)(2) AND (4.3) AND (C)(1).THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTION 3003.3(D) AND (D.1).THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 3003.11.SECTION 23. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250HB1667PN3745 - 203 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930